문장단위 엔터로 구분

1. Why Restaurant Chains Are Making A Comeback | CNBC Marathon - YouTube
   https://youtu.be/gx1DHHrxE6k?si=51k_nFpRXEQb3MvQ
   1. (54) Why Restaurant Chains Are Making A Comeback | CNBC Marathon - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gx1DHHrxE6k
    
    Mcdonald's is rolling out a special $5 value menu next month.
    Wendy's and Burger King both launch $5 value meals of their own.
    Restaurants are hoping to win back customers who have been turned off by high prices and turn to grocery stores for meals.
    Why are people going back to Chili's all of a sudden?
    I don't get it.
    This is called the Triple Dipper.
    Chili's estimates that nearly 40% of its growth this past quarter came from these mozzarella sticks going viral on TikTok.
    You cannot tell me that's the most insane cheese pull you've ever seen.
    Across fast food chains, chicken has been a hit, especially this year.
    What began as a buffalo chicken wing restaurant in 1994, in Texas, has now grown to more than 2,000 restaurants nationwide.
    The company says that this growth was driven by increased transactions.
    I would say depending on the day, we will receive typically around 300, 400 transactions.
    We weren't always the top of the tier.
    And over the last two years we've just seen such a turnaround.
    Why are people going back to Chili's all of a sudden?
    I don't get it.
    Chili's Grill & Bar is an anomaly in the restaurant space right now.
    Can I get a thousand islands please?
    Yes .
    At locations that have been open for more than a year, Chili's fourth quarter sales increased nearly 15% compared to the same time period in 2023.
    In a segment that is seen declining traffic and flat sales is a tremendous accomplishment, and I think it speaks to how much what they did really resonates with today's consumer.
    Chili's parent company, Brinker International, reported its total revenue surpassing $4.4 billion in fiscal 2024.
    That's an all time high for the company.
    Well, the brand has experienced some internet virality over the past few months, its current success, didn't happen overnight.
    It's actually been at this turnaround for now, it's a little over two years, and we just started with the fundamentals of casual dining.
    So that sounds easy.
    It sounds kind of a little bit of motherhood and apple pie.
    But the reality is it's really, really difficult to execute.
    So how did Chili's do it, and can they keep it up?
    Brinker International owns Chili's and Maggiano's Little Italy.
    Chili's accounts for more than 85% of its business.
    Its growth was pioneered by the founder of casual dining, Norman Brinker, who acquired the chain in 1983.
    There is a long term history with Chili's that goes back to the Norman Brinker days.
    A lot of pride in having fun at the restaurant operations led culture, who was very much a youthful brand that was differentiated from grill and bar peers.
    The chain grew quickly, reaching a peak store count of over 1,300 U.S . locations by 2008, and Brinker International's annual revenue had exceeded $4 billion.
    The recession hit the restaurant sector hard, especially casual dining, as consumers increasingly opted to eat meals at home.
    Chili's, has shut down stores almost every year since.
    That brand slowly lost its way, often pursuing things that were outside the brand parameters.
    Extending the menu too far for example.
    Why did you feel the need to narrow the offerings of it?
    Yeah, you know, I think in legacy brands, it typically, the way to try to get short term sales growth is you add more items, and that will work in the short term, but it makes it very difficult for the restaurant teams to be able to execute, unless the business is growing fast enough where they can afford more labor, it's very hard to run that menu.
    And so that's what we had.
    Guys have a start out to 84.
    It would make our lives difficult on a Friday, Saturday night when we're really busy and each zone in the kitchen is trying to pump out food as fast as possible and try to make a quality dish.
    And sometimes that quality suffered.
    There was also a misguided focus placed on takeout and delivery.
    After falling from its highs in 2007, Brinker's revenue remained relatively stagnant in the decade leading up to the pandemic.
    Even the three years preceding Covid, the profitability of the business had gotten worse, partly because they were pursuing off premise businesses.
    Ultimately, they took the money out of the advertising budget and put it into third party delivery initiatives and even virtual brands to reach the consumer with the kitchens and the assets that they had.
    Well those initiatives, hurt the on premise business.
    That all changed when CEO Kevin Hochman stepped in, in 2022.
    Brinker International's 2024 revenue surpassed the highs it saw in the early 2000s.
    What's changed, why are Americans going back to Chili's?
    What's happening is one, the actual experience is a whole lot better.
    But then two, you know, our marketing team has done a great job of getting back into the called the zeitgeist or being relevant again.
    We weren't always the top of the tier.
    And over the last two years we've just seen such a turnaround.
    You know, from the support we get from, you know, our bosses to the technology, the culinary innovations, all of those things.
    It made Chili's fun again.
    Over the past two fiscal years, Chili's has grown its average sales per restaurant by about $440,000.
    That's 14% more than what it was before, in the same time period, Hochman says the menu has shrunk more than 20%.
    And typically you don't get rid of menu items because you're going to lose sales.
    We got rid of almost a quarter of our menu, right?
    And I'm happy to say that that simplification has worked.
    We have grown the business, we have improved guest metrics.
    And that's why we're beating the industry pretty significantly right now.
    In the 2024 fiscal year, Brinker International has invested $200 million in capital expenditure.
    That means it was investing heavily in repairs, maintenance, and improving its restaurants overall.
    Brinker International share price is up around 60% since the start of 2024.
    But despite strong sales, the company did miss Wall Street's expectations for earnings in its most recent quarter.
    We went and put more labor into the restaurants, which is expensive.
    We accelerated facility improvements that we probably would have done next year, and we'll pull them into this year.
    Wall Street didn't anticipate us making those additional investments to try to hold on to more of that traffic.
    And that was the change in expectations versus what they were seeing, and what we knew.
    Traffic spiked by about 6% in Chili's most recent quarter compared to the same time period of last year.
    Hey, yo, Chili's, what?
    Part of that is due to due to recent success with social media.
    You hear 5% traffic growth and you're like, is that that much?
    Well, it doesn't happen throughout the day.
    It happens during peak times.
    So, that could be, you know, in some cases it could be 20, 30% more guests coming in, right?
    And then spread across the day, it's 5%.
    So, you really got to staff up.
    If you don't want lines and you want to have a good experience.
    To keep up, Brinker has spent an additional $5 million on staffing.
    Another 15 to $20 million of labor is planned for 2025.
    This is called the Triple Dipper.
    Chili's estimates that nearly 40% of its growth this past quarter came from these mozzarella sticks going viral on TikTok.
    You cannot tell me that's the most insane cheese pull you've ever seen.
    Every time a customer orders that, I'm like, oh, you saw it on TikTok, and they're like, yeah, it's hilarious.
    Within a week, you know what we were ordering in order to fulfill those orders tripled in some restaurants, even probably even more so.
    We were, we were bringing in so many mozzarella planks that, you know, it was hard to store them all, but you didn't have to because they were going out just as quickly as they were coming in.
    The chain estimates that the other 60% of sales growth came from its $10.99 Big Smasher meal, meaning it's capitalizing on one of the most important consumer pain points at the current time: value.
    The inflation rate of limited service dining, think food you order at the counter, has outpaced that of sit down restaurants for all of 2023 and even the first quarter of 2024.
    And Chili's saw an opportunity precisely there.
    How is this Chili's three for me only $10.99, when fast food is so expensive?
    It could be because we don't have to pay for any mascots.
    Please.
    Certainly, they've had decent success over the last couple of years, but this really now has resonated with consumers in a way that I haven't seen a full service promotion resonate in quite some time.
    We're a nostalgic brand that brings people in, and they've leaned into that and they've leaned into the socials, they've leaned into the advertising, and their innovations, their investments are working and our traffic is up.
    Our sales are up.
    Brinker spent $14 million more on advertising in its fiscal fourth quarter of 2024, compared to the same time last year.
    Applebee's has pushed a similar strategy, but with less success.
    Its same -store sales have been in the negative every quarter over the past year, while Chili's have been in the positive.
    You order DoorDash nowadays or you know, delivery, and you might pay $17, $18 for a value meal of sorts from a fast food place, and you're not getting a fraction of what we're offering with Chili's.
    As casual dining is marketing itself as an alternative to fast food.
    Even CEO of Darden Restaurants, which owns chains like Olive Garden and Longhorn Steakhouse, said certain casual dining chains are taking customers from fast food competitors.
    Still, though, from a consumer spending perspective, over the past decade, limited-service spending has increased as a percentage of overall sales, while full-service dining has decreased.
    Limited-service, which includes fast food, and fast casual, i.e. upscale fast food.
    A little bit higher experience, but we bucket it all together in limited-service has outperformed.
    Traffic has been good.
    It's slowed as everything else has.
    Fast food chains are more exposed to the lower income consumer, who have pulled back with certain discretionary spending.
    Casual dining has more of a percentage of consumers that are over $100,000 in income.
    And that exposure, that relative exposure, has been good for them if they have the right value.
    However, when comparing a chain like Chili's to McDonald's, the scale of the companies must be put into context.
    Last year, Chile's revenue was around $3.5 billion, while McDonald's revenue was over $25 billion.
    Double digit sales growth is simply much harder to come by when you're that big.
    Plus, the reality is that consumers who frequent fast food chains versus casual dining chains are often coming from different income levels.
    Because the interest rates are higher, the wealth effects are less.
    The long term real wage declines all hurt the under $50,000 cohort.
    And unfortunately for McDonald's, for example, they have to deal with that way more than Chili's.
    In addition to the fact that Chili's has played much better in the value realm, and in fact, quite astutely, Kevin Hochman and team have marketed to that relative value even versus fast food.
    The real test for Chili's will be sustaining this recent growth for the long haul.
    Customers need to not only be coming back, but they need to be spending more, too.
    Full service is not only the traffic conundrum getting people in the seats, but also then generating margin, and a lot of the higher margin items that are generated by casual dining - alcohol, desserts, appetizers have been the areas that consumers have cut back on.
    That's important because restaurants often rely on deals to bring people in the door and get them spending on other things.
    Value offerings themselves typically aren't generating high margins.
    At what point does that eat into profit, though?
    Are you concerned about that as a maybe long term...
    Well, certainly you have to be concerned with that, because ultimately we have shareholders and we have a great rate of return.
    You know, one of the things I'm proud of that the team has been able to do is we have what's called a barbell strategy.
    So as long as we have items that we can that we can offer for guests that want something a little bit more versus some guests that just want a high price point, and we keep that that mix in balance, right?
    We're going to continue to grow profitability.
    What would you like today, Ryan?
    So I'll do a split combo.
    Would you like- 6, 8, 10 or 12?
    8, sounds great.
    What began as a buffalo chicken wing restaurant in 1994, in Texas, has now grown to more than 2,000 restaurants nationwide.
    Right now, we're just dropping some chicken.
    I love this, out of any other flavor, hot honey.
    Oh, man, I'll take it.
    I'll take hot honey more than anything, ever.
    Mhm.
    That's the lemon pepper.
    It's one of their most popular.
    It's delicious.
    Since initially going public in 2015, Wingstop stock price is up over 1,100%.
    Over the past five years, it's up nearly 300%.
    And in the past year alone, it's more than doubled.
    So Wingstop's growth is really unprecedented in the restaurant industry.
    You know, if I went back to Chipotle in the 2000s, when the brand was emerging, we saw growth almost at Chipotle at Wingstop's levels.
    But what's different about Wingstop, is the fact that it's over 2,000 stores.
    There's no other brand at scale to the growth that Wingstop's doing.
    The company's systemwide store count reached over 2,300 at the end of June.
    That's about 1,000 more locations than it had in 2019.
    Consequently, revenue has more than doubled in that same time period.
    On average, our franchisees invest about $500,000 to open a Wingstop, and they're basically getting that entire investment paid back to them in less than two years because the income statement is so strong.
    With chains like Starbucks and McDonald's facing consumer pullback.
    How did Wingstop become one of the hottest restaurant chains in the country?
    Across fast food chains, chicken has been a hit, especially this year.
    And with school coming back around, football scaling back up, it's starting to pick up in the morning.
    They love chicken in the morning.
    They love chicken in the morning.
    I love chicken.
    But you know, I love chicken in the morning.
    That's good news for Wingstop, because well, chicken is about all it sells.
    Its menu also lends itself well to an experiential offering for hanging out with friends or watching a football game.
    If you're thinking about someone who has to make a decision on where to trim spending, the likelihood that they're going to give up something that is associated with a social event is much lower than, hey, I'm going to forego my Starbucks coffee this morning.
    Wingstop is a special occasion.
    Our frequency over my ten years has really averaged about three times a quarter or once a month, a low frequency occasion.
    And we're just now, for the first time, starting to see that tick upwards, which we're pretty excited about.
    Going beyond just wings has helped drive that uptick.
    The chicken sandwich wars took off right before the pandemic and as chain after chain vied for market share.
    Wingstop eventually got in on the game.
    The chicken sandwich this was introduced in the middle of 2022.
    Chicken is a very popular protein with the consumer, particularly fried chicken.
    And so the ability for Wingstop to offer their chicken sandwich in 11 flavors, you know, really an opportunity for continued utilization .
    Wingstop has seen an increase in new guests visiting its locations ever since the chicken sandwich was introduced.
    And those new customers are visiting more frequently than its traditional wing customer.
    The company reported same store sales growth, increasing nearly 30% in the U.S . for the second quarter of this year.
    That means that the company generated more sales per store compared to last year.
    The company says that this growth was driven by increased transactions.
    I would say depending on the day, we will receive typically around 300, 400 transactions.
    Investors look at same store sales is the key metric for health of restaurant concept.
    Wingstop has experienced same-store sales growth for 20 years.
    The stores themselves require relatively low operational costs.
    We run a very efficient labor profile.
    You can run that Wingstop, that's doing on average $2 million.
    You can run that with as few as four team members in the restaurant.
    We run in a very efficient box-on-average about 1,600, 1,700 square feet.
    And so our occupancy cost where we target B, B- real estate is extremely efficient.
    So this Wingstop in Neptune, New Jersey opened a few years back.
    And I initially thought it was a very interesting location choice.
    It's set off from the main road, across from a grocery store in the middle of a shopping center.
    But that's exactly the type of real estate that Wingstop targets.
    It doesn't need to target prime real estate because last quarter, nearly 70% of its sales came from digital orders, meaning people were not just impulsively stopping by, they were coming here intentionally.
    The use occasion or the consumption occasion for Wingstop is the consumer coming to them.
    And so I don't care if I have to go next to the pet store to pick up my wings, because I'm going there to pick it up.
    Whereas, like I said, if a McDonald's was in the middle of a strip mall, you lose a lot of those impulse purchases because it's, you know, there's not a drive-thru.
    Brand awareness is growing.
    Franchisees contribute a percentage of sales into the national advertising fund.
    So as system sales grow, so does ad spend, which nearly doubled from 2021 to 2023.
    From about five years ago to now.
    Not a lot of people know about Wingstop.
    But not everybody knows about Wingstop.
    The viral nature of the brand and how it's cropped up so many different times on social media has really helped feed into the, you know, the customer acquisition.
    H ashtag Wingstop has been tagged in over 150,000 TikTok videos that have garnered millions of views.
    The company has leaned heavily into marketing with live sports.
    It has official partnerships with multiple NBA teams, and its free wing promotions have led to viral moments, with top athletes.
    Giannis wants the chance to get the QR code to get his free wings.
    Although the chain saw its U.S. same store sales grow over 28% last quarter, and beat Wall Street earnings expectations, the stock price has actually fallen more than 10% from the highs that were seen in June.
    Wingstop is still one of the best performing restaurant stocks.
    I think as of recent, you've seen a big divergence in the valuations of restaurant stocks.
    So, a stock like Wingstop, a stock like Sweetgreen, a stock like Cava, have very premium valuations relative to the overall restaurant space and then other more mature restaurant stocks like McDonald's, like Starbucks, have seen their stocks have their valuation beat down.
    Take a look at Wingstop stock price.
    Now look at the company's earnings per share over the last 12 months.
    That price to earnings ratio is high.
    Now take a look at the same valuation, for stocks like McDonald's and Starbucks.
    Trading at a higher premium, means more volatility in its share price.
    The rest of the story, though, is really macro, that the consumer base for Wingstop historically skewed more lower income and on a price per calorie basis.
    It's just cheaper to go to a quick service drive-thru to get food, relative to a Wingstop.
    However, Charles says that Wingstop is seeing a shift from a middle to higher income consumer with increased transaction on third party delivery apps.
    Plus, unlike its fast food competitors, Wingstop has kept a tight leash on prices.
    Since 2019, Wingstop has only increased prices by around 15%, while its peers and the quick-service restaurant category fall into the 30 to 40% range.
    The reason we think quick-service is underperforming Wingstop, is really about the amount of price that quick-service has taken, and that there is a lot less discipline relative to what Wingstop has done in recent years.
    In 2021, wing prices soared, so Wingstop pushed chicken thighs instead.
    To combat this type of volatility going forward, the company changed the way it sourced its chicken wings.
    They shifted from a spot where they're just buying whatever the market price is, to negotiating that price for the whole bird.
    They'll use the parts of the bird they need for their operation, the wing, the breast, etc. and they'll effectively sell the remains to either a soup or pet food company that can use the remaining part of the bird.
    And that's allowing us to create predictability.
    And most importantly, it's minimizing the volatility that our franchisees see on their income statement within their food cost line.
    In its most recent earnings call, Wingstop raised its store count goal to reach a domestic total of 6,000 locations.
    That would be about triple its current total and more locations than Kentucky Fried Chicken currently has in the U.S.
    However, that kind of growth could be a long way out.
    TD Cowen anticipates the chain to have about 4,000 locations domestically, and 5,000 locations globally, by 2030.
    You know, I don't think this is going to be the new Kentucky Fried Chicken or some big chain, but they've got another 2 or 3 years of packing on 250, 300 stores before they start saturating America.
    The company also says it has room for growth within the world of third party delivery systems.
    On DoorDash and on Uber Eats, our awareness levels are still really low.
    Our delivery channel mix is about 30% today.
    When we benchmark delivery channel mix to other, more mature, heavy off premise businesses.
    Think big pizza.
    Their delivery channel mix is north of 50%, so we see a lot of runway there.
    Wingstop is still relatively low awareness, even as the broader consumer is maybe pulling back from spending on food away from home, Wingstop has the opportunity to gain incremental consumers that have never heard of the brand before.
    Skipworth says that Wingstop has a goal of transitioning entirely to digital ordering.
    Does that mean, like you would eliminate that face-to-face interaction?
    And it would be more of just kind of a pickup model, is that the goal?
    We're not holding chicken that's been previously cooked.
    We're making it to order.
    And on average it takes about 18 minutes to get your order at a Wingstop.
    So, training guests to order ahead, through our digital platform.
    It's actually just a better guest experience.
    But then for our perspective, we tend to see a higher average check.
    The average annual sales per store is over $2 million, and the company now aims to make that $3 million.
    About 98% of Wingstop's are franchises.
    And as we grow our average sales-per-restaurant, it's continuing to make those income statements for our franchisees better.
    And that's going to make them want to open more Wingstops.
    And that's how I think we'll continue to be able to scale Wingstop into what our overall vision is, is to become a top ten global restaurant brand.
    In order to be a top ten restaurant brand, you're talking about roughly about $10 billion in scale.
    And so this is an ambition that getting to $18 billion based on their long term targets, will put themselves pretty solidly there.
    And just to give you some you some perspective, the $18 billion target puts them right now in between Chick-fil-A and Taco Bell, in terms of what that would mean for today.
    With fast food customers revolting over higher prices, chains like McDonald's, Burger King and Wendy's are bringing back the value meal.
    Consumers are continuing to collide with companies over higher prices.
    Mcdonald's is rolling out a special $5 value menu next month.
    Wendy's and Burger King both launch $5 value meals of their own.
    Restaurants are hoping to win back customers who have been turned off by high prices and turned to grocery stores for meals.
    Mcdonald's, Taco Bell, Burger King and Wendy's have unveiled or revived meal deals with a $5 or less price tag.
    Find out which extra value meal is $2.99.
    Go to your local McDonald's.
    It's a familiar playbook that fast food chains have used in the past, and the competition has sparked what some are calling the value menu war.
    Causing this, you know.
    quote, "war," could actually be helpful for them, and it might actually help the entire fast food industry.
    And this has always been an industry where value is critically important.
    We stepped away from that or backed away from that a little bit during the pandemic and in the years subsequent, because spending was robust, because there was a lot of inflation in the commodity complex.
    But now, you know, we're seeing what I would characterize as a little bit more of a return to normal.
    So what has led to the revival of the value menu, and are lower prices here to stay?
    With the price of fast food skyrocketing, cash strapped consumers have pulled back on their restaurant spend.
    You go back to where we were in 2019, our costs in the U.S. have gone up 40%, in our restaurants.
    Since '19?
    Since 2019, costs are up 40%, and-
    Prices are, and prices are up?
    Pricing, pricing is up correspondingly.
    As of August 2024, prices for food away from home rose over 27% since 2019.
    In the U.S., McDonald's same-store sales fell 0.7% in the second quarter of 2024, compared to the previous year, the first time domestic same-store sales have fallen since 2020.
    Other chains felt the same pressures in the U.S. In the second quarter of 2024, Burger King saw same-store sales decline by 0.1%, and KFC's fell 5% compared to the previous year.
    Higher wages have also been a factor.
    Labor costs in states like California and New York further pinched tight margins.
    Well, I would consider the $5 menu sort of chapter one of a multi chapter value playbook that we're going to be writing.
    And that is continued through the end of August.
    Mcdonald's has said it's seeing traffic increase as a result, and investors are buying in.
    The company's stock has been moving up since reporting earnings in late July.
    Taco Bell led the value menu wars launching its cravings menu back in January.
    Value is working for them, but it's really, again, to quote McDonald's, "it's a knife fight out there."
    The value meals are only an entry point to customers to return, and potentially buy more items not found on the discounted menu.
    Fast food typically does better during economic downturns, but the sharp increase in prices over the years have made fast food meals a luxury.
    But value menus can be tough on franchisees, because simply lowering the prices will equate to less profit.
    A McDonald's franchisees advocacy group wrote in a letter obtained by CNBC to the chain, saying, "the fact remains that in order to provide the consumer with more affordable options, they must be affordable to the owner/operators."
    The discount pricing may be a boon for customers, but not so much for franchisees.
    Franchisees tried to push back against the value menu rollout, citing reduced costs would further hurt their already tight profit margins.
    Well, you know, McDonald's is a big family and it has been around for 60 years, it's been, it's prided itself its success on this three-legged stool between suppliers, the brand, and of course, the vital franchisees.
    And so in every big family, you have disagreements.
    But this debate, this internal debate, has yielded a great result for the brand.
    And that is us being in the forefront of value.
    Franchisees have recognized the fact that they voted to continue it, is recognized that the vast majority of franchisees can make money on these meal bundles, and in particular, are seeing incremental transactions, incremental sales from that.
    In addition, they're looking at other value constructs that are being more of a permanent solution.
    So, there's a lot of gates to go through here.
    So whether it's buy one, get one for a dollar, or for five, they need to find a value solution here in the near term.
    Mcdonald's originally announced its value menu would be seasonal, lasting only a month.
    It later decided to extend the deals.
    Analysts in the street alike expect these deals to remain in some form far longer, to continue to attract the value driven consumer.
    We are working with the franchisees in the U.S. to get a broader value construct in place.
    And so what we're working on right now with the franchisees is, what's next?
    I consider the $5 meal a bridge value program, and then what we'll be doing is putting in place a more permanent value program, much like we had previously.
    Some restaurant analysts expect the value menus to slowly disappear as they normally do, but in their place will remain meal deals like Wendy's popular for for four or Taco Bell's Cravings box.
    You know, it's just going to be a consistent battle for market share.
    I wouldn't expect dramatic changes in results from Q2 to Q3 just given the demand environment.
    And so what we're really going to be looking for is which restaurants, which companies can resonate most with, with consumers and therefore outpace the rest of the industry.


    2. Why are there millions of empty houses in Japan? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube

https://youtu.be/ojNm2TxqfN4?si=kbDI7bCB52r5j0To
    Why are there millions of empty houses in Japan? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ojNm2TxqfN4
    
   Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings.
   From the BBC World Service, this is The Global Story.
   In Japan, the number of abandoned homes is at an all-time high.
   Nine million properties sit empty, blighting city streets and turning some rural communities into ghost towns.
   So what do these crumbling houses say about Japan's existential crisis and its aging, shrinking population?
   And could a new breed of homeowners, young, foreign and eager for a bargain, help to solve the problem?
   With me today is our Tokyo correspondent, Shaimaa Khalil.
   Hi, Shaimaa, how are you?
   I'm good, I m good.
   It's so good to speak to you, Lucy.
   Shaimaa, lovely to see you.
   Now, if I'm out and about in a big city in like Tokyo or Osaka or Kyoto or even on the countryside, am I going to see some of these abandoned homes?
   Yes, and some of them are more obvious than others.
   So if you're in the countryside, for example, there are homes where nature has pretty much taken over.
   So that's a very obvious sign of an abandoned home.
   I think here In Tokyo, for example, there are also obvious older ones, but if you're like me and you're a big, avid home programmes fan and you walk around looking at houses and wondering how people live inside them, some will be more obvious to you.
   And then others are just so deceptive.
   You walk around and they look perfectly normal, but you find out from a broker or real estate agent or those who bought them that they've been abandoned for years and years and years.
   So some are more obvious than others, for sure.
   And the obvious ones, it's obvious because they're decaying and decrepit or they have sort of, you know, foliage growing out of them.
   How can you tell?
   Exactly.
   They're in really bad, they're in a really bad state.
   They're pretty much falling apart.
   Yeah, so sometimes you just, you can tell by the state of it that it's, you know, it's a wooden, very traditional-looking Japanese home that has seen better days in the middle of a main street where there are many other buildings around it.
   And you could tell that it's been abandoned for many years.
   Is this generally, though, Shaimaa, seen as a more rural issue?
   Japan is really suffering when it comes to urbanisation.
   And there are villages that are literally dying out.
   You know, for example, there's this remarkable story of a village called Nagoro.
   It's literally just a, you know, 20-something people, a couple dozen people.
   And what they've done, they've made human-sized dolls to replace people and just put them around the village in schools and bus stops in different areas.
   And while on the face of it, it's a cute and innovative idea, it's actually quite unsettling because you can see that it's literally running out of people.
   The majority of the abandoned homes are in villages.
   However, there are actually more abandoned homes in cities here in Tokyo even, more than I imagined and I've been taken to a couple of them.
   Do the Japanese have a word for these abandoned homes, Shaimaa?
   Yes, Akiyas.
   It's called Akiya.
   Essentially, it means empty home, but right now it's used interchangeably with abandoned homes as well, homes that have been empty for many, many years.
   How did it get to this point?
   Why are there so many?
   If you're sitting anywhere in the world right now where there is a housing problem where young people are finding it very, very difficult to get on the property market, to actually think there's a place in the world where there are nine million homes that are empty, ready for someone to occupy them, it's quite, I still try to get my head around it, but essentially it's an aging population, It's a shrinking population.
   More people are dying than there are people being born here.
   Combine that with people leaving villages and coming to the city, so the urbanisation, and you get those villages of people dying out, of homes that are not worth much, that are just left abandoned.
   So for these Akiyas, it's not so much a problem of too many houses, it's a problem of not enough people.
   But Japan's not the only country experiencing this Shaimaa.
   What about South Korea?
   I mean, there are neighbouring countries with low birth rates as well.
   Why are the Akiyas a big issue in Japan?
   I think there are a couple of reasons.
   One is cultural.
   I think the majority of Japanese people tend to want to live in brand new homes.
   This is a country that has many, many earthquakes, you know, with different strengths.
   But let's just say there are homes that get affected by earthquakes or get destroyed by earthquakes.
   Instead of renovating, people would prefer to just build anew.
   So that's one thing.
   I think economically as well, there is a depreciation in the value of homes, unlike the West and unlike anywhere else in the world, actually.
   And so you have this picture in Japan where homes are not worth much, people who live in them and then die, and they leave them to family members, and everything about that house then is more costly than it is profitable because it costs money to empty it, putting it on the market, trying to sell it, all the paperwork that comes with that, it just becomes not worth it for family members.
   So it becomes cheaper for people just to leave them abandoned, and that's why you get that large number.
   And presumably, Shaimaa, if you're leaving your home to the next generation, and there isn't anyone to leave it to, there's no heirs, what do you do with it?
   This is a country that suffers, or that is suffering with a phenomenon of 'lonely deaths', of people who die alone and then they don't have family members, so people don't claim their remains for example.
   So they don't claim their remains, they're not going to claim their homes.
   So it's almost like the homes die when the people die.
   It must have been interesting as well just the whole culture of older homes Shaimaa, living in London everyone wants to live in an historic property and yet in Japan it's the exact opposite?
   Yeah it's a completely different culture, it's a completely different ballgame.
   The fact that a value of a home is how new it is, how structurally robust it is and that comes from newer homes and so yeah the concept of older homes here is not as valued or is not as romanticised, if you will, as it is in the West.
   One thing that is the same all over the world, the West, and it sounds like Japan, too, is that young people don't want to go and live in the country.
   That is very, very true.
   And I think that's one thing that you see more acutely here in Japan, in rural areas is that when you go, you can see them shrinking.
   I think the concept on its own of an empty home seems benign, but actually it's not because if you're a village that's emptying out, it's almost like you're going extinct because it becomes a ghost town and it becomes more off-putting the emptier it is and it becomes less of a good option for a young family to go live in an area that's emptying out.
   Why do the local councils not just knock these homes down?
   When you knock them down, you need permissions from family members and from those who inherit.
   I think this is where it gets complicated because the homes themselves are not valuable.
   The land is valuable.
   But who gets the land?
   How do you track people down, for example?
   Because again, if people die and leave a home, you need to track those family members down.
   And if they haven't followed up and if they're hard to find because, for example, they're not in Japan or they live in Tokyo somewhere and not in the village, that becomes a very difficult proposition.
   But also, what do you do with the land?
   Who gets rights to the land?
   So as long as they're homes, it's almost like it's a contained problem, when they become land that becomes a different problem.
   Any conversation about Japan, it doesn't matter how short or long, earthquakes come up.
   It's come up a few times already in our conversation, Shaimaa.
   But given how earthquake-prone Japan is, empty houses sitting there surely also present some kind of hazard.
   Is that an issue?
   Yes.
   I've seen that firsthand.
   You know, in the new year, when an earthquake happened in the Noto Peninsula, when you go there and you see the smaller villages, and you see older houses that have either been completely destroyed or they've been affected and they're kind of like leaning on their side waiting to be destroyed or waiting to completely collapse, that is actually dangerous for the houses next to them and the houses on the other side of the road.
   And I've seen that in many of the streets where people have trouble getting into their own home, not because the home itself has been affected, but because these older houses are in danger of collapsing.
   So you're absolutely right.
   These empty homes in a country that is so earthquake prone become a problem for the neighbours and the neighbourhoods they're in.
   Shaimaa you've already mentioned there is a housing crisis around the world.
   Young people as well find it really difficult, I think, here in the UK to get on the housing ladder and to buy a home.
   Are there foreigners sitting here looking at the real estate pages in Japan going, here is a massive opportunity for me to go and get an affordable home somewhere beautiful?
   Yeah, I think many foreigners are waking up to the fact that this is an opportunity.
   I've spoken to a couple of people, for example, one of them, who is now a TikTok phenomenon.
   His name is Anton Wormann.
   He is from Sweden, from Stockholm.
   He is a model who's now turned renovator, and he went viral, because essentially what he did is he bought an Akiya, and he chronicled his journey into this fixer-upper in the middle of Tokyo.
   Wow.
   Welcome, welcome.
   So I spent about a year into making this house beautiful again.
   I was just going to say it doesn't look abandoned to me.
   No, it's not abandoned.
   It was abandoned for about 10 years.
   Oh, okay.
   And when I got the keys to this house, it was things literally everywhere.
   Japan has a scarcity of space and just getting rid of things, getting rid of trash getting rid of debris costs a lot of money and also a lot of time.
   So the houses just gets abandoned that way.
   I have to say this combines two of my guilty pleasures.
   Not only do I love like you Shaimaa home renovation shows, I love shows about buying a property abroad, somewhere in the sun or somewhere different.
   So it's the combination of these two things.
   But for these people, is it about gaining followers or are they really trying to say this is an affordable, good option for you?
   I don't know.
   I think it's a combination of both.
   I think it taps into something that just translates and transcends everywhere in the world.
   I think no matter where you are, the idea of owning a home, the idea of turning it from something that's derelict and old and abandoned to something beautiful and liveable.
   You know, it just appeals to so many people.
   Tourism is doing really well in Japan.
   Lots of people are now going not just to Tokyo, but to all over the country.
   So surely these Akiyas would be great to be used as guest houses or cafes?
   Yes, and this is what Anton is doing.
   In fact, he liked it so much.
   He started his second Akiya project.
   He showed it to me.
   And it was really interesting to into his second home because you see it from the beginning when they were laying down concrete slabs, they're making sure it's earthquake safe and it is a lot of work because you see for example that there are so many things that were left by the previous owner that he had to that he had to let go of, deciding what to do, deciding what to throw away, what to keep.
   But essentially his first property, he now rents it out for visitors, rents it out short term, when his family comes to visit.
   And so it is a lucrative business opportunity for people who are willing to put in the work.
   And as you say, I think tourism has picked up quite a bit.
   This year was phenomenal in the number of tourists that have come to Japan.
   I think in one month, there were about 3 million, if not more.
   Just the fact that technology and translation apps is a lot more advanced.
   Japan has become much more accessible, not just the big touristy areas, but you can go into these nooks and crannies of some villages and explore because you can get access to them.
   So if Akiyas then turn out to be this new phenomenon where more tourists are coming in, more people are investing in these empty homes, That's actually a win-win situation because all of these villages, all of the local governments, would then say, look, well, this could be a new lease of life for those villages.
   So Shaimaa, what are the foreigners doing once they've renovated, bought and renovated the Akiya?
   Are they staying put and living there or using them to set up a business?
   Some of the foreigners who are coming, they're coming because they want to have a foot in Japan.
   So, for example, they live in America, they live in the UK, they live anywhere in Europe, and this is an affordable option for them to come and have a holiday home, you know, in the mountains or by the beach in Japan.
   But, for example, I've met a couple.
   The husband is from the UK originally.
   The wife is Japanese, and they've just had a baby boy.
   His name is Sam.
   Her name is Nanami and their baby boy is baby Aiden.
   And Sam's been living in Japan for about seven years, I think, or even more.
   And, you know, Nanami is from Tokyo.
   And they've decided that they just wanted more for their money.
   So what was interesting about their case and their journey is that they almost paid the same amount of money Anton paid for his home.
   I think they paid $100,000, but their country home is a lot bigger.
   And when I asked Sam why he did it, he said, it's just bulks more that I can get for this kind of money in the UK.
   It's a huge house with a land and a big garden overlooking the mountains.
   It's just beautiful and they just wouldn't get that anywhere else in the world, especially in Europe and especially in the UK.
   And so this was about a lifestyle choice.
   I definitely think if we had done a new build, that would have been a lot easier and straightforward, probably affordable and quicker.
   But it's such a beautiful house and you just kind of think like It's nice to preserve that and to, you know, extend its life.
   Shaimaa, what do the Japanese think about foreigners coming in and buying up these Akiyas?
   So far, I don't think that we've seen any negative reaction because remember, the foreigners who come here are not tapping into something that the Japanese want or that the Japanese have expressed interest in.
   This is very much still a novel phenomena.
   This is something that foreigners have caught on to because, again, of the housing crisis, because of the idea that these homes could be renovated because they come from renovation culture.
   Everything that we're talking about, though, in the grand scheme of things, it probably barely makes a dent, Shaimaa.
   So does the Government actually have a plan to deal with the Akiyas?
   Yeah, I mean, so far, we're talking about hundreds of people that are interested in these Akiyas, a few hundred that take them on and actually buy these Akiyas and transform them and renovate them.
   With government statistics by the year 2038, if I'm not mistaken, one in every three homes in Japan is going to be abandoned.
   That is a huge number, and I think they're trying to tackle it in different ways.
   There are local governments, local municipalities or local governments in these villages that are trying to give away these homes for free, just to say, come, find something to do with this house, make it a cafe, make it a business, come and live in it, but just, in a way, just breathe life into this village.
   But it's a huge problem and again, it comes back to the core of Japan's population crisis.
   The Government has been trying many things.
   The Government has been trying to tackle the population crisis for a long, long time now.
   And I think you have to deal with the core of it, which is that you need more people in this country to occupy these homes.
   But these existing empty homes also need to be either reused, renovated, or just have people in them to give them a new lease of life.
   And it's not just about the physical homes, it's about how do you make those homes lucrative?
   How do you make those homes liveable?
   And a lot of that has to do with, do you have schools around you for your kids?
   Do you have hospitals, et cetera?
   And so It's a whole infrastructure system that needs to happen around these homes.
   Shaimaa, the Prime Minister, Fumio Kishida, has actually said, and it was such a dramatic statement, that Japan is on the brink of no longer even being able to function as a society because of this massive demographic problem that you've described to us.
   What's his way out of it?
   It was very unusual for him to sound so alarmed when he's actually alarmed.
   They're trying to come up with ways and incentives for families to move to outside of the cities and into some places in the countryside.
   They're trying financial incentives and financial aid to families with more children.
   It's about trying to shift the culture so that more people are getting married, more people are having babies in your own country, but also welcoming more people into your own country so that more people than occupy all of these empty spaces that you have.
   These houses, these Aykias though, Shaimaa, they tell a much richer, bigger story about what is happening in the country.
   These Akiyas essentially tell the story of Japan at this very moment, the crisis that Japan is facing, the fact that this is a country that's facing a shrinking, aging population, essentially a population crisis.
   Essentially people die, yhey leave behind homes that don't hold much value, that no one wants.
   And essentially what they tell you is that this is a country that's emptying out and that is trying to find a solution to give itself, to give society and to give these homes a new lease of life.
   Arigato gozaimasu Shaimaa.
   Arigato gozaimasu.
   Thank you, Shaima.
   Thanks, Lucy.
   It's such a pleasure.
   Lovely to talk to you.
   And thank you so much for watching.
   If you want more episodes of The Global Story, you can find us wherever you get your podcasts.
   You can also subscribe, and don't forget to leave your comments about today's program in the section below.
   Thanks for watching.



3. Which country has the best education in the world? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
   https://youtu.be/liyn5xWvx44?si=kJRz1xsy-k_Et8EU
    (54) Which country has the best education in the world? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=liyn5xWvx44
    
    Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings.
   From the BBC World Service, This is The Global Story.
   A good education can make us richer, healthier and help us to thrive.
   And governments around the world compete in global rankings to see which nation is deemed to have the best school system in the world.
   Asian schools often get the best results, with some Nordic countries also highly praised.
   But in many parts of the world, there are often huge barriers to getting children into the classroom at all.
   It's cruel not to open schools for girls.
   We have as much right to learn as boys do.
   It would be cruel of the Taliban not to allow us to return to our schools.
   So what does the best school system in the world look like, and which country educates its children the best?
   With me today in the Global Story studio is Sean Coughlan, some of you will have heard Sean and I talking already on The Global Story about the UK Royal Family as he's one of our royal correspondents.
   But before that, Sean, for many years you were one of our education correspondents and you led BBC News coverage of what we're going to talk about today, which is global education.
   So welcome.
   Thank you.
   Good to see you again.
   Also joining us today is John Jerrim, who is a professor at the University of College London's Institute of Education. 1 
   And John has dug deep into the global data about different education systems around the world and is here to reveal all.
   Hi, John.
   Hi.
   Thanks a lot for inviting me.
   So we want to talk about what which country has the best education system in the world, if we can say that.
   But what evidence are there?
   What measures are there, Sean, to judge that?
   Well, I suppose the most commonly used measure would be what's known as the Pisa tests.
   And these are tests taken by children at the age of 15, in a number of countries around the world, not all the countries, about 80 in the last round and since the year 2000, results have been published, ranking education systems in terms of their level of achievement and the tests are in key areas of reading, maths and science. 2 
   Um, when they when they were introduced.
   First of all, that was a very contentious idea because people said, how can you possibly compare big countries?
   How how can you compare America to Luxembourg or to, you know, or to parts of China or whatever?
   And people would say they're very different systems, different cultures, um, different levels of income.
   But the people who introduced these tests weren't from education.
   They were from an economics background.
   It was the OECD, the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development. 2 
   And they approached education the way they might look at GDP or look at measuring inflation.
   And it was a very different way of looking at it.
   And they got people to take these tests, often against a great deal of local resistance, and then compared them.
   And they have produced for the last couple of decades, this huge amount of data that allows people in one country to look at how they compare to others.
   And I suppose their big finding often is that what we think of as being our education system isn't inevitable.
   You can do well or you can do badly.
   Some people do better at different things.
   Girls and boys might do differently, different groups.
   And I think this has just cast a big light by not letting education systems just look internally, but also to look at other comparisons.
   So, John, which countries do do well in these Pisa tests?
   So the ones that perform consistently well over time and across those different studies are the East Asian countries.
   So typical examples include, uh, South Korea, Singapore, Hong Kong.
   They always consistently do well.
   There's some that do particularly well in Pisa, on top of that.
   Finland was, you know, a hot topic for a long time, although its performance has declined recently.
   Um, Estonia is a country that does very well now in Pisa and Canada to some extent also. 3 
   And the countries that don't do so well, Sean?
   Well, they tend to be countries which I suppose our poorer countries, um, you find in, in terms of countries that participate maybe in parts of South America, Central America, some of the Arab world too.
   Countries in sub-Saharan Africa don't take part.
   And quite a lot of Asian countries don't take part either.
   So it's a partial test.
   But perhaps what's interesting about doing badly is that often big European countries France, Germany, Italy, Spain, and to an extent, the education systems within the UK aren't that brilliant, really.
   and as John suggested, the interesting bit is they have a lot of history, a lot of money, a lot of development behind them.
   But they're being outpaced and outperformed by these fast upcoming countries, you know, Singapore or Estonia or, um, Taiwan or those sort of places which, which we don't historically think of as being economic rivals.
   But I suppose the argument for the Pisa tests is if you want to have a knowledge economy, an economy based on skills, this is how you measure it.
   And those other countries are outpacing us at the moment.
   So I think that's the interesting comparison.
   That raises the issue, though, and I've done interviews around Pisa and these tests for years about what a good education actually is, John, because there'll be those that say that, you know, how do you measure that?
   How do you actually define what a good education is?
   When you think about some of these East Asian countries and what the students go through, how hard they have to work, how stressed they are.
   Is that really part of a good, well rounded, holistic education?
   Yeah.
   So as Sean was saying, they've really focused on the academic side in their kind of history, maths, reading and science.
   But you're right, kind of a good education is a much broader thing.
   And we as parents or whatever kind of want a lot more for our children than just to be good at those academic kind of side of things.
   And in fairness, the OECD in recent years have tried to move the dial a little bit and measure more of these kind of softer skills.
   So in the latest round of Pisa, they tried to introduce a creativity test.
   Um, how well that worked or not, uh, I think is open to debate, but they are kind of live to that issue.
   And as part of Pisa, they do kind of conduct this big questionnaire exercise as well, where they capture things like kids' wellbeing and how confident they are. 4 
   So that does become part of it.
   But it doesn't often kind of, um, become the headline.
   Sean, some countries take these Pisa rankings incredibly seriously.
   Why?
   And how do they think that a better education system is going to affect even the economic outcomes of the country that, you know, they're running?
   Well, I suppose there are two ends of that scale, the countries who might think they're doing well and then get a bit of a shock.
   I mean, in Germany, people talk about Pisa shock in Germany, because they thought they were very good, but there was also an element of complacency, and they got the Pisa results first time around and realised that in fact, they were pretty awful.
   And that turned into quite a political scandal.
   'Our scores aren't as good as we thought they were, what are we going to do with ourselves?'
   The other end of the spectrum, there are countries who see education as their way out, as some individuals always have in their lives.
   John mentioned Singapore in the 1960s. 5 
   Singapore would have been one of the poorest countries in the world, it would have been a country with very low levels of literacy, and it deliberately invested in education to make itself a high skills, high income country.
   Our main responsibility is to nurture the students in such a way that they will be ready for the future to become productive citizens of tomorrow.
   And we all know that, uh, the future is going to become more complex, much more uncertain, much more unpredictable, much more ambiguous.
   I suppose it's back to the idea that economists might say, if you want to see the economy of the future, look at the classrooms of today.
   And it's a massive economic driver.
   And if you look at the sort of jobs which now are in demand and the jobs which are well-paid, and where economies want to place themselves in the economic food chain, education, and education skills more broadly, are absolutely central to that, and that's a long-term game.
   But countries which have chosen to invest in education and skills, who consciously decided to make this a priority, will see the economic reward.
   So let's look then at what works, because we've looked at which countries are considered to have successful education systems.
   But I think we all want to know why.
   Why?
   Sean, does Singapore have something in common with Estonia?
   I mean, does it?
   These high achieving countries, what do they have in common?
   Well, a long time ago, I remember trying to do an identikit picture of what a successful Pisa country would look like.
   Um, and there are sort of philosophical questions about equality.
   Countries which make sure that all their pupils get through a certain level of education to a certain standard, regardless of their background, do well.
   If you are teaching them by different level or abilities, then you are segregating them.
   And and we don't want to segregate any people in the world.
   Why are we doing that in the schools?
   That's my personal opinion.
   This is one of the main things why Estonia is successful.
   Shanghai used to be the model that was talked about a great deal, because there was an assumption there that no matter if children came from a very deprived background, they would still get to a certain level of education.
   And their education system was based around that.
   Um, teachers were expected to make sure their pupils got there.
   But I think there are other cultural factors, possibly.
   It's interesting.
   It was a very striking how many of the top Pisa performers are small and fairly new nation states, younger states, ambitious, wanting to define themselves.
   Often countries which live near very big neighbours.
   Estonia is near Russia. 6 
   You know, Canada's near the USA.
   Singapore has lots of bigger geographical neighbours around it too.
   Or Taiwan is near to China.
   The superstars at Pisa are often small, quite cohesive countries who have set themselves a target of getting better, often places without any great natural resource.
   They don't have oil, they don't have big populations.
   They have to focus on something like this.
   And I think that is the characteristic of a top Pisa star.
   John, what about the age in which children start school?
   I remember sending my summer-born little four-year-old off to school in his uniform and thinking how tiny he was, and that if he was in Finland, it would be another three years before he started school.
   I also have a summer born four-year-old who's just started school, so that's a very kind of poignant question to me.
   Um, I don't think there's any good international evidence on the best time that children start school.
   I don't think that it's clear-cut that it's better to start them earlier versus later, at least coming from the international kind of assessment data.
   What I would say is, you know, there is a bit of a blurred line between school and earlier education as well.
   So there's often a fixation on, you know, we start school at this age, but I know I sent my four-year-old to nursery beforehand, and he was definitely doing some education stuff in the year beforehand.
   In countries where children don't formally start school until age seven, it's not that they're not doing anything beforehand, right, a lot of them.
   A lot of them will be kind of doing different types of earlier types of education.
   It's taken us this long to get to one of the most important things that happens in a classroom, and that is the actual teaching and the teacher, John.
   How much does teacher quality or the funding of teachers play a role in these countries that do well?
   Yeah, well, we know from the international evidence teacher quality matters.
   It matters a lot.
   You know, if you are fortunate enough to have a very good teacher, you can make kind of up to three or four months extra learning gains over the course of an academic year, compared to if you have one of the kind of, um, lowest quality teachers or whatever in the class.
   So it is a big, big driving factor.
   How much it explains international differences you can't quite put a figure on.
   I have a feeling that it's part of the mix that goes into why some of these countries do better than worse, but it's probably not the major component for a lot of them.
   So I think it plays some role, but not kind of like the key ingredient by itself, as it were.
   Sean, when we've been talking about the Pisa rankings, you haven't actually mentioned the UK and the US, I don't think.
   But some of our listeners in those two countries that are listening will probably be surprised to see how far down the rankings the UK and the US are.
   Why is that?
   Well, I think in the case of the United States, the big issue there is the massive divide both in wealth, in, uh, in geography and also, uh, fairness, I suppose, equity.
   If America was taken...
   America's overall result, the United States result, is quite mediocre.
   But if you take some of the individual states, like Massachusetts, had it entered on its own as a separate country, would do incredibly well, be right at the top.
   Some of the southern states, I think I remember people talk about Mississippi before, and a few other southern states, do really badly.
   They would be, uh, not of the Western world if their results were put with other countries.
   And so what you get up is an average and you get into another question.
   And so the average is rather middling is the overall result.
   You also get into that sort of bigger question then about fairness overall because America has lots of elite universities, has lots of elite schools too.
   They might say their system works.
   The money, the funding, everything goes into an elite system, but doesn't serve very many people who are struggling in other schools.
   And I suppose that's the sort of question that's highlighted by the international comparison.
   The UN estimates that 224 million children need educational support, and that includes more than 72 million who can't attend school at all because of war or conflict in their country.
   There are also other barriers too, such as living a very long distance from school, what's happening with our climate, and poverty.
   Sean, if we look at war, it's obviously a massive factor that can stop children attending school.
   And we can see this happening in Gaza at the moment, in Sudan and Ukraine as well.
   Just take us through what the impact is on a child if they can't get access to education.
   Well, I always think this is a scandal, that it's not even a bigger scandal because, as you're saying, tens of millions of children never even get to go to any kind of education.
   And it's not just about learning to read and write.
   It's what happens beyond that point.
   You know, if you imagine trying to navigate a modern world without basic literacy skills, trying to navigate a digital world increasingly, no matter where you are, and that's kind of implications for your own wealth, your own family's wealth, um, also your health, your chances of being caught up in conflicts, being influenced by extremism and all kinds of bad things, criminality, all those are linked to a lack of education.
   And I think it's a pernicious thing we've allowed.
   It's extraordinary.
   Here we are in 2024, and there are still tens of millions of children who don't even get to start education.
   And it's not just war, it's corruption.
   It's bad management.
   It's teachers not being paid.
   Um, I remember going to schools in Africa where there were empty classrooms and you'd say, well, why isn't anyone going to school?
   Teachers weren't getting paid.
   They got other jobs as taxi drivers.
   And and it was awful.
   And you think there still goes on and it shouldn't be the case.
   It should be something that we're reading about in history books.
   And also particularly there's been a lot of work on girls missing out on education has an impact on their families as well.
   Um, if children, if girls leave school early to get married too young, perhaps, they condemn their own families to poverty.
   You don't learn the skills you need.
   You don't get the chances you need.
   It's the most extraordinary unfairness.
   And it's odd that we're allowing it to happen even now.
   I have to fetch water from the trading centre and bring it to the mining site so that we can pan for gold.
   I want to go back to school.
   And, Sean, I think we should take a moment to address what's happening in Afghanistan.
   There is still this massive global education campaign to let girls learn.
   But when the Taliban took over, it's become the only country in the world that does not allow girls and women to attend schools and universities.
   So if you're over 12 and you're a girl in Afghanistan, you can't go to school.
   It's cruel not to open schools for girls.
   We have as much right to learn as boys do.
   It would be cruel of the Taliban not to allow us to return to our schools.
   John, we've been reflecting on how difficult it is for girls and young women in some countries to access education.
   They're even denied it in Afghanistan.
   And there's clear discrimination that obviously takes place in some countries.
   But in terms of OECD countries, isn't it the case that girls are outperforming boys?
   That's certainly true in some specific subjects.
   So the clearest example is reading.
   So there's the Pisa assessment of 15-year-olds in reading.
   And there's another assessment called Pals which is ten-year-olds' reading.
   And in both of those you do very clearly see a gender gap where girls always outperform boys.
   It holds true across pretty much every country in the world, and it holds true over time.
   And we have data from England and the United States where children take very early kind of literacy and verbal tests, you know, age 3A5.
   And you can see even very early on in kind of, um, children's lives.
   So it's very clear in terms of reading, in terms of other subjects, it's a bit more nuanced.
   So mathematics, um, it's a lot more kind of even.
   In some countries there's definitely kind of still an advantage to boys.
   So it does vary across the different subjects.
   And Sean, how much do you think an education system can actually change?
   Are other countries looking at Singapore or Estonia or some of these high-performing countries and saying, we need to be more like this and then they can make it happen.
   I think they can change.
   I think you often get into that thing about people say, oh, so-and-so has got a great culture of education, the country, as if it were some sort of act of God that that some countries do well and some other countries do badly.
   But I think the interesting thing about the Pisa tests is they actually show that things can change.
   Things aren't inevitable.
   Um, some countries can show that children from very deprived backgrounds can do very well.
   And that raises the question, well, why can't that happen elsewhere?
   And John, what about the way that kids are taught?
   Is there a magic formula there now that we know that works?
   No, is the short answer there, putting it bluntly.
   You know, teasing out, I think, as Sean said very nicely, the very specific factor that's driving these country-level differences is really, really tricky.
   So people will often want to point to a teaching method or a thing or a policy and try to export it from one country to another.
   It doesn't really work like that, and it's not that simple.
   Anecdotally, I live in a part of London which the schools are considered low decile, so there's a lot of kids from poorer backgrounds in those schools.
   And the schools were underperforming for years.
   Then the government came in and spent a lot of money in our borough on schools.
   And it might not come as any surprise, Sean, that it worked.
   Standards went up.
   Is there just not a fundamental here, that in order for kids to get the best education, quite a lot of money needs to be spent?
   It does come down to money and resourcing.
   I think money is vital as a starting point, but it is also how you spend it and there is a basic level of funding.
   You need the right number of teachers, you need the right equipment, you need to be warm, you need to make sure the children are well fed and comfortable and able to learn.
   And they're well supported in that sense.
   But then it's often that I suppose you look to the evidence again.
   I remember, for a while, class size was the big thing.
   Let's cut down class sizes.
   The Pisa test suggests that that has, beyond a certain point, not that much of an impact, really, because often some of the most successful countries in East Asia had huge classes, didn't seem to trouble them, and other factors must have been going on.
   So I think, yes, certainly, you can't shirk responsibility for funding schools properly, allowing people from all backgrounds to have a fair chance and support them.
   But I do think often what this raises is how much this is a choice.
   You can choose to spend on education or choose not to.
   You can choose by policy to ensure that people from, no matter where their starting point is, get a fair chance to catch up.
   They might not catch up right all the way, but you can, you can decide whether or not you're going to have an education system that is based around getting as many people as possible to do well.
   Or historically, I think, one of the weaknesses of the education system in England was that there's a great resistance to the idea that everyone could do well if you had a test in our culture in Britain that said, here's a test and everyone's going to pass it.
   People would think...
   People would be outraged.
   They'd say, this is a rubbishy test because it's not, you know, because we build our systems based on a sort of filtering, sorting mechanism.
   I know Shanghai was hailed for a while as being a great example.
   And there they had a policy of expecting children, regardless of their background, regardless of the deprivation of reaching a certain level of education.
   The sort of education system you end up with isn't an act of nature.
   There's a series of things.
   There may be, it suits the people who run places.
   It might be how they like it.
   But I think they're not accidents.
   They are products of how we run our society and they can be changed.
   John, thank you so much for being with us.
   No thank you.
   Enjoyed it.
   Sean, lovely to have you here.
   Pleasure.
   If you want more episodes of The Global Story, you can find us wherever you get your podcasts.
   Each day we dive deep into a single story, bringing you in-depth analysis of world events.
   Don't forget to subscribe as well so you never miss an episode.
   Thanks so much for watching!
   Goodbye.


4. How Gen Z and TikTok are changing the way we speak - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
   https://youtube.com/watch?v=p-N3-Q8WyfU&si=ekb_fDrW81K6URY7
    How Gen Z and TikTok are changing the way we speak - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p-N3-Q8WyfU
    
    Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings.
   From the BBC World Service, this is The Global Story.
   For many thousands of years, language has been changing.
   Here in the UK, the gradual departure from what became known as the Queen's English is a trend which has often been characterised as a threat to cultural identity.
   But with the advent of social media, the pace of change may be running away from us.
   Phrases like "it's giving", "rizz", "no cap", these are all terms which we attribute to internet culture and specifically to younger, millennial and gen Z demographics.
   Today we're considering how the mass migration to living our lives online is having an impact on the spoken word in the real world.
   It's even made its mark on the Oxford English Dictionary.
   Well, with me here in the studio today is former BBC journalist, author and linguist Sophia Smith Galer and Neil Edgeller, who is from BBC Learning English.
   Sophia, Neil, lovely to have you with us on the pod.
   Hi.
   Hi.
   Hello, Lucy.
   Neil, last night I sat with my teenage kids as I now know you did as well and said, "I'm discussing language tomorrow.
   Things have changed.
   I'm hearing these words from you all the time.
   Can we talk about it?"
   And they were straight away like, "Mum, don't do it.
   Don't use the words.
   Don't embarrass yourself.
   You will never come back from this at all.
   You know, like this is just steer clear, play it straight".
   What did you say to your teenage kids?
   Pretty much exactly the same conversation.
   I've become aware of this whole range of vocabulary used by this generation that seems completely and utterly exclusive and they find it funny when I try and use those expressions because I use them badly.
   I mean you're such a boomer, if you basically you start using these words you're tainted and it's a no-go.
   And Sophia you don't have kids but I mean you're so aware of how language is changing.
   And you're even writing a book at the moment about linguicide.
   What actually is linguicide?
   So linguicide is the phenomenon of a language disappearing and perhaps even dying or becoming extinct.
   And this is happening around the world at an alarming rate.
   So a language disappearing because it's been criminalised, war, genocide, other obvious examples.
   But linguicide equally can be more covert.
   So linguists also described a language becoming associated with shame and speakers being so ashamed of speaking that language, they begin to speak another.
   And tell us about your job, Neil.
   You're creating content to help people learn English.
   We make videos and podcasts and web pages to help learners of English around the world, whatever level they are, to teach them English, but also to help them to enjoy themselves in English.
   Well, language is obviously the social tool that we all use to communicate.
   But as we've already discussed, it's so different depending on the generation that's talking and we alter our language depending on who we're talking to.
   When it comes to our kids and what we're seeing particularly with the younger generations, Neil, what sort of words are you seeing emerge at the moment?
   Now we're gonna mention some of the words that we're not supposed to mention.
   Okay, I'm gonna let you do it.
   So I think of all of the things I've heard recently, the most fascinating is this word, skibidi.
   That was the first one that came up at my dinner table as well.
   Can you use it in a sentence?
   Well, I don't think I can effectively.
   I can try and I get laughed at.
   But it's very, very fluid grammatically.
   So for example, I have heard the expression, the skibidi rizzler.
   Rizzler is connected to this word rizz, which we may come on to talk about as well.
   But skibidi seems to be able to be thrown in almost anywhere.
   And nobody, including my kids, can tell me what it really means.
   I think that's part of the whole sort of exclusivity of each generation's use of language.
   To the point about exclusivity and saying, "Mum, please don't say this word."
   We should think of language speaking also as identity making.
   So if you are in a subgroup and you use particular phrases to signify 'I am part of this group', the minute you start hearing these phrases adopted outside of the group, it's not the in-group language anymore.
   So it stops being the in-group language of teenagers, for example, because mum's using it.
   And then they'll just start using another one.
   But Sophia, what Neil and I are finding challenging is this is changing so quickly all the time.
   Neil's already mentioned rizz.
   I remember doing quite a kind of academic interview around the word rizz when it was the Oxford word of the year.
   The Oxford word of the year has been revealed and this year it's rizz.
   Now, if you've no idea what that means, don't worry, you might just be over 30.
   I'm lucky I've got teenagers, I know this one.
   The kids are not using rizz anymore.
   They might use it in a slightly patronising ironic way.
   But Neil's now saying they're using rizzler.
   What's rizzler?
   A rizzler is a person who has rizz.
   Duh.
   See?
   I'm getting myself into all sorts of trouble here and all sorts of traps.
   But it is so, it's evolving so quickly.
   It's evolving really quickly.
   And if you think about in the past how languages developed and changed.
   A language will always change because our needs as people change and different and new things happen.
   And in the past, you may have lived in a remote village and the only language contact or contact you had with any kind of linguistic innovation would have been some trader rolling into town and then moving forward or maybe perhaps you would move.
   Today, if you're consuming mass media in social media, you're actually seeing a very diverse array of different voices from around the world.
   I can be speaking to my nephews at home in New Zealand, a world away, it seems to me, and yet they're using the same words as my teenage kids here in London.
   That wasn't the case when we were younger.
   No, it wasn't.
   And that's part of this homogenisation that social media brings, that the kids are using the same slang globally.
   When I was at school, the words that we would use to describe a really bright person or a less bright person might be different from the words used by someone who was brought up in a different part of the same country.
   Neil is it just video-based social media or is there influence here around text sites and micro blogging and things as well?
   Absolutely yes and a lot of the new vocabulary that we've seen emerging over the last few years comes from blogging and from online communities communicating through text.
   People are walking around and saying LOL and FOMO and YOLO to each other.
   That's an interesting development.
   And we're saying LOL.
   We're not saying L-O-L.
   We're not saying F-O-M-O.
   We've adopted them into the sort of existing lexical structure that we have so that they sound like normal words.
   And that didn't take long?
   Didn't take long at all, no.
   And with some of these words, the skibidi, the rizz, rizzler, no cap.
   Where do they come from?
   Is it just, is it from different cultural groups?
   Is it from different sectors of society?
   Where are they actually emerging from?
   A lot of the words are being innovated within in-groups and then they get introduced to the mainstream.
   We're seeing a lot of vocabulary coming from black and Latino LGBT culture in the US.
   We're seeing loads of expressions coming from that, like "it's giving", "slay", all come from those spaces.
   We're also seeing language emerging from what actually were incel subculture words from even the 2000s.
   Some of these expressions don't even come from the 2010s.
   They're a little older than we think.
   When it comes to social media and language change, we think a term is new, but in reality, it's likely been in circulation for some time before a sort of more influential person perhaps uses the term and then we see the words leave these peripheries and leave these subgroups they become mainstream and it's these words that then become more widely adopted.
   And Neil do you think it's also like with our kids and I'm trying to think back to when I was young as well it's a bit of an act of rebellion?
   Yeah absolutely yes and I think the interesting thing about the language change we're seeing at the moment is just the pace in comparison to pre-internet discourse.
   You know, the words are there all around the world immediately.
   Some get picked up, some don't.
   And that happened before, but it was just much slower.
   I mean, we need to cast our mind back before 1989, the World Wide Web.
   What was happening with language before then.
   Well, I remember when I was at school.
   Back in the day.
   The reinvention of the word wicked, meaning great or cool or whatever.
   I think I am just by about a year too old to use that and feel comfortable using it, even though it's been in circulation for about 30 years now.
   So these words have always come about and been reinvented, this, what they call semantic shift, where a word has an original meaning and then suddenly has a new meaning.
   And it's all tied up with the exclusivity and stuff.
   But it's the pace with which it happens these days, which is really astounding.
   Sophia, you speak many languages.
   A couple.
   Italian, Arabic.
   I studied Spanish and Arabic at university and my family speaks Italian.
   I grew up hearing it but not speaking it.
   So what about these other languages in the world?
   Is it the same?
   I mean, are they experiencing the same kind of changes in these words that we are seeing in English?
   Oh, certainly.
   All languages are experiencing the phenomena we've described, such as linguistic innovation and adopting new words.
   The obvious difference that we may observe in other languages is the influence of English and the fact that English as a language, it holds prestige in so many global domains.
   And there are moves right around the world to try and protect language.
   I mean, I spend some time in French speaking Canada and there's real moves to sort of stop the creep of English into French that spoke in there.
   Giorgia Meloni, the leader in Italy right now, very protective of the Italian language.
   Countries have different attitudes towards how much they try and control linguistic change, which defies control.
   Languages are, even speaking to linguicide that I'm writing about, the idea that a language can die must therefore mean a language can live.
   So as living things, they're really difficult to control.
   And if you say to people, you can't use this word that we're now hearing lots of people say you must use the French version.
   It's kind of coming a little bit too late because the French version didn't immediately dominate or resonate with speakers.
   So it can actually be quite challenging.
   You're trying to reverse time almost in something like that.
   Neil, I wonder if words as well and phrases that we use can sometimes just be fashionable.
   I mean, I'm not talking about rizz, only lasting 18 months or whatever, but other words and phrases that grab hold and are trendy but then kind of die away again, almost like fashion or clothing or music.
   Yeah, I think that's right.
   You can look at expressions which are used by many people over a short period of time that then kind of vanish.
   So we have at BBC Learning English podcast called The English We Speak.
   We look at idiomatic expressions that are sort of trending at the time.
   A couple of years ago, we were talking about blended working, blended working, working at home and in the office.
   Yeah, I haven't heard that one for a while.
   People don't use it anymore.
   We all say hybrid working now.
   So yes, there is a fashion for these words, they come and go.
   And Sophia, you've not just been looking at how our vocabulary has changed, but it's the way we say things as well.
   And this notion of up-talk, particularly sort of rising at the end of a sentence.
   I'm from New Zealand.
   I mean, we all speak like that at home and in the antipodes.
   I also wondered if it's not just social media that's influencing the way that we speak.
   It's maybe years of everyone watching Neighbours.
   We have always used up-talk.
   I mean, it's most characteristic, I think, for asking questions.
   I just did it there, asking questions.
   That would be up-talk with this rising intonation at the end of the phrase.
   When it comes to social media and using up-talk, something that I've written about in the past is how asking is there a TikTok voice or accent, is there a way that I speak, that I adopt when I'm making a TikTok video.
   The idea is that when we make video content, we use a lot of rising intonation possibly to relate to our audience.
   It's more engaging.
   It's more engaging.
   Another theory is that I'm keeping you listening.
   The rising intonation suggests there's more to come.
   You're hooking people.
   Hooking people in.
   When it comes to social media video, if I can complete a video retaining someone's attention, it's more likely to perform better on the algorithm.
   So actually what's possibly happening is creators are furthering linguistic innovation based on algorithmic direction, which is fascinating.
   Neil, speaking of intonation, what about the change to pronunciation?
   Are we seeing some British words change and they're now said in a much more American way?
   There used to be a much greater distinction between the way Americans would say or pronounce a word and the way that British people would and now that's more fluid and we're not able to say with such certainty that that's American English and that's British English, so let's have an example of the word which I say as 'schedule'.
   Younger members of BBC Learning English say 'schedule', and 'schedule' is what we used to say was the American pronunciation.
   What about grammar then, Neil?
   Are we seeing those changes?
   They must surely be slower.
   Grammar really does change slowly.
   You can look at, for example, you could pick up a copy of Frankenstein, which was written 200 years ago and absolutely understand it completely.
   There's nothing in the grammatical structures which will confuse you.
   But something that has happened and has happened more quickly recently because probably of social media is something known as verbing which is turning nouns into verbs.
   I love doing this.
   And the most obvious one is Google to Google or to friend.
   We are podcasting.
   And so that is actually a grammatical change which we have seen accelerate recently.
   Sophia, is language change picking up momentum?
   Is it getting faster?
   As media will change, linguistic innovation will change.
   So it's already so hyperfast and powerful in the current vertical video climate that we're in and the amount of language we are exposed to.
   It's hard to imagine how that can get even sort of more hyperactive, but I'm quite confident it will.
   And Neil, in terms of your job, do you love all these changes to the language?
   Are you slightly horrified sometimes?
   I'm not horrified in the slightest.
   I know lots of people are, and they think that it's wrong and that mistakes are being made.
   But language is dynamic.
   No one here is sitting talking like Chaucer, You know, language changes and I think it's exciting and we need to embrace it and at BBC Learning English we try to describe language as it is rather than prescribe the way it ought to be.
   What about the future of language?
   If we could look ahead Sophia, what do you think's going to happen in the next 20, 30 years?
   I think a lot of the future is predictable in that when I am in my 40s, 50s, 60s, I'm probably going to start thinking why are my kids or the kids around me saying all these bizarre words that I've sort of never heard of.
   And what do you think, Neil, do you think the other thing that might happen is that we'll see some language sadly die out, some languages, because of the prevalence of English, the prevalence of what people are consuming online is going to really influence what's spoken in the home?
   Yeah, unfortunately, that is a reality.
   I mean, languages are dying all the time.
   And one of the features of language in the social media age is homogenisation.
   Linguicide is such an urgent and pressing issue because it's believed by the end of the century that we are in half of the world's languages will disappear.
   I have a positive story to tell from New Zealand about that, about how much more Māori is spoken in New Zealand than when I was young.
   And when we talk about how quickly things change, when I go back home, I can't believe how much more Māori has just spoken in everyday life, among people just casually, it's not a big thing at all.
   They are an example to the world.
   They are used all the time in language revitalisation work as examples of how a language that appears to be dying, becoming extinct, whatever phrase you prefer, can revitalise and acquire new speakers.
   I can't have any conversation about anything that looks at the future anymore without mentioning AI.
   Oh yeah.
   Is there an influence there as well?
   Is that going to change language?
   Interestingly AI is being used again if we look at linguicide and endangered languages.
   I've done reporting looking at how AI is helping people revive their languages or create resources very quickly that are able to support speakers who want to reclaim or revitalise a language but again we're seeing examples where perhaps the AI tools being made, especially out of endangered languages where accuracy is so important because there aren't lots of sources necessarily for them, and the AI hallucinating making up words or expressions or grammars for these languages we described as being of low resource, like there's not loads of training data to train in AI.
   I would say AI isn't all bad.
   It brings lots of very useful tools for communities, but it kind of has to be observed and watched.
   And if it's misbehaving, it has to be told off.
   Well, it's been wicked to have you both on the podcast.
   Sophia, thank you.
   Thank you.
   Neil, good to see you, thanks.
   Thank you.
   If you want more episodes of The Global Story, you can find us wherever you get your podcasts.
   We do one big story in depth every day and don't forget to subscribe.
   Thanks for watching, goodbye.


5. Google And Meta Are Scrambling To Copy TikTok. Can They Catch up? - YouTube
https://youtube.com/watch?v=LW89RaUW5BI&si=akzXyUfK4_aSXp1M

    (54) Google And Meta Are Scrambling To Copy TikTok. Can They Catch up? - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LW89RaUW5BI
    
    Reels, shorts, stories everywhere you look.
   Short videos have taken over social media, and right now there's one platform that dominates TikTok.
   I'm scrolling every single day.
   I do scroll all the time.
   I'm checking constantly throughout the day.
   I'm fully addicted to TikTok.
   I spend a lot of time on the app, and I think it's because they're so good at giving you content that directly matches what you're interested in.
   Tiktok is the center of the internet for young people.
   It's where they go to be entertained.
   It's where they go to keep up with the news.
   It's where they go to find out about trends.
   They go to search for things and shop, and the list goes on.
   Since 2016, TikTok has grown to over 1.12 billion monthly active users worldwide.
   In the U.S., nearly 118 million people use TikTok frequently, spending an average of 108 minutes per day on the app.
   I'm properly consuming content on TikTok Yeah at least three hours each day.
   That kind of engagement has made short videos.
   A multi-billion dollar industry.
   Now platforms like YouTube shorts, Instagram Reels and even LinkedIn are racing to catch up.
   Short form video that's kind of like the bite size version of video.
   What's consumable when you're looking at your phone?
   Maybe you're waiting in line to grab some food somewhere or something.
   It just seems to be the right format for video in social media.
   Short form videos aren't just popular, they're transforming the way we consume content by being fast, addictive, and algorithm driven.
   The algorithm has also been the envy of many other social platforms, including meta, which has been updating its content recommendation systems to be more similar to TikToks.
   And the algorithm is also what has drawn and continues to draw a lot of, especially aspiring creators, to the app.
   They went all in on short form video when others weren't really touching it.
   Famously, Twitter had short form video first with vine, but for whatever reason, they gave up on it.
   And so that created a vacuum that TikTok really went into.
   And definitely the algorithm that they have seems to do a really good job at understanding what folks are interested in, and that has been difficult for others to replicate.
   But why are these videos so addictive?
   It comes down to three key factors speed, personalization, and infinite scrolling.
   I love that the platform feels like a very strong community.
   The algorithm is really great at spreading information quickly and things that are relevant to you.
   Generally, when I speak to teens.
   What I hear from them is that they feel like the videos that they are being shown on their feeds on TikTok are particularly compelling.
   They feel like TikTok has a better sense of what they want to see than than they do themselves.
   Unlike traditional posts or long form videos, short videos deliver quick dopamine hits.
   A fast paced mix of entertainment, education and trends that keep users engaged for hours.
   Infinite scrolling and short form is a method where just capturing your attention becomes the important thing and doing so in very short bursts.
   Whereas in the past entertainment, TV, radio plays, they're about capturing an audience's attention by being interesting and grabbing your attention to go on the journey of that show or that particular play.
   Whereas now it's almost as if, if we can just get a minute, a few seconds of your attention and lock you into this, you know, and then we'll send you another thing that you seem to like through the algorithm.
   The numbers tell the story.
   Tiktok's success has forced many other social media platforms to adapt.
   Adept, meta owned Instagram launched Reels in August 2020.
   Google owned YouTube introduced Shorts in India in September 2020, after the country banned TikTok, and it launched in the US in 2021.
   Facebook followed with its own version of reels that year, and LinkedIn began experimenting with short form video in early 2024, hoping to tap into the format's popularity for professional content and industry insights.
   I have been using YouTube shorts a lot, um, the past few months especially, and even just in the past month, my views have been up over 700%.
   So I do think it's becoming a lot more popular.
   I think meta launching reels and YouTube launching shorts, it was smart for them to, you know, recognize that short form was taking off, especially when it happened, which was in the early, you know, part of 2020 when pandemic lockdowns began and people were looking for things to do online and on their phones.
   I do still think that they're behind compared to, uh, where TikTok is.
   Uh, but, you know, it's better to have some sort of offering here than nothing at all.
   Videos on Facebook and Instagram now represent more than 60% of time spent on both platforms.
   Reels alone makes up 50% of total time users spend on Instagram, and are reshared over 4.5 billion times a day on the platforms.
   To attract more creators, Instagram has doubled down on reels with new tools such as three minute reels, trial reels and more editing tools.
   Metas head of Instagram, Adam Mosseri, hinted in the past that reels may even become its own app, but meta did not give a time frame on when or if this will happen, as competitors try to catch up to TikTok.
   The Chinese owned app continues to evolve, with features like TikTok shop, longer videos and more analytic tools for influencers.
   Meanwhile, LinkedIn is testing a new TikTok style short form video feed.
   Creators on LinkedIn are monetizing through multiple streams of income brand partnerships, speaking gigs, client leads, courses and digital products.
   There's a goldmine happening on LinkedIn right now.
   I would post a video on TikTok.
   The very same video will get 400 views, and I'll post it at midnight on LinkedIn and I'll wake up to 200,000 views.
   And then by 3:00 pm, it'll have 3 million views.
   And like, you know, that's happened to me multiple times, where LinkedIn's algorithm kind of just lets the video simmer a bit and it can go from, you know, not having that many views to completely popping in in a similar way to to TikTok's early days.
   Linkedin social media creator Chapman says she makes around $10,000 a month putting content on LinkedIn for her.
   The platform's professional audience makes it more lucrative than TikTok or Instagram right now.
   My income is brand partnerships with a little bit of consulting, and the impressions on there have exceeded over 70 million impressions in the last six months, which is something I've never seen on both Instagram and TikTok throughout my years doing this.
   As LinkedIn has moved from being a purely professional and job hunting site, it has become more of a hub for creators, for influencers, for celebrities, for brands and thought leaders.
   We've also seen a shift to more personal content, and a lot of that has been driven by creators joining the platform and posting short videos.
   So LinkedIn rolling out a short video feed is really an example of them catering to these behaviors that are already happening on the platform.
   But there's a dark side to short form video.
   While the content is fun, it can be addictive and comes at a cost.
   Shrinking attention spans, rising mental health concerns, and algorithm driven engagement that often prioritizes sensationalism over substance.
   Kids need about nine hours of sleep depending on the age, and a lot of kids are struggling getting to sleep using their screens because the screens provide blue light.
   That then tells your brain it's time to wake up, stay awake so it's harder to fall asleep.
   Kids who have trouble falling asleep will then resort to their phone to entertain themselves, to try to get to sleep.
   So can affect your sleep.
   It's very easy to lose track of time when you're using social media.
   When the time is so excessive that it's starting to get in the way of other activities that would be good for mental health.
   Things like sleep, um, time outside, time in person with friends and family.
   That's when it may become a problem.
   For many teens, it's it's hard to stop when they start using it.
   Gen Z, the first generation to grow up with these platforms is already showing signs of change.
   Many now watch long form content at 1.5 or even two times speed.
   Struggling to sit through traditional formats.
   I like to multitask and watch content while I do other things, so if I'm just scrolling on my phone sometimes, I might do the two time speed Yeah.
   100% TikTok ruined all of our attention spans.
   I don't think we can go back to the long form video content.
   But the concerns go beyond focus.
   They're spending too much time.
   It's too much information that's stressful.
   That can be anxiety provoking for a number of kids.
   Now, with a potential TikTok sale looming and global scrutiny intensifying, platforms are facing a new kind of pressure not just to keep users watching, but also to find ways to make it profitable.
   Despite massive engagement, monetizing short form video is tough.
   A few years ago, the majority of my income did come from TikTok.
   Now virtually.
   It's nothing.
   It's like pocket change.
   Kind of, um, same thing with Instagram.
   I don't make money over there as of right now.
   Unlike long form content where platforms can insert multiple ads, short videos offer limited ad space.
   That means lower revenue per view and creators are feeling it.
   Short video ads tend to be placed in between videos, so they're really easy for users to skip, which is one of the reasons, actually, that we have seen platforms prioritizing longer form video because it gives them more opportunities to place ads.
   Most platforms, with the exception of YouTube and now Snapchat, also don't share ad revenue from short form videos with creators, partially because it is harder to attribute an ad view to a short video than it is a long form video when those ads are placed directly in the content.
   In 2024, TikTok made an estimated $23.6 billion in ad revenue, but most creators earn only a few dollars per million views.
   Youtube shorts introduced ad revenue sharing, but at about $0.04 per 1000 views, it's far lower than what long form YouTube videos generate.
   Creators are very frustrated.
   Technically, it is easier than ever to go viral, to build an audience and to start a business.
   But in practice, what a lot of creators are finding is that the days of true virality are ending.
   As our social media usage has just become so much more fragmented and building a sustainable business is incredibly hard work and there's a lot of competition out there.
   Viral success doesn't necessarily translate to sustainable businesses.
   Creators are experimenting with new ways to make money.
   Brand deals and sponsorships are still the main source of income, but features like TikTok shop, Instagram shopping and YouTube super thanks make it easier to sell directly to fans.
   Some are also turning to subscriptions, offering exclusive content for a monthly fee.
   This year, we expect creators to generate just over $10 billion from brand deals on social media, but their individual earnings will vary significantly based on a lot of different factors like which platforms they're on, how many platforms are included in the deal, follower counts, content formats, and the type of partnership.
   I think if you're a company like Meta or Google, the revenue might not be there simply because it's the newer format and you're already doing advertising advertisements against your existing format.
   So as you introduce a new product, essentially, you know, you really got to get advertisers to learn the new offering, figure out how to do it.
   But then at the same time you're cannibalizing your other offerings, right?
   So there's a transition period.
   Meta.
   They talk about this a lot.
   And, you know, they've gone through these cycles at various times in their history.
   When TikTok faced a potential ban in the U.S., competitors quickly seized the moment.
   We saw some of this already during the brief shutdown in January, when there were creators taking to Instagram and a surge in engagement on both shorts and reels.
   Meta and YouTube would bring in about 50% of all reallocated TikTok ad dollars in the US if TikTok were to be banned this year.
   Even with these numbers, short form video revenue still lags behind long form content.
   I would say that it's tougher to to earn money if you're creating content that's under a minute now because YouTube rewards, you know, long form videos.
   They still reward for shorts, obviously, but the, you know, most money to be made on YouTube is with longer videos.
   Um, and now it's the same case with TikTok.
   With ad limitations, shifting algorithms and growing scrutiny from lawmakers, the future of short videos is still uncertain.
   Platforms are betting on e-commerce and AI driven recommendations to stay ahead.
   But as engagement skyrockets and attention spans shrink, one question remains is short form video evolving social media or just reshaping how we consume content, for better or worse?
   So it certainly feels like, at least anecdotally, it does feel like it's affected people's attention span.
   In many ways, it's like Pandora's box and it's been opened.
   You can't, you know, exactly put it back in.
   Right.
   So this is where we're at.
   And a lot of people love, you know, social media.
   And this is just kind of like the format of choice at the moment.


    6. Why You Are Getting So Many Fake Job Offers By Text - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=xep-5zG5KaI&si=yl1ACc4J_ObCkNJc

(54) Why You Are Getting So Many Fake Job Offers By Text - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xep-5zG5KaI

Have you ever received a  text message like this offering you a job? Hi, I'm Emily from Robert  Half International Recruitment. We have an  opening position for part time and full time jobs. Can I share you details with  you? Salaries range from $200 to  $800 per day. If you are interested in  this opportunity, please
send a text message to  (347) 725-7663. On September 13th,  2024, Sunita Dhougoda, a 37 year old freelance  software engineer from North Carolina, received one two  without much thought. The mother of two clicked  the Microsoft Teams link. I was expecting a video  interview on teams, but surprisingly it was a  text interview and it was
more than an hour long  interview went well and they told me that they will get  back to me in few days. Three days later,  an offer letter landed in her inbox, but something  felt off. I researched on the company  website. The biggest red flag she  spotted was the scammers Scammer's email. Careers at  Azure Care careers which
they use to communicate  instead of the legitimate at a sharecare.com. I found like it was a scam,  so I never responded back. Dhougoda was fortunate not  to fall for the scam, but many others have lost  millions to similar cons. We've seen a huge increase  in text job scams. We received over 9000  reports in 2023,
but more than 20,000 in  2024. Consumers reported losing  $14.8 million in 2023, and that shot up to $61.2  million in 2024. And the worrying thing is  that we know these high numbers are just the tip of  the iceberg, because of course,  not everyone reports to us when they experience this  fraud. Here's why job scams are  filling up your text
messages and how to protect  yourself. Emails, phone calls and  texts are scammers. Top three contact methods  job scams via text have seen a sharp rise in reports and  financial losses. In 2020, 4872 reports of job  scams via text resulted in $2 million in losses,  but by 2024, those reports climbed to  20,632,
with losses escalating to  $61.2 million. The immediate response  driven nature and accessibility of texting has  made it a preferred tool for scammers. It usually takes  people around 90 minutes to open an email,  but with SMS, users open the message  within 90s. So I think it's easy to  communicate through the text
rather than the call and the  emails. So that's the reason they  are doing the text messages for the people who are  thinking the job. Anything that is immediate,  you're hardwired to respond to it. So a text has a  certain amount of immediacy to it. So you see that and  you go, oh, I need to either click  on that link or I need to
call that phone number,  whatever it is that it's asking you to do. We're just  sort of natural instinct is to do that, which is why  it's important we resist that natural instinct. I have noticed that email  scams have been around for a very long time,  and we're somewhat accustomed to being  concerned when we get an
unexpected email. But many of us,  myself included, are using text messages to  communicate all day long, and we may be working  quickly. And so if you get a text  message, it can be a moment where you  quickly read it and respond to it. The FTC has also warned  about the rise of a particular job scam,  called a task scam,
which is depleting people's  bank accounts. These are scams that often  start with a text message about online work. And when consumers respond  to this, they're told they'll be  completing tasks related to things like app optimization  or product boosting or something like that. And people really do  actually start doing tasks,
and they may see some small  payouts at the beginning from this supposed job,  but over time, they are asked to pay money  to complete the next series of tasks. And so at the end  of the day, consumers end up losing a  lot of money to these scams. And we have seen a really  concerning increase in the
last four years. There were zero of them in  2020, then 5000 reported in 2023,  and that quadrupled to about 20,000 just in the first  half of 2024. So we want everyone to be  aware, to stay away from these  unexpected text messages about jobs. These task scams seem to  offer us a low effort but high reward kind of gig.
And so people go,  yeah, I can do two jobs, I can do three jobs. I'll do  that. That's easy. So it's playing  to the nature that we have of I can do more than what  I'm doing. And so you've got the people  who are employment insecure and the people who are like, gig oriented. And it all  comes together to create an
environment where people are  likely to click on these kinds of links. One thing we've seen over  many, many years at the Federal  Trade Commission is that the scammers follow the  headlines. So whatever's going on in  the world, scammers are going to try to  use that to steal people's money. To announce layoff in  February,
surging by 245% to the  highest level since the pandemic. With the Trump  administration's efforts to reduce the federal workforce  playing not the only but the biggest. If you've been following the  news job cuts across the federal government,  the nation's largest employer, continue to draw  widespread attention.
Despite this massive wave of  cuts, the Federal Reserve says the  overall labor market remains balanced. The layoffs that are  happening here are you know, they're certainly meaningful  to the people involved, and they may be meaningful to a  particular neighborhood or region or area. But at the national level,  they're not they're not
significant yet. Powell's comments on the  overall labor market were reflected in the latest job  reports as well. Despite the unemployment  rate ticking up to 4.2% in March, the US economy added  a stronger than expected 228,000 jobs. That's up from  a revised 117,000in February and above the Dow Jones  estimate of 140,000.
So overall, the economy is  still growing and the job market does remain solid. Unemployment is low. We are still adding jobs. However, that doesn't  necessarily mean it's a good job market for everyone. We've seen hiring slow over  the last two and a half years since about 2022. So as a result,  it is more difficult to find
a job. The number of  applicants per job on LinkedIn is up 70% compared  to 2022. Looking at 2024. Had a full time job as a  senior software engineer I got laid off on 2023,  so since then I have been working as a freelance. But the job market is really  very bad. It's really very tough to  get the job.
Dalgoda isn't alone in that  sentiment. Workers confidence in  finding or keeping a job is at its lowest point on  record, surpassing even the levels  seen in spring of 2020. Now that the labor market is  more competitive, people may be willing to  take jobs that they weren't necessarily willing to take  before.
As a result, there may be  some advertisements that they received that they  would have previously ignored, that they're  willing to click on. Folks who are looking to commit  scams, know this, and they may be taking  advantage of that. As a result. Many people are always  interested in finding a job
or finding a side gig for  extra income. And so scammers are using  that desire to try to steal people's money and personal  information. Government agencies like the  FBI and FTC are issuing consumer alerts on how to  protect yourself. The FTC wants people to know  that text based job scams are a huge problem.
People are losing money and  you should protect yourself by never interacting with an  unexpected text message about a job. Real employers  will never contact you that way. If you get an unsolicited  text or an unsolicited email or phone call,  ignore it, just delete it. And the wonderful thing now  that we see with our
smartphones is all of the  telecom carriers give you the option to report that as  some kind of spam or malware or something. So you should  not only delete it, but also report it,  because that helps both the telecom companies and the  operators of your smartphone to understand what's  happening. And they can then help block  that.
If someone does think  they've been the victim of a text based job scam,  they should consider doing a couple of things. One is report it to the FTC  at report fraud. This is the large database  that we and other law enforcers use every day to  help address scams. And if people are worried  that they've been the victim
of identity theft,  they should visit identitytheft.gov. There are a few ways that  you can try to protect yourself from job scams on  LinkedIn. Look for verification  badges. We verify whether the  employer's information is true and correct. Second, filter jobs that  have been verified so that you're getting the most  credible set of job
postings. Also,  you can turn on warning messages on LinkedIn for  harmful content, and that will help you  filter out some of this noise. When we fall victim to these  things, we do feel very guilty. We feel ashamed. We feel like,  wait a minute, I'm smarter than this. I shouldn't fall  for this. But the reality is,  these scams are very
sophisticated. These people  who do this are very well organized. And now they have  artificial intelligence to help. So the tools they are  using create letter perfect websites. We don't see texts  anymore that have grammar problems and spelling  problems, and the pitch itself is very  compelling. That's all because of  artificial intelligence,
so people shouldn't feel bad  about this. Use your social media to  tell other people about what happened. If you happen to  have screenshot of that text that you fell for,  post it. Show people what's  happening. Let other people know to be  aware and to avoid that thing that you fell into. And even if you didn't fall  into it,
still tell people you should  be on the lookout for this. It's fraud. It's fake. Don't click on the link.  Don't return the phone call. They are 99.99% of the time, fake and fraudulent. And it's going to make your  life very difficult to recover from.


7. Why iPhones May Get More Expensive Amid Trump Tariffs - YouTube
https://youtu.be/QqDqNl6OJZE?si=RpaNBWKa4ydEBABM

(54) Why iPhones May Get More Expensive Amid Trump Tariffs - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QqDqNl6OJZE

 For years, Apple has been  diversifying its manufacturing supply chain  away from China. Apple's been selling iPhones  made in India, AirPods from Vietnam and Mac  computers assembled in Malaysia. The strategy was a  hedge for its supply chain after the company dealt with  tariffs by the first Trump
 administration, supply chain  issues tied to Covid, and chip shortages that  revealed the risk the company was at by primarily  producing out of China. But then on April 2nd,  everything changed. For decades, our country has  been looted, pillaged, raped and  plundered by nations near and far, both friend and foe  alike.
 In a few moments,  I will sign a historic executive order instituting  reciprocal tariffs on countries throughout the  world. Not only did imports from  China get a massive tariff, but so did the other  countries where Apple's set up manufacturing. Although  Trump did put a 90 day pause on tariffs for some  countries on April 9th.
 Global markets plunged on  the news and Apple was hit particularly hard. From April 2nd to April 7th, Apple shares dropped  approximately 15%, erasing nearly $640 billion  in market value. However, following President  Trump's announcement of a 90 day pause on new tariffs,  the stock rebounded, rallying over 15% in a  single day,
 although it did lose some of  those gains again the next day. Apple is in the eye of the  storm. I don't think any company is  more impacted by this tariff Armageddon than Apple. It's 90% of iPhones. 75% of its other hardware. And that's why for Apple,  when it comes to China and Taiwan, this continues to be  just an epic disaster.
 And that's why the stock's  reflecting that. Amid fierce back and forth  tariffs between the U.S . and China as of April 10th,  the White House told CNBC, Trump elevated tariffs to a  staggering 145% on Chinese imports. It's going to throw the U.S. into a recession. It's the most head  scratching, absurd policy thing that  we've ever seen.
 Even with diversification,  Apple is still very reliant on China. Around 90% of  iPhones are still assembled in China by Foxconn,  which accounts for roughly 80% of Apple's total  production capacity. China also handles 55% of  Mac assembly and 80% of iPads. So what exactly do  these tariffs mean for your
 iPhone and what options does  Apple have? Tariffs are taxes on  imported goods paid for by the company doing the  importing. The theory is simple,  make foreign made products more expensive and companies  will bring jobs back home. Any product that comes into  and out of a country, you're basically paying a  tax.
 And ultimately tariffs is  what a country is paying another country to import  goods. And the reality is it's the  U.S. consumer that will have to  pay for this. Right now, Apple designs its  products in the U.S . but assembles almost  everything abroad. The reality is,  if you want, if you want an iPhone made  in the U.S .
 and you want that for  $3,500, we should make in the U.S. If you want it for $1,000,  you keep it in China. The iPhone 15 Pro Max  currently starts at $1,199. At the lower April 2nd,  tariff rate of 54% on China, one estimate showed that  would raise the price of an iPhone by $350. We do believe that to offset  the price or the cost of
 these tariffs in the U.S.,  Apple would have to raise prices kind of across the  board. By c all it 17,18%. These tariffs will impact  Apple. It will raise Apple's costs. And and the most common way  for a firm to recoup these costs is by raising prices. Now if Apple does,  you know, sell a $1,500 iPhone or  whatnot,
 that could really start  hurting demand on the other side, too. So there's a  balancing act here. Apple can't just pass all  the costs on to the consumer because maybe they'll stop  buying iPhones. The Trump White House claims  Apple could just bring iPhone production back to  the U.S. We have the labor,  we have the workforce.
 We have the resources to do  it. And as you know,  Apple has invested $500 billion here in the United  States. So if Apple didn't think the  United States could do it, they probably wouldn't have  put up that big chunk of change. But experts say that's  easier said than done. The global supply chain is  built in Asia.
 China has been a linchpin  for Apple's success as well as big tech. And look,  to put some numbers, it would take $30 billion,  3 years, for Apple, to just move 10%  of the supply chain to the U.S. Apple began manufacturing  some iPhones in India in 2017. By 2024,  India was exporting nearly $6 billion worth of iPhones  between April and September
 alone. Apple also began  producing iPads in Vietnam in 2022. But under the new  tariff plan, imports from India face a  26% tax and Vietnamese goods 46%, although many tariffs  are paused for now. iPhone is where all the  money is, and they're not going to be  able to shift enough of those supplies of those  iPhones that make in India,
 bring it over to the United  States. They're still reliant on  China. It's interesting,  after the first round of tariffs, going years back,  how there was such a push to leave China manufacturing,  go elsewhere, go to Vietnam,  go to Thailand. Well okay. So that's sort of  been thrown into flux. Simply moving factories  isn't enough.
 Apple's supply chain is  global, and escaping China won't be  fast or cheap. You could produce things in  Asia that's 95% cheaper than the U.S. That's the nature  of the global supply chain. Whether it's clothes,  electronics, U.S . consumers want things  cheap. It's labor costs,  infrastructure. The nature of the workforce.
 It takes 4 to 5 years to  build a factory. So where does Apple go in  the meantime? They can't just call a  factor in the U.S. Look essentially Apple,  their boot has been turned upside down. There's no life  rafts. And it's a very,  very dangerous and I think uncertain time. Apple's next steps remain  unclear.
 As of April 10th,  the company declined to comment to CNBC. Apple has not responded  publicly, but I could tell you these  tariffs go in, they stay for a month. You could be looking at  numbers that get taken down 10,15%. The company is reportedly  reviewing its supply chain strategy and modeling out  tariff scenarios.
 In late March,  Apple chartered at least five planes to fly iPhones  and other products into the U.S., stockpiling inventory  before tariffs took effect. That behind the scenes  urgency stands in contrast to the company's public  silence. No press release,  no investor memo, not even a tweet. Right now, it's unclear what  Apple's going to do.
 Apple declined to comment,  and they've been declining to comment on the tariffs so  far. So right now it's kind of a  cipher. What Tim Cook is cooking up  in Cupertino to address this stuff. On an earnings call in  January, Tim Cook said we are  monitoring the situation and don't have anything more to  add.
 For a company that is really  seen as the poster child for getting caught up in these,  these tariffs and this trade war. Apple really hasn't  said much at all. Apple's been pretty silent,  though, to be honest,  about what's going on with these tariff impacts,  how they're thinking about pricing. iPhone pricing is  going to be the most
 important. It's also a sharp contrast  to 2019, when Tim Cook personally  lobbied then-President Trump for tariff exemptions and  secured them. This time, no carve outs  have been offered. So far, Apple hasn't issued  new guidance to suppliers or changed long term forecasts, but analysts say they're  watching two things closely:
 product cycle timing and  lobbying. Trump does cite Apple as a  great American company and as a company that is  investing in the United States. I think there's a  good chance that Apple ends up getting exceptions too. So, whether it's realistic,  there's still a lot of possibilities right now. Raising prices by 1 to 300  hundred dollars is one
 possibility, but it might be  a tough adjustment in a market used to $999 starting  points. Apple is unlikely to raise  prices between a product cycle, which means it would  just wait for the iPhone 17 cycle. The tariffs come at an  especially tough time, when Apple was already being  criticized for falling
 behind in AI. At the end of the day,  its smartphone, its hardware,  and then its about the AI revolution into Apple. But if you lose demand  destruction, that significantly hurts the  future of AI.


 8. How Crocs Became Cool Again - YouTube
https://youtube.com/watch?v=InkRhrFK94k&si=zPENZkbgJOuSCET1

(54) How Crocs Became Cool Again - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=InkRhrFK94k

The fact that you guys say,  "ain't rockin unless you're crocin" is absolutely  disgusting. I just tried these shoes on. I'm in love. I'm in love. Comfort. Nostalgic. Kind of fun. They're just  heinous. It's one of the most  polarizing names in fashion. Whether you love us or you  hate us, you know who we are.
We are on an ongoing basis. Faced with skepticism from  investors is entirely unjustified because that's  not reflected in the financial performance of the  business. For this one,  and the other. Crocs annual revenue was  $1.2 billion back in 2014, about a decade later,  the brand is raking in nearly three times that.
A lot of it is thanks to  personalization, making the company one of  the best marketing stories in retail. You can see Crocs  will customize some of its shoes on the shelves to  inspire some of that creativity amongst its  shoppers. Each of these Jibbitz costs  $5 and the metal ones cost seven. The margins are amongst the  best.
To this day, they are  amongst the best. We've seen this from like  Nike, and ON, and Hoka. They all  want to have that premium footwear over $160,  where they get that big fat, you know, 60% margin. Crocs gets it,  you know, selling the product under $100,  under $50. But reciprocal tariffs  announced by President Trump
on April 2nd,  2025 could threaten that competitive advantage by  placing a nearly 50% duty on Vietnam, where the company  imports much of its goods. So, how did Crocs make a  cultural resurgence, and could the imposed  tariffs threaten its business? These are Jibbitz. They're charms that go  inside the holes on top of
the Crocs. In 2024,  the company said they brought in $271 million  worth of sales from these alone. That's about 8% of  the company's total sales in 2024. And a key driver in  one of the biggest comebacks in retail. But the idea  didn't come from Crocs. A couple in Boulder,  Colorado created them back
in 2005. The product  experienced rapid growth, seeing its revenue jump from  200,000 to $2 million per month, from February to  August of 2006. Crocs acquired the company  for $20 million that same year. Could you have ever  imagined that Jibbitz would become as successful as they  are today? No, no, not at all.
So, when I first joined the  company in 2014, the Jibbitz business has  actually declined. So between 200 6,  when the company purchased it, which was before my  tenure, it actually grew to,  I think, a peak of about $80 million. And then declined  fairly rapidly because they weren't putting innovation  or imagination into it.
But then we reimagined  Jibbitz, we used referencing social  media, listening to look at what  icons or items will be trending. Leaning into personalization  has paid off. Anytime we have like a  segment or a business, like a subsegment of a  business, anything that sort of like  hits that double digit 10%
marker, it becomes  meaningful. Do you have any insight into  how many of your shoppers are buying Jibbitz to go along  with the Crocs? Yeah, we think about three  quarters of our consumers are actually buying Jibbitz  according to our own proprietary surveys. It's one of the highest  margin pieces of the
business, if not the highest  actual absolute dollar value of it, is so small. But the point is that it's  not building a business off of that, but as an add -on,  depending on how many you buy, it can increase the  transaction size 5, 10, 15, 20%. I think I found the one. It's 3D, it'll be popping  out of the shoe.
See how that looks on there? If you buy Crocs,  you may be really comfortable, but you're  giving up some ego or social value. And for years this  example went well and people would laugh. And then a  couple of years ago, one of my students raised his hand  and was like, actually, you're wrong,  Crocs are cool now.
As it went through the  financial crisis 2008, it really hit some speed  bumps, around having too much  inventory, around demand dropping off  extremely rapidly, really, because they weren't  marketing or promoting the product appropriately to  extend its reach. In the decade that followed, there were multiple years  where the company wasn't
profitable. Rees was  appointed as CEO in 2017, and spearheaded the Crocs  turnaround story. They went back to basics in  terms of they had this unwieldy product portfolio  of 250 products or more, and they went back to their  original clog and basically used it as a canvas for  self-expression. The biggest thing I saw from  a messaging perspective was
their shift from trying to  convince consumers that it was about comfort and  function, to basically saying,  yeah, we know we're ugly, but that's why you should  love us, because that's what makes us one of a kind and  unique. Part of the Crocs comeback  story centers on its ability to drive demand through  limited drops and releases.
They partner with brands  like Pixar and make custom designs like this one from  Monsters, Inc.. Some customers absolutely  love it and can't wait to get it and then some number  of customers. This is officially the  ugliest croc they've ever seen. That strategy is  particularly effective because it's not just about  limited availability,
it's also about driving  conversation. The company also began an  influencer led social campaign and collaborated  frequently with celebrities. Have, you know,  some of the most successful ones we've ever done or,  you know, like our Post Malone or we  did Bad Bunny. And it wasn't about the  amount we sold,
but the amount of interest  that we had. They sold out very, very quickly. The turnaround efforts  really took hold in 2021, coupled with pandemic  lockdowns, creating demand for  comfortable footwear inside the home. Plus,  the shoes became a favorite amongst frontline workers  that could easily slip off
and sanitize their footwear. The share price soared as  the company grew its revenue by nearly $1 billion between  2020 and 2021. It's been on an upward  trajectory ever since, but since 2021,  the stock has experienced some volatility. Between  2021 and 2024, Vietnam accounted for more  than half of Crocs
production. President Trump  imposed 46% tariffs on imports from the country. These increased costs would  likely need to get passed on to the consumer,  in order to mitigate impacts to the company's margins. Another threat to Crocs  right now, actually has nothing to do  with the Crocs business itself. It comes from a $2.5  billion acquisition of
casual footwear brand Hey  Dude, in 2022. When they acquired the  brand. It was having a moment,  then comes along like all the disruption,  supply chain and all these other things,  inflation is going up and the brand awareness is not  universally high like it is for Crocs. In 2025, Crocs has been hit with  several class action
lawsuits related to previous  distribution practices of Hey Dude. The lawsuits  allege that the company was consciously misleading  investors with Hey Dude's, initial revenue growth by  overstocking its products with third party  wholesalers. You have to prove that they  knew that demand on the other side of that was not  going to be,
you know, good. So,  I would say they'll go down that path. But I don't know  that there's a real, real merit and a real threat to  the company from that. We're not going to comment  on the specific allegations in the lawsuit. I would say  that, you know, class action or  stockholder lawsuits like this are not uncommon in  situations where you see
underlying volatility in the  stock. I think we're very confident  that we will prevail in this litigation. Regardless of intention,  over the past few years, there was more Hey Dude  product in stock amongst wholesalers, than there was  demand. Some distributors were  discounting the product, which defied some pricing  agreements put in place.
Crocs wanted to take back  control of the brand, so they ended a lot of these  distributor relationships. But that slashed its sales. In 2024, the company was  also fined nearly $2 million by the FTC for suppressing  negative reviews on its website and failing to  properly refund customers. Here's a look at the Hey  Dude brand revenue since
2022. Do you worry about  kind of the future of the Hey Dude's business and the  thorn that it has presented itself over the past few  years? I don't worry about that at  all, actually, we have a rejuvenated and new  management team that we put into Hey Dude. We came out  of the back end of last year, Q3 and Q4.
We saw some really very  strong positive signs around the Hey Dude business. Sales of Hey Dude were flat  for the last quarter of 2024, but down more than 13%  overall for the year. Crocs, on the other hand,  was up about 9%. Probably the single biggest  thing that everybody wants to know is you are actually  making investments and
you're actually taking the  hard earned money from the Crocs brand, and then you're  infusing it and investing it into, Hey Dude,  now, they think that that is a good growth prospect. Right now, the jury's out on  that. But while the future of Hey  Dude remains a question, Crocs is focusing on global  growth for its flagship
brand. Internationally,  South Korea and China have the most physical Crocs  stores, but still trail the U.S . by a significant margin. Less than half of the Crocs  brand revenue currently comes from outside of North  America. Over the next sort of 3 to 5  years, if you're looking out for  the growth horizon for Crocs
that business,  you'll see some low single digit growth in the U.S. and the Americas,  North America. And that's the smaller part  of future growth. Investors generally,  they like the reliable, meaty part of growth,  to be the biggest part of growth. We call this this  part of the of the story the balance of uncertainty.
What Croc did,  very adeptly, from a growth perspective in  terms of acquiring new customers, was by targeting  these explorers, these trendsetters. And that's also part of that  international strategy for Crocs, is how do they find  the leaders in those other countries to make themselves  fashionable and trendy?
What are some of the  financial misconceptions that you believe investors  might be getting wrong? I think it's boom and bust. What they're missing is the  classic clog is really a blank canvas for expression. We're very confident we keep  it relevant to a broad base of consumers. We can  continue to sell millions of
pairs of shoes every year.


9. How China Uses Vietnam To Evade Higher Tariffs - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=B2KrT0FAH-k&si=uueBcbbad4kXuw4a

How China Uses Vietnam To Evade Higher Tariffs - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=B2KrT0FAH-k

Over the past decade,  investors have poured capital into Southeast Asia. Vietnam, in particular,  has benefited. They export a lot of final  assembly of electronics, like some of your iPhones or  your Samsung smartphones. They also export a lot of  apparel. President Trump's tariff  plan could shake up this
trade. Vietnam is highly  vulnerable. Leaders around the world  have asked the White House to back down from the tax  hikes. In response, President Trump  lowered tariff rates to 10% on most countries,  except China. I also have to say 90 day  pauses are not an eradication of tariff risk. The tax hikes on products  across Southeast Asia could
be potent. U.S. imports of Vietnamese  products grew rapidly in recent years. Experts say  this may be connected to foul play from China. Our analysis points to some  tentative evidence of rerouting, particularly by  Chinese firms that newly invested in Vietnam after  2018. If this can be definitively  shown,
countervailing measures  against those particular exporters may be warranted. What could these  developments mean for producers in Vietnam and  their customers in the United States? Factories in Vietnam produce  many consumer goods sold in the U.S. So Vietnam has become a  second largest supplier of
clothing and shoes to the  U.S. after China. So major  American brands source heavily from Vietnam,  for example, Nike. They produce about 50%  of its footwear and 28% of it abroad in Vietnam. Manufacturers in Vietnam,  produce furniture for companies like Wayfair,  and toys for companies like Hasbro and Mattel.
Companies like Apple and  Samsung also rely on Vietnam's manufacturing. You know, Samsung alone  employs 160,000 workers in Vietnam. Between 2018 and today,  more and more companies started actually investing  anew in Vietnam. So Apple coordinated with a  lot of its Taiwanese suppliers to move more  production into Vietnam.
Businesses with supply  chains that run through Vietnam saw their stocks  sink as news of higher import taxes spread. If tariff rates proposed in  April go into effect, they could cost around  $3,800 for the average U.S . household. The U.S . has a much higher level of  gross domestic product per capita when compared to  Vietnam's.
There is simply a lot more  demand in the United States for the kinds of things that  Vietnam exports. Then there is demand in  Vietnam for what the United States exports. And that's a function of the  fact that the two economies are at very, very different  levels of development. So the United States is an  advanced economy.
We tend to export goods that  are capital intensive. Vietnam is a relatively poor  country where demand for things like the new 787,  is going to be much more limited. The White House says that  higher tariff rates will help the U.S. compete with  rising powers like China. In recent years,  businesses have reduced
their production in China  and ramped up in other developing countries,  like Vietnam. This is known as the China  +1 strategy. The way production works  these days, pieces of a product come  from all over the world and then are assembled together. But over the years,  China had become the factory for the world,  and so a lot of supply
chains were entirely located  inside China. So, for example,  an Apple iPhone, all the components would be  produced and then finally assembled in China. But that became risky,  and it became risky as Chinese wages started to go  up, as people had concerns about  too much dependance on a particular country.
And so the insurance  strategy was to open a factory in another country,  say, for example, Vietnam,  or Thailand, or Bangladesh,  or India. One of the reasons that  Vietnam has been on the come up, so to speak,  has been because China has been so successful in its  development model that it is pricing itself out of things  like making t -shirts,
or sewing shoes and that  kind of thing. They've moved on into kind  of higher value added products. China has been accused of  using Vietnam to pass through some exports into  the U.S. This tactic could help China  avoid Trump's 2018 tariffs. You saw a massive increase  happening as a result of those 2018 tariffs.
So, one type of activity was  what what we like to call value added production. So they were importing raw  materials and intermediate products from China into a  country like Vietnam or Thailand, and then doing the  production in Vietnam and exporting. That was the vast  majority of the activity, about 84% of the activity.
But there's a smaller part,  maybe 16%, depending on how you measure  it, which is rerouting,  essentially relabeling products. So saying this is  a product that was originally made in China. No new value added activity  took place in Vietnam and then it was exported as a  Vietnamese product. Economists say the higher  tariff rates under
discussion reflect trade  deficits between the U.S. and other nations. The relationship between the  United States and Vietnam, the trade deficit is  relatively sizable. It has grown in the last  year to be about $123.5 billion. The U.S. under Trump says  that many countries are using unfair trade tactics  like currency manipulation,
to expand their trade  surpluses. One of the things that the  Vietnamese are considering is essentially revaluing  their currency in response to the tariffs,  because if the tariffs are going to raise prices of  Vietnamese producers so much, that a decline in the  currency is maybe the only option, they have to  compensate,
unless they can reach a  settlement with the U.S. government. However, it is already low,  in 2024 already. In April, a delegation from  Vietnam reached out to the White House to strike a  deal. We've already seen  Vietnamese party general secretary contact the U.S. administration, offering to  potentially go down to zero
tariffs on U.S . products  entering Vietnam. The primary driver of this  bilateral trade deficit that the United States has with  Vietnam, is not driven by tariffs or  protectionism on Vietnam's part. It's driven by the  fact that there's just relatively much more demand  in the United States for Vietnamese products than  there is demand in Vietnam
for U.S . products. As tariff rates are  negotiated, countries like Vietnam are  bracing for impact. People have called it like  an unforced error or a self-inflicted wound. But it's worse than that  because it's it's essentially like a suicide  pact that's taking out large other countries along with  the U.S .
economy. The White House did not  respond to CNBC's request to participate in this story. In the year 2000,  the U.S . and Vietnam signed a trade  agreement which took tariff rates down from around 40%  to 3%. Today, exports to the United  States from Vietnam account for 30% of Vietnam's gross  domestic product.
The outlook for the people  of Vietnam who, if we know anything about  history in the last 50 years, have really been  through the wringer. Much of it at the hands of  the United States. The outlook was was very  positive. Once you graduate into that  lower middle income status and your manufacturing  sector is taking off,
this is a period in which  that economic growth is translating into real  household gains, so that the dirt floor  becomes a cement or tile floor. The electricity is on  24 hours a day, as opposed to maybe 8 or 12. That is a really  heartbreaking point in economic development for the  people of Vietnam to be
looking at, potentially  taking a big step back, from their first real taste  of the kind of affluence that we in the West and the  United States in particular, often take for granted.


10. How Temu Makes Money From $10 Smartwatches From China - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=quGoGgbP-aE&si=1uhWeItDRITZR5Or
How Temu Makes Money From $10 Smartwatches From China - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=quGoGgbP-aE

 [Music] it's February 12 2023 the Super Bowl Philadelphia Eagles versus Kansas City Chiefs and a record-setting 200 million people for watching this moment Wait no that's too far rewind the tmu app and Shop like a billion right there pause it wait what is Teemu okay let's backtrack it's February 12 2023 the Super Bowl and timu a shopping
 app that launched just five months ago makes its TV debut on one of the biggest advertising nights of the Year promising Bargain Basement prices and the opportunity to shop like a billionaire with not one but two commercial spots totaling 14 million dollars the Super Bowl ad catapulted the up and coming
 shopping app into the mainstream with app downloads jumping 45 and daily active users of 20 just one day later by the end of the first quarter timu had racked up 19 million downloads in 2023. I'm sure you've seen this site Teemu right shopping app Timo has become the most downloaded shopping app in the
 United States Teemu is cheaper aggressively promotional programmed to sell you useless stuff and it's totally addictive the company says that it's able to pass on those cost savings to American consumers wish.com AliExpress the others started a decade ago they were like Myspace Paving the path for Facebook or Blackberry Paving the way
 for an iPhone but where did timu come from how does it make money selling dirt cheap products and and how did a relatively new shopping platform end up at the center of a political Firestorm targeting Chinese e-commerce so you see the Super Bowl commercial decide to download the app you'll probably be met with something like this
 spinning wheels countdown clocks 100 coupons 25 off 50 off under 99 Cents act now hurry fast and even without those discounts you start noticing things are cheap like really cheap 90 headphones 10 designer knockoffs household goods for pennies on the dollar well is that a 10 smart watch let's go ahead and add that to cart it's really
 socialized extreme discounting with mega variety gamified and socialized in order to drive traffic but most importantly to build an enrolled base and get customers consumers to download their app Timo is an online bargain shopping Marketplace similar to Amazon individual sellers list products through the site but at
 heavily discounted rates based out of Boston team quietly launched in the summer of 2022 and within a few weeks the app was already topping Apple App Store charts surpassing Amazon Walmart even Xi'an all of this is thanks to a huge advertising budget with a focus on social media in January alone timu
 purchased 8 900 ads on meta platforms and this is all part of a larger user acquisition strategy because right now team is not worried about sales it's worried about you they're paying big bounties and referral fees for you and I and every other consumer to bring someone to the site to download the app
 and to make that first purchase you could go across the social sphere and you'll find people recruiting others in order to earn up to a hundred dollars a day on referral fees or if you're an influencer you can earn up to five thousand dollars a month the idea is that once you get people onto the site
 they stop browsing around they seal these different kind of gadgets and gizmos and things that are being offered they see the low prices and they think well let's give this a try and what timu has found is that once people have tried it once they keep going back and buying more and some people get quite addicted
 to Teemu and it's very easy to shop and it's very easy to do it in a quite the thoughtless way as well because you're not spending hundreds and thousands of dollars on things the individual price points are pretty low so a lot of people order in very high volumes based on some estimates Timo is projected to spend 1.4
 billion dollars on North American advertising in 2023 alone hoping to grow its user base by an estimated 100 million people the value of a monetizable daily active user we call it maju in the industry is we're somewhere between 236 dollars and 726 dollars per active user per year in top line revenue and
 they're acquiring these customers at a fraction of the cost of what Amazon or anybody else had to pay in order to get them so again that begs the question where did timu come from and how did it get all this money well if you haven't heard of timu you've probably heard of its parent company Chinese e-commerce
 company pendodo going public at the NASDAQ this morning [Music] one of China's big three e-commerce sites with a market cap of more than 100 billion dollars timu is the Retailer's first major push into the overseas Market where its competitors jd.com and Alibaba already have a footprint penduo Duo utilized its already established
 strategy and Logistics Network to get Teemo off the ground quickly meaning that though timu is based in the US its products are actually coming from distributors in China they have a supply chain advantage with that was built out of their success of pin duo duo in China that started out representing rural farmers and producers
 and agricultural providers and built that out to every small Merchant in China and now they've extended that to North America China is really the linchpin and timu's strategy a lot of the products that are sold on timu are manufactured in China they're shipped directly from China to the US so those labor costs compared to Manufacturing in
 the US and elsewhere are really low so timu was able to keep those prices very very low for customers as a result so that 10 Smart Watch is likely coming from a factory somewhere in China and just like other Chinese bargain e-commerce sites that allows timu to sell items at extremely low prices sales
 is very generic stuff it's not well-known Brands so that again keeps prices very very low because you're not paying for brand names but the same reputational risks plaguing other Chinese retailers like Sheen could find the rated Teemo and as far as team is concerned it's problems just went Federal so you downloaded the app spun the wheel
 down through discounts ordered your 10 smart watch and now you wait for your watch to come from a factory in China but there's a couple of hiccups not all Chinese manufacturers can sell Goods in the US there's actually a genocide being propagated against the meager people in a place called xinjiang province in the
 northwest corner of China 23 million uyghur people are having their cultural identity erased upwards of 2 million are in concentration camps as a consequence of this we passed something called the uyghur force labor prevention act because one of the things that's happening along with the genocide is
 that hundreds of thousands of uyghurs are being pressed into labor in factories making all sorts of goods there are countless Goods coming into the United States in violation of the law and a recently released report the U.S House of Representatives found instances of items on timu's website being sold or made with materials from
 the xinjiang region of China in direct violation of U.S import laws are American companies and others who are actually abiding by the law are making sure that their goods are not sourced from xinjiang are now put at a real competitive disadvantage relative to those fast fashion companies that are not following the law most online
 e-commerce retailers and marketplaces have policies in effect that directly forbid the sale of products from the xinjiang region but the US government found Teemu only had vague boilerplate language not directly mentioning xinjiang when pressed on it teamu's defense was team who's not the Importer of record meaning they're a Marketplace
 they don't make the products they just sell them yeah that's not going to work I mean they have 80 000 vendors and they're basically pointing the finger at them saying that it's up to them to police this situation but uh you know that's not gonna fly and it goes beyond that remember those Ultra cheap prices
 there are Customs control law where Goods under 800 that are shipped directly from China to residential homes um Escape all tariffs and duties and they don't really have a lot of information about their place of origin so they are also able to potentially skirt the laws that prohibit Goods coming from xinjiang to put it into
 perspective other companies like h m and gaap spent hundreds of millions of dollars on import duties at U.S borders in 2022. timu and Xi'an paid nothing combined they accounted for anywhere from 30 to 50 percent of all the Minimus shipments into the US that's an estimated 600 000 packages every day skirting Customs not paying
 import duties and flying under the radar CBP is already under a lot of stress with regard to inspecting the packages that are 800 and above and so then when you have this explosion of packages under 800 along with the fact that they don't have the data that would otherwise be required to do a targeted inspection
 regime you basically make it almost impossible for the CBP to do its job this also puts other companies at a distinct disadvantage when you don't have those tariffs or duties in place those goods end up looking a lot cheaper than you know other goods and so not only are taxpayers losing the duties but
 also you know American companies and others who are doing the right thing potentially are losing business not only do companies like Teemu and shin take advantage of this role but it's directly tied to the rapid success of these types of companies if the diminishment's rule was changed it would throw a major
 wrench in team news operations that would be very destructive to Teemu because what it would mean is that Apostles would either have to come into the US and go through full Customs processes which would cost slightly more and more importantly it would take a lot longer to get to the end user or they'd
 have to build out some Warehouse capacity in the US because that comes with a cost attached and it starts to undermine some of that low-cost model which is really important for those low prices and to not just the federal government that concerned about temu some states have taken action over the app itself citing cyber security
 concerns earlier this year Montana banned the app from government devices along with Tick Tock WeChat and Telegram in a statement Montana Governor Greg gianforte said timu along with several other apps are tied to quote foreign adversaries and cited the fact that teamu's parent company pindou is headquartered in
 Shanghai China and those fears are not unfounded pindu o'doul came under increased scrutiny this year when it was pulled off the Google Play Store in March after versions of the app were found to contained malware according to a report from the US government that malware was used to exploit vulnerabilities on Android
 phones accessing users text messages changing settings viewing data from other apps and even blocking users from deleting the app altogether so that begs the question what is Teemu doing with your data so let's recap you downloaded the app scrolled through hundreds of listings decided to take a chance on a 10 smart
 watch it is then made by a team of supplier and sent to a Tina Warehouse in China the warehouse and ships the watch from China to the US paying a grand total of zero dollars at Customs a decent shipped via the US Postal Service to its destination and all of this happens in just about a week so yes we did in fact
 buy a 10 smart watch from temu it took about a week for it to ship from China to us here in New Jersey and yes it really did only cost just around ten dollars first impressions of the box it does look and feel kind of like an Apple box and we know from the ads we saw of the original watch that that was the
 look and feel that this company was trying to replicate but the watch face does look very similar to other smart watches on the market the ring on the side and the buttons are almost identical to that you would find on an Apple Watch the watch straps are also rubber very similar to Apple watches the
 only major visible difference is the charging port while it does have a circular charging port it does require a two-prong charger and the charger itself was very cheaply made the watch also did turn on right away the apps also looked nearly identical the honeycomb effect is very similar to the current operating
 system on Apple watches overall the watch seem to emulate an Apple Watch almost to a tee even the icons for some of the apps internally were almost identical overall it's a pretty good dupe if I was in the market for a smart watch and didn't care about quality I probably would just get this to most people on the street it just looks like
 an Apple watch every app needs a killer application right the killer app here is these Mega variety steep discounts that's what brings them in but they've married product sales with social and they're starting by leveraging the existing social network in North America but they'll create their own social
 network when they release teen payments like they did with pinduodo and China team payments is the viral Catalyst for ignition to Growing this to a billion users Beyond China remember earlier when we said Team who's not worried about sales it's worried about you marketing and e-commerce experts say it's no mistake teemo's spending so much
 money to aggregate a user base many suspect timo's gearing up to launch social shopping here in the US a wildly successful shopping model penduo Duo uses in China pindoujou and China actually takes it to another level they use group buying where you can band together with friends and family in order to earn quantity
 discounts it's referred to as team up priced down this uh social commerce aspect is what allowed them to grow to number three to almost a billion users in China in the U.S Kimu hasn't yet released the team purchasing capability but you can see them laying the foundation for doing so because their social marketing
 experts so as timu continues to grow and expand its user base it could be getting ready to change the shopping experience for us retailers but will U.S consumers bite the potential for social shopping is definitely there and it will grow but it's not going to become the scale that it is in China it's a different type of
 consumer it's a different type of Market but I certainly think it's a sensible thing for timu to add and even if Timo continues to grow its user base can it survive Regulatory and legal scrutiny to continue operating 92 percent of us say that we'll trust a referral from a friend or or a family member and that's
 what social marketing does and so whether or not Teemu is owned by a Chinese company is irrelevant because you're really buying first from the trust and referral from a friend or family based on a socialized promotion and on top of that gosh we'll give you 20 bucks for each one you bring in foreign foreign
 [Music]


11. Is Tesla FSD Finally Full Self-Driving? - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=JuwK-vvvYgY&si=xBDzbc3cC4d_qdIZ

Is Tesla FSD Finally Full Self-Driving? - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JuwK-vvvYgY

 Completely hands free. It reverses. It'll go from  my garage to my destination. It still can't park  completely, but it will go all the way  very close to parking. Nitesh Mehta has been using  Tesla's Full Self-Driving (Supervised) for about three  years. He recently received version  13, which was released in  December and brought several
 new features and  improvements. Now it has to figure out  what to do. I don't know if it can. It  can't make this. So he just gave me the wave, to go. So you can kind of  get a sense that it's interacting with the  physical world. FSD (Supervised) is a  partially automated driving system that uses a series of  cameras and software to
 navigate. Tesla hopes to  upgrade it to turn existing cars into robotaxis. For now, it requires a human  at the wheel, ready to steer or brake at  all times. Tesla's manual says owners  must keep their hands on the wheel while using FSD,  but many drivers ignore that direction. Tesla's  automation features were in
 the spotlight lately as  YouTubers put them to the test. First, with a  controversial video testing Autopilot. Tesla's optical camera  system would absolutely smash through a fake wall. And a similar test with Full  Self-Driving (Supervised) engaged. Does not see the wall. With each run,  I had to slam the brakes.
 It definitely sees the wall. For months, CNBC has been  riding along with Tesla owners who use FSD  (Supervised) to see how the software has evolved over  time. This is very comfortable  driving, right? Like, it's doing a very good job. It's very sophisticated. But it wasn't always this  way. A year ago, no one in my  family,
 if I was driving with  someone else, they refused to be in the car with me if  I had Full Self-Driving. Now they don't care one way  or the other. And despite the  improvements, it still makes mistakes. So the rear wheel just went  over a curb. Now, I've never seen  previous versions of FSD drive over a curb.
 It will often work really  well, particularly in daytime  conditions, but then just randomly on an  a scenario where it did fine previously, it will fail,  and fail in very unpredictable and often very  dangerous ways. It definitely has a way to  go, but the fact that it's able  to go from where it was
 three years ago to today is  insane. On October 10th,  Tesla unveiled a dedicated robotaxi dubbed the  Cybercab, and promoted a future where  cars drive themselves. With autonomy,  you get your time back. It'll save lives,  like a lot of lives. I think we'll see autonomous  cars become ten times safer
 than a human. He's been promising full  automation, being six months to a year  away for over nine years now. It's been consistently  overpromising and under-delivering. While Tesla's approach to  driverless tech has inspired some. No one is coming close to  Tesla's Full Self-Driving. It has alarmed others.
 There has just been a litany  of preventable injuries and deaths. Tesla's reputation has taken  a beating lately, with a global slowdown in  sales, protests around the country, and a volatile stock. With Elon Musk's incendiary  political rhetoric and his work with the Trump  administration, many people
 who were once Tesla owners  or prospective customers have lost interest in the  brand. But Elon Musk continues to  bet it all on automation. This is not some far off  mythical situation. It's literally five,  six months away. As Full Self-Driving  matures, could we finally see Musk's  driverless dreams realized?
 My number one recommendation  for anyone who doubts is simply try it. The only  people who are skeptical are those who have not tried it. FSD is now part of my daily  life. It does lots of things  amazingly well, but the times that it trips  up, you could kill somebody,  or you could hurt yourself. Tesla first released  Autopilot nearly ten years
 ago, and it now offers its  standard on all of its vehicles. In 2020,  it released Full Self-Driving beta,  which brought more automation capabilities,  and in 2024 changed the name to Full Self-Driving  (Supervised). Full Self-Driving,  that has additional capabilities and features  like being able to stop at
 stop signs and traffic  lights, red lights, and also make  turns and navigate you to your destination. SAE International developed  a Levels of Automation standard. In government  correspondence and legal filings, Tesla has referred  to its FSD system as a level two partially automated  driving system,
 requiring the driver to be  attentive and ready to take over. The marketing of some of  these systems can often imply that they're more  capable of driving than they might actually be. They cannot actually drive  themselves, and any safety attributed to  them is there because the human driver is catching all  the mistakes.
 Without a human driver,  they're completely unsafe. At the end of the day,  I'm responsible, right? If something happened now,  it is my fault. Since 2013, Musk has  promoted the idea that one day with a software upgrade, Tesla's EVs will be able to  function as robotaxis. Musk says FSD is a  generalized solution,
 meaning it will eventually  be able to drive anywhere in the world. Tesla collects  data and feedback from owners using FSD on public  roads. We have millions of cars  that are training on driving. With that amount of  training data, it's obviously going to be  much better than what a human could be.
 The company typically pushes  updated versions of the software to its vehicles in  waves, starting with employees,  then expanding to more owners. Currently,  only vehicles manufactured in 2023 and on,  with its Hardware 4 self-driving computer are  able to get the latest FSD version 13, which is  available for purchase for
 $8,000 or as a subscription  for $100 a month. Part of what's aggravating  about the way Tesla does this is that it's not clear  if or when your vehicle will receive the most recent  update. In a series of posts on X,  Tesla outlined a variety of tests it puts every FSD  release through to gauge its
 performance with difficult  traffic scenarios. The company says the track  tests are one of more than ten different validation  methods for FSD. Tesla changed its approach  to self-driving technology in 2024, adopting what's  known as end to end machine learning and replacing its  prior FSD software.
 This is the first version  where you know it is near end to end AI doing it. Because previously it was  like hand code versus AI combination of working on  it. So I think one of the big  difference with version 13 is it's mostly AI doing the  work. Tesla's dedicated robotaxi,  unveiled in October, was reportedly running on  version 13.
 This car runs on V13,  which obviously is now going wide to the larger public. It's a two seater. It's compact,  but it's spacious. They have a lot of legroom. The ride itself,  now that I have FSD 13, it's exactly the same. That was in a very  controlled environment. They had spent who knows how  much time training the
 vehicles on that particular  course. There was no traffic,  none of the normal types of things that you're going to  see in a real world environment. Tesla says FSD is able to  drive itself almost anywhere with minimal driver  intervention and will continuously improve. FSD upgrades can bring new  features and fluctuations in
 quality. I got my Tesla in 2021. It was $5,000 for Tesla's  Full Self-Driving. At the time, the Full  Self-Driving was just more of the highway driving,  very polished, I loved it. A little over a year ago,  or a year and a half ago, they introduced city  streets, and when they introduced it, it was not working well. I  mean,
 you'd be sweating. And then  with FSD 12, it's gotten better on the  city streets than it is on the highway. So it's  flipped. The experience,  I can almost say. Let's think about you have a  baby like three month old and you see them growing  from three month to nine month and ten month,  and you kind of see that,
 you know, growth experience. CNBC experienced early  versions of Tesla's version 12 software last summer. You can see here how it  stopped at the, stopped again,  stopped at the crosswalk. Right. Advanced just like a  driver would to look. And then when it saw there  was traffic coming in its second take, it stopped  again.
 Very, very human behavior to  it. Guy Mangiamele,  a professional test driver for AMCI Testing,  has reviewed several versions of Tesla's FSD. He says he's seen  improvements, but the system is still  making errors that could be deadly or injurious. A lot of traffic. It's going to wait for the  light. So.
 Oh, see? Now that was bad. I had to intervene there. So  it would have hit that motorcyclist. It's just so smooth. It drives like a  professional driver would. You would almost get a  stomach ache before, driving in Full  Self-Driving, because it was jerky. Drivers said FSD performed  well in many scenarios.
 Oh, this is interesting. So  the road is closed. So let's see what it does. It's going to make us turn  right when it wanted to turn left. It's signaling left,  right turn only. It's going to do. Still signaling left,  however. It did comply. That's something that I  think it would not have done in the past. Construction  zones often were
 problematic. What's interesting is the  car has to be, at times, sort of assertive. There are  moments in time where you just have to,  as a driver too, you have to be the first one  to act. And I've been surprised when the car does  that. On our ride with Mangiamele, it still managed to navigate  with ease transitioning to
 an unmarked dirt road. Well, let's see what it  does. Let's see how it does on an unmarked dirt road  like this. I've never had this occur. It doesn't seem to require  the markings. Steering around the bush in the road. But version 13 still  struggled with an issue it did on a previous ride. Look, it wants to go left,  but it can't.
 It can't turn there. No. No. So you see,  it's not looking at it. It sees that there's a  bicycle rack. There's all kinds of stuff  there. So I'm glad we verified that that still  doesn't work. And at one point,  FSD alerted us to take over control when we experienced  a dramatic lighting change. And the hazards? Okay,  I've taken over.
 What was the problem? That may have been from  going from direct sun into shade, when we made that  turn. If I'm driving in sunset or  around that time, there's a sort of way the  sunlight comes in. I think hits the camera and  it blinds it. That's the couple times  where I've taken over. It fails in unpredictable  and inconsistent ways like
 that that make it more  dangerous. Bibhrajit Halder,  who drives a Model S with hardware three,  the previous generation FSD computer, took us on a drive  with the latest version he's received. This is a 2022 car. It has version 12.6 and  that's the latest you can get on hardware three. While Tesla hasn't released  its most advanced software
 to these owners,  he still observed improvements in how FSD  drives. One of the noticeable  difference is that he started to drive like human. Everything has gotten  significantly better. I haven't touched the  steering wheel at all. It is doing AI monitoring  now. So as long as I'm looking  straight, I'm attentive.
 My eyes are open. I'm not  looking around. Then it is going to be okay  if I don't touch the steering wheel. For fans of the technology,  they're optimistic it will get better. It's still quite not there  yet, but it is a lot closer. It feels like it is  happening. It is going to happen soon.  I just don't know what the
 definition of the soon is. I'm so curious to see what  the future is going to hold in five years,  because if they can do this much in three years. I can't imagine what they  can do in the next like five years or so. Tesla's Full Self-Driving  and driver assist systems have been fraught with  controversy.
 The kinds of crashes we see  have a lot to do with the driver not really paying  attention, and the driver monitor not  enforcing attention as much as it should. We certainly  see a lot of those with Tesla. There's a lot more research  coming out showing that people tend to do stuff that  they're not supposed to be
 doing as they get familiar  using these partially automated systems. Tesla has not prioritized  having an adequate driver monitoring system. This  ensures that the driver is awake and generally looking  towards the forward roadway. While they're using this  system. It's quite easy to fool the  Tesla driver monitoring
 system, and it's been  historically very permissive to let drivers not really  pay a lot of attention while it's operating. And we've  seen fatalities because of this. We know that there have been  deaths, and we know that there have been hundreds of  of injury events, and it's incredibly  underreported.
 Tesla's partially automated  driving systems have also been the subject of numerous  lawsuits. Brett Schreiber is  representing plaintiffs in four separate lawsuits  against Tesla. The suits allege that  Autopilot and FSD are defective and unsafe,  and contributed to fatalities and catastrophic  injury.
 Tesla's driver assist  systems have also been the topic of federal  investigations. In every case that I have  handled and am handling currently, the driver has  believed the narrative. In one of my cases involving  a young 15 year old boy who lost his life when his  parents vehicle was struck by a Tesla operating on Full  Self-Driving.
 The driver was a Tesla  employee. He fundamentally believed  that the vehicle was safer than a human driver. He has testified under oath  in that regard. Tesla's marketing was  challenged in Europe, forcing it to change the  name. In the United States, it added Supervised to the  name. In China, Tesla renamed FSD  to Intelligent Assisted
 Driving. Some of the naming of these  technologies or their functionalities can be  confusing. A lot of people are  struggling to understand what these systems can and  cannot do. A report from the National  Highway Traffic Safety Administration and the  Office of Defects Investigation highlighted  several instances in which
 Tesla, despite emphasizing  its vehicles are not autonomous and require the  driver to remain in full control, have reposted or  endorsed postings on the social media platform X,  where drivers exhibit disengaged behavior. Adding, these posts show  lost opportunities to temper enthusiasm for a new product  with cautions on its proper
 use with the points that  Tesla has made to us. And then when they get sued  over it, the entire defense is,  but you see, on the 92nd page of the 122  page owner's manual, that is nine screens in on  the user interface, we have a disclaimer. What  we say is, you can't shout the claim  and whisper the disclaimer.
 Tesla has responded in the  past to lawsuits that alleged its systems were  flawed and caused fatal or injurious crashes by saying  that the driver's own negligent acts and or  omissions were to blame for collisions, and that  reliance on any representation made by  Tesla, if any, was not a  substantial factor in
 causing harm to drivers or  passengers. Experts have also criticized  Tesla for putting what they describe as experimental  software in the hands of untrained consumers. They use our public  roadways, and they use members of the  public, as the guinea pigs for their  research and development. Putting experimental  software into the hands of
 average consumers that are  not trained in how to properly evaluate it,  I think it's dangerous. I think that beta testing by  retail customers should be completely banned on public  roads. Tesla did not respond to  CNBC's multiple requests for comment. For FSD users,  a point of concern has been compatibility with older  hardware.
 Since 2016, Tesla has said  all its vehicles built going forward have the hardware to  enable self-driving. But during Tesla's 2024 Q4  earnings call, Musk conceded that hardware  three, a previous generation of its  FSD computer, might not be capable of  Unsupervised Full Self-Driving and said it  would offer free upgrades
 for customers who bought FSD  on vehicles made before 2023. We're going to have to  upgrade people's hardware three computer for those  that have bought Full Self-Driving, and that's  going to be painful and difficult, but we'll get it  done. The version four compute  hardware is pretty substantially different.  It's a lot more work to
 upgrade from version three  to version four, and it's going to be very  costly for Tesla. Many of the vehicles that he  promised level five self-driving on will not  ever be able to do that. And perhaps most important  when it comes to this technology - safety. Tesla has argued its  Autopilot and FSD software
 will improve safety. We're looking for safety  level that is significantly above the average human  driver. The standard has to be very  high, because the moment there's any kind of accident  with an autonomous car, this immediately gets  worldwide headlines. We have yet to see a clear  indication that it has any
 safety benefit above and  beyond those safety features like AEB or blind spot  detection or lane departure prevention. While we are flawed as human  drivers, we are actually pretty good  at this incredibly complex task. We can drive half a  million miles without crashing. It's pretty hard  to beat that.
 In April of 2023,  Tesla published its impact Report for 2022,  featuring safety numbers related to FSD. But experts have challenged  the data. For the year they're  reporting for, 2022. For the bulk of that year,  only drivers who had a high safety score were allowed to  even use FSD. So you're just kind of  filtering out your most
 dangerous drivers. So I was  really excited when the next safety report came out  covering 2023 to see, once you had everybody in  there, what's it look like? And of course,  they didn't cover FSD data that year. For more accurate safety  data, Goodall advocates for more  transparency from all automakers and more  involvement from regulators.
 NHTSA has a massive  regulatory power that they don't exercise very often. I  don't know why. They have the ability to get a lot of  this data. Tesla has the most  sophisticated telematics out of any automaker on the  market right now. Because there's no federal  requirement for automakers to report what was happening  in the event of a crash,
 it gets really difficult to  understand what really is going on with crashes where  these systems have been implicated. Tesla already does quite  well at this Supervised self-driving. I'm sure  there's people in the crowd you're using that. Yeah. So we'll move from  Supervised Full Self-Driving to Unsupervised Full  Self-Driving.
 Where the car,  you could fall asleep and wake up at your destination. On Tesla's 2024 fourth  quarter earnings call, Musk reiterated his  expectation that Unsupervised Full  Self-Driving would be ready this year and indicated its  initial fleet owned launch will start small,  as it works to refine its
 operations. We just want to be,  put a toe in the water, make sure everything is  okay, then put a few more toes in the water,  then put a foot in the water. With safety of the  general public as and those in the car as our top  priority. With service expanding to  other regions by the end of the year.
 I'm very confident we'll  have released Unsupervised Full Self-Driving,  fully autonomous Teslas in Austin and several other  cities in America by the end of this year. Probably  everywhere in America next year, and everywhere in  North America at least. I think in terms of next  year, our constraint,  I think, is likely to be
 just regulatory. And added that Tesla owners  will be able to add their own vehicles to the robotaxi  fleet next year. The idea of putting this  system out as a robotaxi without safety drivers is  extremely dangerous. I've seen no evidence that  this is anywhere close to being ready to be used in an  unsupervised form.
 The company has started  testing its dedicated robotaxi, the Cybercab in  Texas according to Tesla's design leader Franz von  Holzhausen, Texas' regulation of  autonomous vehicles is far more lax than in other  states. California is somewhat quite  a long regulatory approval process. Texas is a lot  faster,
 so we'll definitely have it  available in Texas. Tesla also recently attained  the first in a series of permits it will eventually  need to start a driverless ride hail service in  California. California, that's probably  going to be the toughest place for them to get  approval to operate their vehicles. Texas,  there's effectively no real
 regulation on robotaxis  there. So it makes it very easy for  Tesla to go in and start there. Tesla recently showed off  the way it uses FSD within the confines of its own  property to move fully assembled vehicles from the  factory to a delivery lot. The cars are actually  programed with what lane they need to park into to be  picked up for delivery.
 There is little to no  federal regulation for autonomous vehicles. We have to take a driving  test and prove that we actually know how to operate  a vehicle. We have none of that in the  United States for automated driving systems. We need to  develop some motor vehicle safety standards for  automated driving systems.
 At a minimum,  do the equivalent of a human driving test,  ideally go well beyond that? We all kind of thought NHTSA  would really step up and take over. And instead,  I think a lot of the states have been kind of doing  stuff that they feel like they should do. Meanwhile, Waymo launched  fully autonomous cabs in San
 Francisco, Los Angeles,  Austin and Phoenix, with more cities coming  soon. Until Tesla has autonomous  vehicles that are safe to use without a driver at the  wheel, safety experts would like to  see better safeguards put in place. We're terrible being a  passive supervisor, just watching and waiting to  intervene.
 It's much better for these  safeguards to keep you actively engaged in the  driving because that also helps you use the technology  more appropriately. But with Musks deadlines  looming, Tesla will be under pressure  to deliver. The first 90% of the problem  takes 10% of the effort, and the last 10% takes 90%  of the effort.
 My guess is that if they  launch something in June, it will not be driverless. It will have safety drivers  on board. We have been extremely  skeptical about the ability to do what Tesla's engineers  set out to do, using only cameras. They have come very,  very far. But is there a long way to  go? Absolutely.
 When people look back on  2025 and the launch, I think they may regard it  as the biggest year in Tesla history.


12. How Employees Are Coffee Badging To Avoid Full Days At The Office - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=mJG4MdepNSA&si=qlWJWXf2ewi686ux

How Employees Are Coffee Badging To Avoid Full Days At The Office - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mJG4MdepNSA

 Meet Mr. A. Every morning, Mr. A strolls into the office at 9am, swiping his badge with perfect enthusiasm. He hits a few meetings, grabs coffee with colleagues, and keeps the daily buzz going. But here's the twist, come noon, he sneaks out, heading home to wrap up his work in comfort. By around five, he's
 clocked out.  Mission accomplished! Mr. A has redefined the nine to five in his own terms. And interestingly, this trend also has a name. A new trend emerging in the back to office push, and that is coffee badging. Coffee badging is two worlds colliding. It's employers wanting to get their workers back into the office, and
 employees desire to really have more flexibility on the job, and so that's coming together in this trend of coffee badging. Coffee badging is happening because workers are using this as a soft revolt against their return to office mandates that companies have put out. And they just like badge in, have a
 coffee, check in with their colleagues, do some work, and then leave their office early. It is a silent protest of saying, I just want to be home. Coffee badging was a term that Owl Labs coined as part of its 2023, state of hybrid work report. And what we found was, is that employees weren't necessarily returning to the
 office in a traditional eight to five manner, five days a week, but they were coffee badging. Some were going in just to show face, grab a cup of coffee, say hi to some of their colleagues, maybe their boss, so that they could check the box for their company's return to office mandate, whereas others were
 going into the office for different periods of time, maybe for reasons that the office offered them luxuries that the home environment didn't, which is access to technology, which was meeting with colleagues or being in in person meetings. A lot of the workplace trends that we're seeing right now are
 very much reflective of what's happening in the overall job market. The overall US economy is performing well, but the job market is cooling. A closer look at the monthly job creation over the past two years reveals the broader trend with the labor market adding just 227,000 jobs in November. Some experts note
 that workplace trends often mirror the job market. During the pandemic, when workers demand was high, quietquitting became the dominant workplace theme. But now, as the job market is tighter, particularly for white collar jobs, coffee badging is trending. Workplace trends reflect what's happened in the job market,
 largely because you can tell who has the power. During COVID, the employees had the power. Employers were scared to death of losing employees, and it was a tight job market, and it was very difficult to get qualified employees in the door. These days, the employer has the power, because even though the
 job market, fundamentally is still good, it's not nearly as strong as it used to be, so employees can't job hop the way that they did two or three years ago. Now, from the perspective of the employer, it's look, we gave you your time now it's our time. You're going to come back to the office, and if you don't
 like it, you can go elsewhere. Dynamics that we saw in the labor force a couple of years ago were very unusual. The issue is that we had much fewer workers, and lot of power had really shifted towards employees and away from employers in the workforce relationship. That's one of the reasons we saw quiet quitting because there was just
 a lot of demand for workers, and people weren't that worried about losing their jobs in that kind of an environment, whereas now we have an environment that's much more balanced. Productivity has long been a contentious issue for supporters and critics of remote work with mixed results and studies measuring its impact. For instance, October 2024 research
 from the Bureau of Labor Statistics found that productivity increased with the rise of remote work across 61 private sector industries from 2019 to 2021. However, a major july 2023 study by Stanford's Institute for Economic Policy Research reported that fully remote work is linked to about 10% lower productivity than fully in person work.
 So studies are not clear on whether remote work makes you more or less productive. There is mixed evidence there, but there are perceptions that coming together can increase productivity. The reason there's no clear answer on this one is because it's incredibly hard to measure how remote work is impacting
 productivity. So it really depends on the job. It depends on the skill and the task that you're trying to complete, what industry you're in, what kind of worker you are. That makes it incredibly hard to get an exact answer to is remote work good or bad for productivity? When I look at the relationship between at homework versus in
 the office working as it relates to productivity, I have a different perspective than a lot of people, because I'm not going to debate, you know, the empirical numbers. I'm going to simply say one thing, productivity is ultimately in the eyes of the beholder. Who has the power? In the case of the company, if the company is paying your salary, the company
 is giving you a paycheck, and the company says, in order to justify your productivity, you need to be in the office. You have to be in the office. The fact is that bosses like to have people on the premises. I've spent most of my career as an editor and editor in chief, and I like to have people in the office. And there's something to
 be said. I totally am very empathetic to the idea of culture and mentorship and creativity and all of those things. But that said, there is a reason why hybrid remote work remains so prevalent, and the reason is that it works. News reports of companies mandating in person work have been dominating headlines recently, with studies also
 highlighting crackdowns on the coffee badging trend. Owl labs data shows 44% of hybrid employees still coffee badge. That's down 24% from 2023. Meanwhile, 70% of coffee badgers have been caught with 16% now forced to be in office for the full day. Interestingly, some companies are also using badge data or swipe data as a tool to promote demote or even lay off
 employees. So I wrote a book called the algorithm about how AI is used in the workforce, you know, to hire people, but also to monitor employees. And one of the folks that I talked to was an analyst at Gartner, one of the companies he was working with, what they did is they looked at like, you know, we want to find the people
 that we haven't really promoted before. How can we do this? So this company came up with this idea to look at badge data. So the people who badged in early and badged out late, who had, like, very long hours at the desk were supposed to be more promotable than others. The unfortunate thing about that
 company was also, when their pandemic hit and they started to have to do layoffs, they wanted to look at this kind of badging in, badging out data to understand who are the people that leave early, that have the fewest hours in the seats. And they were going to look at those to lay off. The push by some companies against flexible work is
 apparent in job postings with fewer remote roles. LinkedIn data shows flexible work stabilizing at one in five listings since November 2023 down from a peak of over one in four between October 2022 and march of 2023. Indeed, chart also shows a decline in remote and hybrid job listings since their 2022 peak. As the world reopened post pandemic,
 Corporate America shifted its stance on remote work. Companies like Amazon now mandate employees to return to the office five days a week or risk losing their jobs. Amazon's cloud chief, Matt Garman, saying during an all hands meeting that staffers who don't agree with the policy well, they can leave. According to the transcript that was
 viewed by CNBC, he said the following in quotes - "If there are people who just don't work well in that environment and don't want to, that is okay, there are other companies around." You know, there are a lot of employers, I'm saying, small to midsize employers, who are waiting on a juggernaut like
 Amazon to officially go ahead and push for it with a five day work policy, because their bank account is basically the size of a small country's account. And this is just an Amazon attitude is, if you don't like it, go someplace else. Other employer, and I'm hearing this behind closed doors, employers are
 really happy that Amazon's pushing this, because if Amazon's doing it now, we can follow suit. I don't think that the five day work week is something that you're gonna seegenerally. The fact that Amazon has opted to go that direction doesn't necessarily mean that everybody is going to move in lockstep with what they did.
 One of the reasons employers can get more workers back into the office because there just isn't as much mobility as there was a few years ago. You don't see as many workers moving. And in fact, two and five workers tell us that they feel stuck in their job. Amazon, who's now mandating all of their employees come back
 five days a week, and employees have been up in arms about that. They don't want that. They want to keep their flexibility. It remains to be seen if this is going to have a huge ripple effect, if other employers are going to mandate the same thing. CNBC reached out to Amazon regarding its five day office
 work policy. The company stated that the policy was needed to ensure that its team stays connected to invent, collaborate and deliver the best results for its customers and business. The push against remote work isn't limited to companies. Elon Musk and Vivek Ramaswamy, co-leaders of the so called department of government efficiency are proposing a five
 day in office work week for federal employees, raising doubts about the future of flexible work and the coffee badging trend. Yeah, when I look at the future of flexible work, here's what I see, depending on the industry, flexible work might be the thing to be. You know, if you happen to work in a technological
 industry, you can work remotely. It doesn't necessarily require that you to come in the office. Versus if you're in a human resources function, if you're a warehouse function, if you're in something Director of Operations, that's going to force you to continue to come into work, because you need to be hands on. So what we're essentially going to see in the
 future, the future is going to look a lot like the past. It's very clear when you look at the data on LinkedIn that employees prefer flexible work, so they're going to be looking for those hybrid options, those remote options, wherever they can get them, and they're going to be looking to make work work
 for them, as they did during the pandemic. I think the coffee badging phenomenon is indicative of the type of adjustments that we're going to see going forward, as we see a normalization of the relationship between employees and employers and expectations about whether people will be working at home or whether they'll be working in the
 office. So I think that it perhaps a symptom of that those types of adjustments as workers kind of seek out what the appropriate norms with their employers, and as employees kind of seek out just how much engagement they need with their employees to have them be productive and well connected to their enterprise.
 Coffee badging exists and will continue to exist because employees are looking for that level of flexibility to be able to choose the environment that allows them to be most productive, and it gives them the best flexibility, but it is also a way for them to be able to meet the return to office mandate that their company has.


13. The Business Strategies Behind McDonald’s, Aldi, 7-Eleven and More | WSJ The Economics Of - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=aatEQRJK6ms&si=_2m0M8UZw8fXlips
The Business Strategies Behind McDonald’s, Aldi, 7-Eleven and More | WSJ The Economics Of - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aatEQRJK6ms

 - [Narrator] Hyper-local regional specialties, no-frill shopping layouts and updated drive-through models. These are just a few business strategies driving some of the most talked about companies today. "The Wall Street Journal" dives into the surprising tactics brands use to capture consumer attention,
 starting with Aldi, one of the cheapest and fastest growing grocery chains in the US, thriving by doing more with less. This half gallon of whole milk from Aldi costs $2.18, eggs, 1.87, bread, 1.29. Aldi is the fastest growing grocer by store count in the country, and its no-frills approach has also made it one
 of the cheapest. For the past decade, it's been growing at a rate of about 100 stores per year, and when an economic downturn hits, it thrives. - It's about simplicity, and it's about efficiency, and it's about consistent experience all the time. - [Narrator] This is "The Economics of Aldi." So how does the company keep its prices so low?
 Take its store setup. - You walk in and the moment you step foot in our store, you can see all four walls. - [Narrator] Aldi's are typically around 12,000 square feet, about the same as a Trader Joe's, and much smaller than the average supermarket. Operating a smaller space saves money when buying the property, on the lease and on utilities.
 - The layout at Aldi's is as much designed for our operational efficiency as anything, and so, being very specific about the amount of footsteps it takes to service our store and a very limited store size allows us to operate a very efficient operation and that creates a lot of value. - [Narrator] To further its efficiency,
 Aldi doesn't have extra services, like a customer help desk, a fresh bakery or butcher, and its stocks significantly fewer products. Supermarkets typically carry around 31,000 products. Trader Joe's has about 4,000. But Aldi stocks about 1,600. Often, there are just three to five employees on the sales floor, so having fewer items
 and leaving them in the boxes they were delivered in means employees spend less time stocking shelves. These cost-cutting strategies are critical to Aldi's profit margin, and they're why the company is able to offer items that are cheaper than the national average. But they also serve another purpose.
 They help maintain Aldi's image as a discount store. Customers make compensatory inferences. Basically, marketing experts say when people see an item's price, they quickly make assumptions about the product. If it's cheap, they may assume it's lower quality, which is why Aldi's no-frill strategy is so effective.
 From the moment customers put quarters in their carts and walk into the store, they can see all the ways Aldi reduces cost. Marketing experts say these tactics all signal to the customer that milk, eggs and bread are cheaper at Aldi because of its efficiency rather than its quality. Though the results of its cost-cutting strategies
 aren't always popular with customers. In a survey of roughly 6,500 people, Aldi scored on par with or slightly lower than many of its peers in categories like store cleanliness and item availability. But there's another key tactic grocers use to aid their low cost images. Known value items. These are staple household products
 whose prices people often remember. As Aldi has expanded across the country, other grocers have reduced their prices in response, particularly on these types of items. - When Aldi comes in, it prompts other retailers to look at their prices again and kind of, you know, surgically examine how to adjust
 what they sell and for how much. - [Narrator] That's because when people see lower prices for staple goods, they infer that the business offers low prices all around. And when it comes to value for dollar, Aldi ranked highest in the customer survey at 96%. But stores can only compete on price so much
 without hurting their profit margins. So what does Aldi use other than price point to draw in customers? Its private label items. 90% of Aldi's stock is private label. Like its other strategies, this reduces cost for the company. - We take all of our buying power and we put it into the seven most popular
 or common salad dressings that a customer might buy. That allows us to deal directly with manufacturers and make sure that we get the best cost price. - [Narrator] Analysts say that Trader Joe's uses private label items to differ from competitors by creating items that customers can only find there,
 like its Ube Mochi Pancake Mix and Butternut Squash Mac and Cheese. But at Aldi, you'll find private label items that look quite similar to the most well-known national brands. Instead of Wheat Thins, Aldi has Thin Wheat. According to analysts, this is because Aldi wants customers to think they're essentially getting the same product
 but at a significant discount. - There was a time when the perception was, you know, they're generic brand and, you know, they're just cheaper, but not as good as the national brands, and those days are over. - [Narrator] As consumers felt the lasting impacts of inflation, sales of store brand products increased.
 From 2018 to 2022, there was a 34% increase in industry-wide private label sales totaling more than $57 billion. - While some other grocers might have private label offerings, this is the existence of what we do. - [Narrator] Aldi has thrived during recessions. The 2008 financial crisis sparked its growth
 and decision to add around 100 new stores per year. - What was really interesting is we never lost any of those customers. And as the economy improved and we had a really long run of economic improvement, Aldi grew throughout that entire period of time. - [Narrator] And now as inflation drains Americans' wallets,
 Aldi continues to grow. - In the beginning, that was sort of their target audience, people who, you know, wanted bargains and wanted to buy food for low prices. But in recent years, I think they've really expanded that audience to also go after people who want convenience shopping, who want the necessities and wanna be in and out of stores.
 (whimsical music) - [Narrator] Meal kit companies set out to disrupt grocery stores and change the way we cook at home. Now, there's 382 of them in the US, almost a 3,000% increase from a decade ago when there were just 13. Despite industry-wide growth, the meal kit model faces an obstacle. You. Of all the people who tried one of five
 major meal delivery services in 2022, about 90% canceled their subscription by the end of the year. - Human behavior is very fickle, especially when it comes to food and beverage. - [Narrator] And now Blue Apron, one of the earliest players, is selling. This is "The Economics of Meal Kits." This graph shows the share of sales in the US
 between the major meal kit companies in 2022. Sunbasket and Marley Spoon Inc. have 2% and 3%. Blue Apron and Home Chef took 6% and 12% while HelloFresh and its subsidiaries ate up 78%. But no matter their size, many of these companies use the same key ingredients to find and keep customers: price point, convenience, and variety.
 First, get the customer. Meal kit companies focus a lot on the price per meal. - [Participant] Here's how I make fancy meals for under $5. - [Narrator] Get a $1.49 per meal. - Our biggest competitor are the offline grocers. - [Narrator] Which is why HelloFresh and Home Chef say it's cheaper to buy meal kits than to buy groceries.
 - Wherever you source the ingredients to do home cooking from scratch yourself, that's our competition in some way. - [Narrator] But what makes that possible? - It's all about economies of scale. - [Narrator] Brian Choi has done market research on the food and beverage industry for 15 years, and he says that when it comes to keeping prices low
 for the consumer, grocery stores have an advantage over most meal kit companies because of the volume of product they handle daily. But similarly, the meal kit companies that are best positioned to offer the lowest price point for consumers are the biggest ones, like HelloFresh. - Economies of scale allow us to get better pricing
 to get a better margin on the product and then to reinvest parts of that margin either into a better customer experience or into lower pricing, - [Narrator] Which means that at times the company can compete on price with grocers, but on a per meal basis, buying the ingredients yourself from a grocery store still
 tends to be cheaper, especially considering that you can always buy fewer ingredients or go for cheaper options, whereas the minimum you could spend on HelloFresh and Blue Apron in a week is $60.95. $12.49 cents per meal, at least before discounts. - It's sometimes hard to get people over the purchase barrier.
 That's why incentives are a key part of our marketing or growth playbook. For every dollar that we spend on getting that group of customers, it takes us about six months to actually earn that dollar that we invested back. - [Narrator] Which makes the next step all the more important: keeping the customer.
 These are the customer retention rates for the same five meal kit companies in 2022. In less than a year, they all lost the vast majority of the new customers that bought their first meal kits in January. One possible reason everyone drops off: the discounts. - They're doing their own mental calculus.
 They're like, "Wow, $12 meal is very different from the $4, you know, based on the promotional rate." - [Narrator] When you introduce a product to someone at a severe discount, you may get more people to try it, but when the discount goes away and they have to pay full price, it may not be worth that new price to them.
 - One thing about the American consumer is they don't like dramatic change in prices. - [Narrator] So how do companies get retention rates up? One way is to offer the discounts again and hope that they entice customers to return, and another is to add more convenience and variety. - The biggest value proposition is the convenience.
 - [Narrator] The big thing meal kits offer to consumers is a convenient way to cook at home. They ship to your door and give you pre-portioned ingredients for relatively simple recipes. - But when you stack that versus the other options that are available for consumers, the collective value proposition
 has diminished significantly. - [Narrator] With restaurants and grocery stores offering delivery to your door, it's hard for meal kits to offer a unique convenience to customers and getting pre-portioned ingredients may be more convenient if you want to cook for yourself, but Americans only cook an average
 of 4.5 meals at home per week. But companies across the meal kit industry are expanding their offerings, and one of the common ones isn't a meal kit at all. It's just pre-made meals. - [Announcer] Factor has chefs cook meals for you and then they deliver them fresh to your house. - [Participant] They have oven ready meals
 with everything included and fast and fresh meals that can be done in 15 minutes. - As you grow your customer base and you grow your assortment, you also tend to give customers a lot more choice. - [Narrator] And more choice means you're more likely to get customers to spend more with your company. But it's yet to be seen how much these new offerings
 will increase retention rates across meal kit companies. Plus, retention rates aren't everything. Looking back at this chart, Blue Apron sits slightly above the rest, which Choi says may be because it offers slightly more options and customization. But Blue Apron's revenue has declined greatly since 2017.
 Then, there's profit. Both HelloFresh and Blue Apron got off the ground by raising hundreds of millions of dollars in funding. In 2017, they both went public. Then their paths split. Blue Apron's revenue has slowly declined with just a slight increase during the industry's pandemic boom. HelloFresh, on the other hand,
 has been consistently profitable since 2017. Looking at its revenue, you see constant growth, even after the pandemic shutdowns ended and people could eat at restaurants again. - Once you establish yourself as the leader in that space, it becomes very, very hard to be disrupted because you need to solve a lot of complex problems
 over and over again to get to that position. - [Narrator] While both faced stark drops in their share prices, the New York Stock Exchange threatened to de-list Blue Apron after its stock dipped below a dollar. The company shifted to an asset light model, scaling down and offloading many of its operations
 to another company. Then it announced its selling to Wonder Group, a food delivery startup, and returned to being a private company. Another key step is to differentiate. The barriers to enter the meal kit industry are fairly low, which is partly why there are so many meal kit companies today. - But the barriers to scale and build a big business
 are actually really high. - [Narrator] And why it's important for each one to stand out if it wants to survive. Take Methodology, a small meal delivery company that started in 2015. It doesn't offer meal kits at all. Instead, Methodology sends out four or five days worth of pre-made meals with ingredients you're less likely
 to find in other kits like, nopales cacti and purslane. - Our audience is basically who I was when I started the business. They're really time starved, so they don't have time to cook healthy meals on weeknights. And as far as their incomes, most are making in the several hundred thousands, if not more than that.
 - [Narrator] Most other companies compete at a price point around $8 to $15 per serving without discounts. But Methodology costs around 17 to $30 per meal. - Our sweet spot actually is men who live on takeout 'cause they're already doing it three to four times a week minimum. They're spending 35 on average per meal.
 - [Narrator] And it doesn't offer discounts at nearly the same rate as the other companies. The average discount for Methodology kit is 10% off a customer's first week. Nguyen says this model has allowed the company to be profitable from year two. - We have customers who have spent over $100,000 with us
 because we really are a lifestyle for our target customer. - We're operating in one of the largest consumer categories out there, which is food at home. So in my view, a large category will always attract sort of like new business models, new entrants in the category and so on. - [Narrator] Grand View Research forecasts
 that the revenue across the US meal kit industry will reach $64.27 billion by 2030. - Do I believe the numbers? I think they're probably a little bit too optimistic. - I don't know what the food industry will look like in five or 10 years, but I do think that we can play a really big role in shaping the future of the food industry.
 - I think in 10 years we'll probably see one or two major players in the industry still operating in that space. I'll also expect to see some companies that have gone bankrupt or acquired by some of the larger players. - [Narrator] This Sweetgreen salad starts at 14.95. Add avocado and it goes to 16.95.
 But even as it's sold millions of these bowls to customers, Sweetgreen has been losing millions of dollars a month. With over 200 locations, Sweetgreen is a fast casual restaurant trying to broaden the fast food market to include salads made with fresh ingredients. But building the infrastructure and logistics
 to accomplish this goal hasn't come cheap. - We're not that fancy yet. - They've always sort of branded themselves as a tech company, and so they talked a lot about changing the food system. At one point they said that they wanted to be the McDonald's of better eating. Now, they've had to translate some of those lofty ambitions
 into reality and that's challenging. - [Narrator] This is "The Economics of Sweetgreen." Sweetgreen brought in hundreds of millions in investment before going public in November 2021. In an SEC filing, it reported having about 1.35 million active customers. After its IPO, its stock surged to bring the company's value
 to over $6 billion. - I'm obsessed. - [Narrator] But its market cap has since fallen to almost 1/4 of that. While individual Sweetgreen locations are profitable, the company has struggled to overcome high overhead costs. In its last quarterly report, the company announced net losses of more than $27 million.
 - [Employee] Hi, what I can get started for you? - [Narrator] The company's costs begin with its salads. - There's a few things that drive the cost off of what we do. We buy really, really high quality food from farmers we know and trust. - [Narrator] Most restaurants source their food through distributors which give them access to a wide range
 of food at low prices. And on top of that, these distributors handle the transportation logistics. Sweetgreen, on the other hand, works directly with farms. Another major cost is labor. Sweetgreen has staff assembled meals and also do a significant amount of food prep. - Most restaurants process their food centrally
 and ship it out around the country. In order to maximize the taste and the freshness, we believe food should be made closer to where the guests are eating their food. So we actually make our food every day in our fresh prep kitchen. - [Narrator] Beyond restaurant level expenses, Sweetgreen has also put a lot of money into technology.
 - We've built out from just having a pickup channel to building our own native delivery, partnering with some marketplaces and even building catering and our outpost business. We've also been able to integrate machine learning and AI in order to personalize a lot of the recommendations that we give you
 as well as things like our loyalty program. - [Narrator] Sweetgreen hasn't just built tech for customers, it's also built apps for employees to plan out how much food to make at different times of day so food is fresh but ready when they expect customers. - I would say that the founders are trying to be more disciplined now.
 They've also earned a lot in stock compensation and I think there is certain amount of tech alignment thinking there, but, you know, they are coming down to earth a bit and trying to trim expenses where they can and try to become more efficient. But, again, it's gonna take time. - [Narrator] The question is how to do that
 without changing the parts of the business that customers care about. - Our path to profitability in a net income basis comes from a few lovers. The first is continuing to grow our footprint. This year we're opening about 35 new restaurants. Second is growing sales in existing stores where a huge portion of that increase goes
 to lifting the profitability of those restaurants. The third is being very disciplined on our cost structure to make sure that the incremental profit we're making is flowing through the bottom line. - [Narrator] Sweetgreen has closed some restaurants in cities like Boston and New York. It's also had some layoffs.
 - One of the challenges for the business has clearly been the pandemic and the recovery from the pandemic. - [Narrator] In 2019, Sweetgreen stores were concentrated in urban centers, but recently it's been focused on expanding outside cities. - I think we're going to continue to build out in the markets that we currently operate in
 and looking to open up one or two new markets a year for the next several years. - [Narrator] Sweetgreen recently hired two former Chipotle executives to help make its menu appeal to a wider range of customers, especially as it expands past major cities. That's important because its path to profitability centers
 on having enough profitable restaurants to offset overhead. To make each restaurant more profitable, it's also counting on increasing loyalty and leveraging technology. Sweetgreen has experimented with loyalty programs for years and its most recent effort is something called Sweetpass. There are a few tiers in the program.
 In the paid version of Sweetpass, customers pay $10 per month to get $3 off one salad per day. So a customer would have to spend at least $40 on salads per month to come out ahead. - In general, restaurants are really pushing these loyalty programs because it makes a lot of sense to try to get someone hooked.
 You know, it's harder to advertise to a new customer than it is to try to just keep current one coming. But, you know, if you're going to eat that every day for lunch, that is gonna add up. - [Narrator] Sweetgreen hasn't shared how many people have signed up for its loyalty program, which it still considers a pilot.
 Another key strategy moving forward is automation. In 2021, Sweetgreen bought Spice Food Co, a startup that makes automated food assembly lines. And earlier this year it opened its first so-called Infinite Kitchen in Naperville, Illinois, where salads are assembled robotically. That enabled it to hire 1/3 fewer staff
 without sacrificing efficiency. Sweetgreen plans to continue rolling this out to new locations and hopes to retrofit an existing location in late 2024. - Probably the biggest improvement for our customers is much faster throughput. Typically, you can order your salad and have it ready in under three minutes,
 even in a very busy store. - We believe what this will allow us to do is provide a superior economic model. This will significantly impact and improve our unit economics, which will allow us to continue to scale in a profitable way and over time may even give us some pricing power as we think about creating healthy food
 that is truly accessible for everyone. - [Narrator] Sweetgreen has made some progress towards profitability. Last quarter the company announced it was profitable for the first time. Though this comes with some qualifications. Sweetgreen is only profitable based on a measure called EBITDA, which excludes a variety of costs
 such as taxes, acquisition costs, restructuring costs, and stock-based compensation. It's a measure that's popular with tech companies, but doesn't follow generally accepted accounting principles. - It's a pretty heavy list of things that aren't included, but by doing this, I mean they can say that they just had their first profitable quarter,
 which is in Q2, and they wanna show some progress to investors and I think that does show a certain magnitude of progress, but it's not all the way there. - [Narrator] The company though is confident that it can become a national business based on three things. It creates a new category in the market,
 has capital to expand, and maintains a loyal customer base. - We see Sweetgreen as having all three of those ingredients as we move forward. - You know, I think there will continue to be challenges as we scale, whether it be how we scale our supply chain, how we scale our technology, how we scale our leadership,
 but I think the big thing is proving that this type of offering can work all around the country. - I think they're pretty honest that they're trying to become a more mature business now and, you know, for a young company founded by young founders, that makes sense that that's a little bumpy. - [Narrator] Shake Shack has always made it clear,
 it isn't fast food. Everything is made to order and that customization means customers have to wait. But as Shake Shack expands, it seems to be taking a lot of ideas from fast food. It's building drive-throughs, adding rest stop locations and installing ordering kiosks. As Shake Shack tries to compete in spaces
 traditionally dominated by fast food, it's got to speed up operations because many customers expect to get their food quickly. But this is a major challenge for a company built on a guarantee of fresh cooked meals every time. This is "The Economics of Shake Shack." Long lines have been part of Shake Shack's DNA
 from the beginning. - When they first started this popup roadside hot dog and restaurant stand in Madison Square Park, there was lines, so it really had this kind of cult vibe around it in New York. - [Narrator] But as Shake Shack continues to expand, it has to speed up. - We want it to be a little more convenient,
 we want to be a little more consistent on our speed and our execution. - [Narrator] A big part of this initiative is drive-through. That's been a major priority for Shake Shack since the pandemic dampened walk-in business in some of its main markets. Shake Shack has opened more than 30 drive-through locations
 in the past few years, and it's planning to build about a dozen more this year. - Have a good one, alright. Take care. - [Narrator] Drive-throughs can be significantly more profitable than dine-in service because customers cycle through the restaurant faster and they do big business. McDonald's, for instance, does about 70%
 of its multi-billion dollar US business from drive-through. - They can be very efficient, you can do a lot of sales quickly. There's not the expense of maintaining a dining room in the same way, so you really save in certain ways. Particularly, if you can get the volumes of people who are able to go through your drive-through at peak.
 - [Narrator] This has led lots of companies to get into the drive-through business, and they compete fiercely over wait times. Taco Bell, for instance, has a four-lane drive-through outside Minneapolis with dedicated pickup points for mobile orders and delivery drivers. Chick-fil-A has used so-called upstream ordering for years
 where staff come out with tablets and take orders in person. That avoids a bottleneck of customers waiting to reach the menu board all to save precious seconds. According to Mystery Shopper data, Taco Bell and McDonald's drive-throughs had total wait times of about four to seven minutes, which includes the time you're waiting to order, ordering,
 paying, and then receiving the food. Shake Shack doesn't disclose wait times for its drive-throughs, but it's said on past earning calls that just filling orders typically takes it around six to eight minutes. Decreasing wait time has been a major initiative for the company. - We do a couple of things a little bit differently
 in our drive-throughs than we do in our restaurants. It's not compromising the cook fresh, but it is really on the technology side. - [Narrator] They start cooking orders as soon as customers place them, rather than waiting until they pay. - Hello, how are we doing today? - [Narrator] Similar to Chick-fil-A,
 they sometimes send staff to bus orders. Maintaining a premium feel is important to justifying its prices. Shake Shack is middle of the road for a fast casual restaurant, but much more expensive than fast food. - It is a tension that we battle every day between speed and cook-to-order food. We can't compete on speed
 because we want to cook our food in a certain way. But we can certainly emphasize our hospitality and certainly delivering on the high quality of the product. - [Narrator] They've also done time-motion studies to maximize efficiency in their kitchens. - We've been working on a bunch of different ways
 of how we're flowing food throughout the kitchen to really optimize and reduce the number of steps that our team members have to take. For example, we used to wash and cut all of our lettuce in house. We've then transitioned to precut lettuce, so now our team members focus on, you know, making sandwiches and not having to sit there
 in the back of the house and cutting up and washing lettuce all day long. - [Narrator] Shake Shack operates most of its own restaurants, but it's increasingly relying on licensed locations as it expands internationally at the rest stops, stadiums and airports. That means it selects outside companies to partner with,
 and those companies pay fees to Shake Shack. That's been a major driver in Shake Shack's rapid expansion. Shake Shack opened its first permanent location in 2004. Its sales pitch to customers emphasized fresh ground antibiotic-free beef, and it was founded by fine dining leader Danny Meyer, known for his restaurants like Eleven Madison Park,
 which gave it cachet. It's now a $4 billion company with over 500 locations around the world. The company says its international locations have also helped to develop new products, particularly limited-time offerings. - We learn a lot from our licensed locations. Even our Chicken Shack sandwich was actually born out
 of the international licensed business for our Shacks that did not serve beef. We also had locations that had kind of more of a regional flavor profile, like the Korean fried chicken sandwich that we brought over here. - [Narrator] But operating at this scale with fresh ingredients and a premium experience
 has challenges. - It's important for them still to be premium and have that vibe. I mean, people are paying more for Shake Shack than they would at Burger King, and so you have to believe that the food's better and the brand's better. - [Narrator] Shake Shack's had to invest significantly in data operations so it doesn't order too much
 or too little food. - The ability to get a sales forecast very, very tight really sets the tone for how the profitability can be at that location and across your entire fleet, means that your waste is within control and that you're not selling out of items and you're able to meet guest demand. We're not having to make decisions on a particular menu item
 which might have a negative impact, we're literally just getting smarter at our operations. - [Narrator] Shake Shack has ambitious expansion plans led by its new CEO, who brings experience growing major chains in the quick service restaurant industry. Over Rob Lynch's time at Arby's, first as CMO and then as president, sales grew over 20%.
 At Papa John's, he helped the company recover from a significant slump and opened hundreds of new restaurants, though the chain has been lagging recently. - It's challenging to take a homespun New York City brand or any brand that's, you know, grew up in a certain geography and push it out nationally.
 I mean, the company is really working now to try to be more efficient, to try to make its restaurants run better, and they are having some success. But I think the real focus on Shake Shack now is can they keep running these restaurants profitably and to continue to grow. (gentle music) - [Narrator] Fast casual chain Cava has turned
 Mediterranean dishes into a nearly $4 billion business. But most of its growth came from an uncommon strategy: buying a competitor quadruple its size and converting all its locations into Cavas. - I like to say I went to bed running about 70 restaurants and woke up running over 250 restaurants. - [Narrator] The strategy turned Cava
 into the country's biggest Mediterranean restaurant chain, leaving many to compare it to where Chipotle was a decade ago. Its success depends on how long the Mediterranean diet can remain popular. The company says it's using lots of customer data to strategize where to open new locations, but now that Cava can no longer rely on an acquisition
 to scale up, how can it continue to grow at such an ambitious pace? - Growth takes time. It's expensive. It's variable, and I think that's a little bit of coming down to reality. - [Narrator] This is "The Economics of Cava." Cava has been rapidly expanding for years. - Cava really likes the suburbs.
 They really see potential there and some of those communities probably don't have other Mediterranean food options or readily, you know, marketed to them options that they might seek out. - We've built a really robust real estate model that includes demographic and psychographic analysis, and we then use mobile analytics to understand
 where our guests are coming from, where they're going, and then kind of create a DNA of our guest base, and then heat map that DNA across the country to then show us where we have the highest likelihood of success. - [Narrator] In 2018, Cava bought Zoe's Kitchen, another chain of fast casual Mediterranean restaurants,
 for $300 million. At the time, Zoe's Kitchen had 261 locations, compared to Cava's more than 70. But Zoe's Kitchen was burning through cash. - It was a melting ice cube and we didn't want it to turn into a puddle. - [Narrator] Zoe's Kitchen, Shulman said, had lost its identity, serving as a cautionary tale
 for Cava. - I think over time Zoe's had lost its focus, it had added many menu items. I think the consumer was kind of confused as to what the brand really stood for and what their core competency is, versus at Cava we're really about these modern Mediterranean flavors. 38 ingredients, very simple, focused operation.
 - [Narrator] Most of the new restaurants Cava opened from 2019 to 2023 came from converting existing Zoe's Kitchen locations. This meant Cava could scale faster and at half the cost of building new restaurants from scratch. - When we looked at the Zoe's real estate portfolio, we saw many sites across the portfolio
 that we would love as a Cava site that we felt was really underperforming its potential. So we felt like this would be a way to rapidly expand our brand in a part of the country we were trying to enter into and we could do it in a much faster way than if we were trying to source these deals one by one.
 - [Narrator] Cava converted its last Zoe's Kitchen in October 2023, which means that now it has to build new locations from the ground up. Cava is currently in 24 states plus Washington, DC, and it went public in June 2023. As it looks to grow, it hopes to capitalize on the rising popularity of the Mediterranean diet,
 which it hopes to appeal to a broad range of customers across the country. Right now, only 1.4% of US restaurants primarily serve Mediterranean cuisine. In its last quarterly report, Cava group reported a net income of $6.8 million with a restaurant-level profit margin of 25.1%. Cava is now the largest Mediterranean style
 restaurant chain in the country. But is it the next Chipotle? - Chipotle was really taking Mexican nationwide in a very unique way that's an assembly line style of creating burritos and bowls. And Cava is seeking to take Mediterranean food nationwide with also kind of more of an assembly line, fast casual style of service.
 But Chipotle was getting going when fast casual really was barely a blip, so there was a lot less competition then. Cava has a lot more competition now. - [Narrator] Whether the restaurant succeeds may largely depend on whether customers continue to seek Mediterranean food. - Mediterranean has gotten a lot of good buzz, right?
 It's seen as healthier, it's good for the heart and, you know, overall body. That said, it's still new. Harissa, tahini, falafel, for a lot of communities these are still new kinds of foods and that's still a question mark. Do people want to eat this day in and day out as opposed to just trying it? - [Narrator] As of October 2023,
 Cava finished converting all Zoe's Kitchen locations into Cavas, but it's told investors that it will continue growing its number of locations by at least 15% each year. - I think the biggest question is can they grow in the way that they've said that they're going to for their investors and do it organically.
 Now they have to open their own sites, find their own sites, make sure the sites are good, be able to afford paying for this real estate and construction costs and other costs. - [Narrator] It plans to open at least three restaurants in Chicago, which will be its first major foray into the Midwest. It's targeting 47 to 50 new restaurants in 2024
 with locations based on a significant amount of customer data. - I think restaurants are a blend of art and science, and so we love the science part and understanding how do we use data to inform our decisions. So it gives us great visibility into being able to take this brand to the 26 states we're not in today
 and to go broader and deeper in the 24 states we already currently operate in. - [Narrator] But it's a difficult time to be expanding a fast casual restaurant. The economic slowdown has led to many restaurants struggling and while chain establishments are better positioned than independent ones, the market is saturated.
 Despite this, Cava is planning for 15% growth in store numbers next year. - If you look at where US-based restaurant chains are now, I mean, Wingstop, which is mentioned as the big growth engine is something like you know 11%, and I believe Cava is projecting even more. So they have grown very quickly
 and they've really promised more growth at a very high rate, and so investors are gonna be looking for those numbers every year. (gentle music) - [Narrator] Rice balls. - [Customer] Look at that. Michelin type of ramen. - [Narrator] Collaborations with famous restaurants like Santouka. Milk tea. This is 7-Eleven in Japan.
 But in the US the company is more known for Slurpees and hot dogs. - It's just not as appealing. My perception is people go in there when they need to. - [Narrator] The world's largest convenience store chain has over 13,000 locations in North America alone and made over $72 billion in sales last year.
 But now it's working to bring more Japanese inspiration to its American stores. Convenience stores have historically made their money selling tobacco and gas. But now as cigarette sales continue to decline and many expect gas sales to slow, many are racing to find other sources of revenue and doubling down on food.
 But shifting a business this massive is a major undertaking. This is "The Economics of 7-Eleven." 7-Eleven started as an American company, but it went bankrupt twice. Once in 1932 during the Great Depression and again in 1990 as it struggled with debts. - 7-Eleven is now owned by a Japanese company,
 Seven & I Holdings. - [Narrator] A majority stake was bought by Ito Yokado, a Japanese supermarket chain that had been operating 7-Eleven stores in Japan for more than a decade. From the beginning, the Japanese owners said American 7-Eleven, both its central operations and its franchises, had a lot of catching up to do.
 - The Japanese model was a lot more data driven. They would pour over what sold well at what time of day, break it down by gender and age and use that to inform their next order decisions. The American system just wasn't as sophisticated as that. - [Narrator] There were some major differences between US
 and Japanese 7-Elevens. The US stores were typically larger and attached to gas stations. The Japanese stores didn't sell gas, but had a much wider array of fresh food. Japanese stores only stocked items that would sell quickly. They had a proprietary distribution system that made multiple shipments to stores every day.
 Orders were customized by store based on sales data, demographic trends, and local weather forecasts. American 7-Eleven stores were getting two deliveries per week and some items were never being purchased. When American operators began counting items in their stores, some found that 40% of their products
 were selling less than one unit per month. Now American 7-Eleven has its own distribution system where franchises place orders every day based on company recommendations of what's selling nationally and regionally and their own store data. - They're making decisions every single day on what they're going to order, based on
 what they understand the customer wants to purchase, what new items are going to be made available. - One of the most interesting lessons that we've learned from 7-Eleven Japan is their approach to operations and to retailing, which they call tanpin kanri. And tanpin kanri is basically this idea that we localize our assortment to the needs of customers.
 We actually help our stores localize their assortment so that they have the right balance of a consistent assortment of products that consumers and customers would expect to see nationally, as well as items in the assortment that are perfectly appropriate for a given store's location. - [Narrator] This is especially important
 when it comes to food. 7-Eleven Japan is known for its wide array of meal options. - You're not gonna believe the choice of food in a convenience store. - [Narrator] American 7-Eleven also has a big food and beverage business. In total, it sold over $17 billion of food last year, about 24% of its overall sales.
 That included 315 million cups of coffee, 153 million Slurpees, and 99 million slices of pizza. But next year it hopes to make 1/3 of its sales from store brand goods, including food, up from less than 1/4 in 2022. That's particularly important given shifts in the convenience store industry. - So if you think about what convenience stores sell,
 there's fuel, there's tobacco products, and there's food and snacks. Gas is already a low-margin business and it's at risk long term if electric vehicle adoption increases over time. Tobacco very profitable, but people are smoking less. Food though is a category where demand just isn't going away. So for convenience stores it makes sense
 that they would wanna double down on that. - [Narrator] 7-Eleven currently has 17 so-called commissaries around the country that make food for all of its US locations. Now it's working on upgrading them. It's partnering with Warabeya, a supplier for 7-Eleven Japan, to spearhead the effort. Warabeya's new factories in Hawaii, Texas
 and Virginia can make a wider and more localized range of food than 7-Eleven has been able to stock in the past. - Things like being able to cook rice en mass, new protein capabilities, all which helps 7-Eleven introduce new types of products in the food area to our customers. We recently launched a product
 that's a spicy miso ramen soup, not something you would typically think about being sold at a 7-Eleven. - [Narrator] It's adding a lot of items to its menu. The main question is how many customers will buy them, and this is where data comes into the question. - When customers come into our stores, they're in an immediate consumption mindset.
 - [Narrator] Capitalizing on this is a key priority for the company, and it plans to use its massive data operation to do it. American 7-Elevens monitor daily sales and for loyalty members, they collect demographic information on who's buying what. The company's loyalty program has 95 million members.
 Building on that, the company's investing in targeted advertising on screens and TVs throughout stores. That's to spur impulse buys. - It helps not only 7-Eleven, but also our advertisers, our vendors to target our customers at the point of purchase. So for example, in the morning we may target our customers
 with a message around a hot cup of coffee and a donut, whereas later in the day we may target our customers with an advertisement that's around a snack and a beverage from our cold vault. - [Narrator] And for potential customers who aren't at the store, there's delivery, the fastest growing part of the company's business.
 It's highly profitable for the company since delivery orders tend to be for about double the amount of in-store purchases. - How the brand's grown for nearly 100 years starts with what's the customer want, where do we think they're going and how do we meet them where they're going. - [Narrator] A big question is whether American customers
 will match the enthusiasm 7-Eleven sees in some of its other markets - In Asia, I think there is so much excitement around convenience stores and the types of food and snacks they offer. So if they can bring even a little bit of that excitement to the US- - [Customer] We're gonna get some Musubins. - That would be a great success.
 ♪ Breaking the law, breaking the law ♪ - [Narrator] This isn't what it looks like. These kids aren't cracking open beers, they're hydrating. With Liquid Death, a water brand that ditched the serene mountain springs for skulls, punk rock and viral chaos. What started as a joke, marketing water like booze,
 has evolved into a company with a $1.4 billion valuation, and it's all built on one simple idea: making the plainest drink in the world feel rebellious. - The success of the bottled water industry is really the success of the marketing industry. (energetic punk music) - [Narrator] This is "The Economics of Liquid Death."
 These are some of the top luxury bottled water brands in the US. Evian highlights its water's journey from the French Alps. Smartwater markets its vapor distilled H2O with added electrolytes, and Fiji emphasizes its aquifer and pH level of 7.7. Liquid Death has none of that. - The traditional marketing strategy for bottled water
 as a premium product was all about purity. - [Narrator] And that strategy has a lot to do with the distrust of tap water. Experts say 59% of American water users think that bottled water is safer than tap. - Bottled water brands are just sitting back, you know, they don't need to do anything. This distrust is out there and people are buying this water.
 - There's not really anything that's incredibly different about our water or our products, but there really is nothing incredibly different of any product almost anywhere. It's all just brand differences and packaging differences and that's why people buy things. - [Narrator] Liquid Death's CEO Mike Cessario
 wanted to compete with luxury brands like Fiji and Evian. - We're premium, you have to be, but we don't wanna be far and away the most expensive thing on the shelf. - [Narrator] To target a consumer willing to spend money on luxury water, the company focused on differentiation. - We've seen it as an aspirational product,
 we've seen it as a kind of Goop-esque health product, but we haven't seen it as this like counterculture product. (energetic punk music) And that's just enough for someone when they're passing the water aisle to do a double take. And even those matter of seconds when it comes to consumer marketing, those ar seconds
 that marketers will spend millions of dollars trying to buy from you. - [Narrator] Thanks to that identity, the company didn't have to spend millions on ad agencies. Instead, it relied on going viral from the very start. - Liquid Death, especially in the beginning, relied a lot on organic marketing.
 You're basically cutting out millions of dollars in distributing your ads. - [Narrator] This paved the way for a move into physical retail, like grocery stores, convenience shops and bars. - A really good thing of distribution that they've done is getting into bars quite early on. You know, we don't really see that so much
 with the newest soda brands, for instance, which prioritize retail and wholesale. - [Narrator] The company targeted audiences in places where it would want its hands photographed and shared. A 2021 partnership made Liquid Death, the exclusive water sold at Live Nation concerts nationwide. - So many people have told us, yes,
 the first time we ever heard of Liquid Death or saw it was at a festival. And then eventually you have to imagine those people then see our marketing elsewhere or the next time they're in a store like, "Oh, there's that water that I had at the concert." - [Narrator] In just a few years, Liquid Death has become
 one of the most followed beverage brands worldwide, outpacing luxury water brands and trailing energy drink giants, Red Bull and Monster, and the company has secured distribution in 113,000 retail locations in the US and UK. With retail scan sales rising to $263 million in 2023, a nearly 140% increase from the year prior.
 - Now we've got a lot more sophisticated. We can target specific kinds of people with social, geo targeted around a specific store. Hey, within a 10 mile radius of this store, we can reach these people and try to give them a specific offer or a reason to go into that store and purchase and be able to track that.
 - [Narrator] But Liquid Death's competitors aren't necessarily just other bottled water brands. It's also targeting competitors like non-alcoholic beers, better-for-you sodas and functional beverages. - What they're trying to be is a beverage company. - [Narrator] A year after the original Liquid Death launched, the company started selling
 sparkling water. Almost two years later, it introduced flavored sparkling waters. Last year it added iced teas. And to target users of refillable water bottles, liquid death released flavored electrolyte packages called Death Dust. - The minute you go into the world of flavor and texture in the sense of adding fizz, then you can start to sell
 a product that is a little bit more unique to you and therefore you can charge a little bit more for it. - [Narrator] Today, the company says the majority of their sales come from sparkling flavored water and iced tea. - Over 60, 70% of our business now is not plain water. - [Narrator] But some new launches are still played
 for the joke, like the brand's collaboration with Van Leeuwen, which introduced a limited edition flavor Hot Fudge Sundae that the company says was Amazon's best ever grocery limited-time offer. - We thought it was gonna be a month or two of inventory, we sold out of it in six hours. - [Narrator] It also sells things
 like an almost $6,000 cold plunge, a $250 Murderhole game set, and a mysterious country club membership for the small price of your soul. - Most beverage brands don't have fans. We have people who they're spending 30 bucks on a T-shirt and we're selling out of it. We've sold over a million dollars worth
 of Liquid Death gold watches. The brand means something more to people than just like the functional difference of the liquid. - That's all marketing. It's all just a ploy to get that name out there and to get PR and publicity. It's gonna be the drinks that are gonna make them money. - [Narrator] But as trends shift and new brands emerge,
 Liquid Death does risk becoming flat. - It's just gonna be really interesting to see as a brand like this get bigger and bigger, can they still sustain this idea of we are a punk rock independent company, when by the very virtue of growing and growing, you're probably not gonna end up doing things that differently.
 And the question will be whether consumers like the products enough to keep buying it then or whether there'll be some kind of pull away when they think that they've been lied to. (energetic rock music) - [Narrator] Store beer sales have gone flat, but non-alcoholic beer is growing fast. Since 2020, its sales have seen double digit growth
 every year, heating more than $440 million in sales in 2024. And in the US, Athletic Brewing is leading the way. Less than a decade old, Athletic has driven about 1/3 of all category growth for the past four years. - When Athletic entered the category, there was basically one style of non-alcoholic beer available,
 very few brands, very poorly distributed. - [Narrator] And in 2024 so far, Athletic has outsold its non-alcoholic beer competitors, beating out Heineken and Budweiser. But as Athletic rapidly expands its production, can it keep the buzz going? This is "The Economics of Athletic Brewing." - One of the advantages that Athletic has
 over huge beer companies is that it is able to focus exclusively on this niche of non-alcoholic beer. - [Narrator] Since Athletic's founding, it has invested over $100 million into manufacturing and developing its own process of non-alcoholic beer production. - Non-alcoholic beer was born outta prohibition
 and it was a really penalty box concept, and then there was basically no innovation for 80 years. - [Narrator] Even as more companies have added alcohol-free beer to their repertoire, it's common for them to just make their original product, beer, and then remove that alcohol through additional processes.
 Athletic takes a different approach. Instead of adjusting just one part of the process, Athletic makes 10 to 12 changes across all brewing stages. It's a new process, and a single mistake could make alcoholic beer, ruining a batch. - Their process can be more complicated, but in some ways it can also be more efficient.
 - [Narrator] For example, for every 3 1/2 gallons of water Athletic uses, it creates one gallon of non-alcoholic beer, whereas the Brewer's Association estimates that the average craft brewery uses about seven gallons of water for every gallon of beer. - So we're almost two times better than that. What we're trying to figure out is how we can squeeze
 every last drop of product out of every single batch, and so we're investing in equipment that can help us do that. - [Narrator] And Athletic could tailor its process to the specific needs of non-alcoholic drinks, like pasteurization, one step traditional beer doesn't need due to its alcohol content.
 - It's very challenging for an alcoholic beer brewer to go into non-alcoholic beer because there's so many food safety requirements. You're answering to different regulatory agencies, you have to have food safety plans and it's just a lot more involved. - [Narrator] Now Athletic's Connecticut facility
 has the capacity to make 450,000 barrels a year, making it one of the largest dedicated non-alcoholic breweries in the world. And with one San Diego facility up and running and another underway, it will soon be able to make over 1 million barrels per year. - This is a massive amount of growth and it represents a huge bet from Athletic
 that people are not just going to keep drinking non-alcoholic beer, but they're actually going to increase their consumption. - [Narrator] Where Athletic scales up is also strategic. Data from its direct to consumer sales helped guide its initial decision to build that first San Diego facility. - We were really following our e-commerce data.
 We right from the jump are selling a lot of beer in California, in the Pacific Northwest, and so we bought a brewery and quadrupled the size of it in 2020 to 2021 to meet that demand. - [Narrator] And DTC sales is one arm of distribution Athletic has that its beer counterparts don't always get. - We had the option of distributing and marketing
 in ways that alcohol had never been marketed before. - [Narrator] In the US alcohol sales are heavily regulated. - With Athletic, because we're non-alcoholic, we immediately listed on our website everything for sale that we're making. - [Narrator] In 2018, over 50% of Athletic sales were direct to consumers, which let it gather
 actionable data on its customers. - So we had really fast feedback loops on what kind of beer they liked, where they live in the country, what the purchasing patterns are, and that really informed our distribution and marketing strategy, is like where are we resonating early, and can we build on that
 and what are we learning from those consumers? - [Narrator] Athletic found that 80% of its customers still drank alcohol, and more than 75% are under 45 years old. - Historically, people drank non-alcoholic beer instead of alcoholic beer. Now, they're drinking non-alcoholic beer in addition to alcoholic beer.
 And it suggests that as young people get older, the market is going to get even bigger. - Really, I was kind of the target consumer, someone who fashions themselves as slightly athletic, but like likes to work out and stay healthy. - [Narrator] So as Athletic explored other distribution avenues, Shufelt brought it
 to places he naturally went, from 5K races to Whole Foods. - The beer aisle is immensely competitive. It's really hard to get space on that shelf. - [Narrator] But at Whole Foods, about 50% of the cooler space is dedicated to craft beer. So its customers are used to trying new brands. And the fact that Athletic was a non-alcoholic craft beer
 gave it a much higher chance of getting a spot. In June of 2018, just one month after launching commercially, its beer was on Whole Foods shelves. - As Athletic scaled up its production, Whole Foods was able to distribute it across the country. - [Narrator] Now Athletic has been Whole Foods top selling beer across all beer for over a year.
 And wholesale distribution has transformed Athletic's sales. In Athletic's first year, it sold 875 barrels. In 2023, it sold more than 258,000 barrels with Athletic beating out Heineken and Budweiser in non-alcoholic beer sales in stores for the past two years. But today, the non-alcoholic beer industry is becoming
 increasingly competitive. - The other question for Athletic is how much non-alcoholic beer can Americans actually tolerate? The answer to that question is higher than we used to think, but it's not really clear how much higher it can go. If non-alcoholic beer turns out to be a short-term trend, that's not a huge deal for alcoholic beer companies.
 But Athletic exclusively focuses on this one product, and that's usually an advantage for Athletic, but it's also a huge risk. - [Narrator] Athletic says it's focusing on getting customers to view its product as more than just a substitute for beer. Especially since beer is less popular than ever before.
 So while Athletic's 75,000 points of distribution are mostly places like grocery stores and bars, about 5% of these places aren't licensed to sell alcohol. - Could be anything from coffee shops to convenience stores to state park beaches, things like that. Every year we branch out more and more, so we have our beer trucks going to stores
 they've never considered going to before. - [Narrator] Athletic says that over 50% of its customers are buying Athletic in places they would normally have grabbed water or a soda. And if that number continues to grow, the chances of alcohol-free beer being just a trend could diminish. - They believe that there are more times in the day,
 more opportunities for people to drink non-alcoholic beer than alcoholic beer. You wouldn't have an alcoholic beer for lunch when you're at work or you know at 5 p.m. when you're still stuck at work, but you might drink a non-alcoholic beer then. So they think that there are opportunities here that just don't exist in other parts of the beer market.
 (gentle music) - [Narrator] The McAloo Tikki Burger, McPops, onion rings. If you don't recognize these items from your regular McDonald's menu, that's because you can't get them at a regular McDonald's in the US. They're exclusive to McDonald's in their respective countries. ♪ The all-new McAloo Tikki ♪
 - [Narrator] Designed to both attract tourists. - [Customer] America does not have these fries or wings. - [Narrator] And more importantly, drive international sales. - When you look at the sales figures, about 41% of their sales are in the US and all the rest are international. - [Narrator] Here's how and why the company designs
 those local menus. This is "The Economics of McDonald's International." McDonald's founder Ray Kroc opened his first restaurant in Illinois in 1955 with just three food items on the menu. Its staple was a 15 cent hamburger. It first moved outside the continental US in 1967. Now the company has over 40,000 restaurants
 in over 100 countries. - We think of McDonald's as an American company, and in the US they have about 13,500 restaurants, but the bulk of their restaurants are actually international. So all the rest of those restaurants, about 27,000, are all around the world. - [Narrator] And you may have noticed that
 the restaurants look different. - This is so chic. There's no Grimace, no Hamburgler. - [Participant] In Canada they offer poutine. (announcer speaking French) - [Narrator] While global core items like burgers and fries make up most of McDonald's food sales still, these local menu items make up about 30%.
 International sales are a key part of McDonald's revenue. Australia, China, Japan, France and Germany are a few of the company's top markets. Adopting a menu like this is a strategy companies use called localization, and it's a tactic that has been essential to McDonald's global growth. When the company expanded into India in 1996,
 it did so without any beef on its menus, observing the common belief in the country that cows are sacred. McDonald's served more than 6 million customers there its first year with items like the Maharaja Mac made with mutton patties. One of India's current popular items is this, the McAloo Tikki Burger.
 - It's a potato and pea patty blended with some Indian spices. - [Narrator] This is Roger Di Domenico. He works with local teams to build international menus. - They remind me of a certain Indian Street food that I had growing up. So I think it's just a wonderful way to recognize and get closer to the customers
 while still remaining McDonald's. - [Narrator] Most McDonald's locations globally are managed and owned by franchisees or licensees rather than the company. Deciding what's on those menus starts with customer research. Local experts use that research to craft new items. Local flavors are incorporated in several ways.
 The first is adapting McDonald's staples to fit specific tastes. - I think if you look at the spicy chicken McNuggets that have been in multiple markets, each one of those markets has a different interpretation of what spice means to their consumers. There'll be one that might be highlighting curry.
 There might be one that highlights more of a Tabasco like flavor, and then a third one that will use something like a Thai chili or a jalapeno. - [Narrator] But some markets will create or offer something completely new. Mexico has McMolletes's as part of breakfast. The Philippines serves fried chicken with McSpaghetti.
 - If it's something that tastes like home and can be both true to McDonald's and true to the consumer, it's a big win for us. - [Narrator] And some additions to the international menus compete with other restaurants. - In some of these countries, McDonald's definitely competes with a brand like KFC on chicken.
 So in some countries in the Middle East, they actually offer fried chicken. It's not something you'd see on US menus, but to compete with these local flavors, they do that. - [Narrator] Some of the more popular international items, have even spread to McDonald's menus globally. - McFlurry started off in Canada
 and now it's loved everywhere. McSpicy is a product that started off as a local taste variation in China that has now been adopted all over the world. We want people to come in for the global core icons. We want people to come in to try something new. And so any of the menu items that we feel like will do
 that is what we wanna elevate in the system. - [Narrator] McDonald's seized on the popularity of South Korean boy band BTS, launching a limited edition BTS Meal in a number of countries in 2021. It included Sweet Chili and Cajun sauces inspired by the South Korean market. The company said the promotion helped drive a 40% increase
 from the year before in global sales, and significantly lifted McNugget sales during that period. But some transplants aren't so successful. - For a number of years, McDonald's has had a McVegan sandwich in Germany and some other European countries. They recently tried offering what they call a McPlant,
 which was using a Beyond Meat burger in the US. And they tested that in some markets, and it just doesn't seem the consumers here want that. So you know, there is a push pull, you know. It's fun to have new flavors. It's exciting, but it doesn't always work in a permanent way. - [Narrator] While having a wide selection of items
 globally is profitable, McDonald's is looking to streamline some of its offerings - This year, the CEO, Chris K has said that there's just too many redundancies all across the world. He gave an example where, you know, there's 70 different types of chicken sandwiches all across the world, and so I think they are in the process of examining that,
 but I don't think they're gonna eliminate all local items on menus. - [Narrator] So next time you're in Spain, you might be able to try McPops. - They're filled with your choice of white chocolate or hazelnut. They're super soft and they've got this amazing filling on the inside. Can I bother you for a napkin?
 (employee speaking indistinctly) (gentle music)


 14. Chili’s CEO Breaks Down the Changes That Turned the Restaurant Around | WSJ - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=ECY7txi92dc&si=qlV06TfxUw3THByX

Chili’s CEO Breaks Down the Changes That Turned the Restaurant Around | WSJ - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ECY7txi92dc

 A lot of players in casual dining and Chili's was one of them, forgot about why do people go out and if we don't deliver on that, why would we expect our business to grow. The restaurant industry has been struggling. 2024 had the highest number of bankruptcies since the pandemic. TGI Friday's filed for bankruptcy.
 *** is the latest casual restaurant chain to file for Chapter 11  bankruptcy. Not at Red Lobster, it has officially filed for bankruptcy. But on the flip side, Chili's is thriving. It's got more customers, more sales, more hype. This is so good Chili's, you popped off, and this man is the reason why.
 His name is Kevin Hoffman, and he's the CEO of Chili's. The Wall Street Journal's restaurant's reporter Heather Hadden sat down with him to learn how he's  steering Chili's through the industry's challenges and his strategy to keep it  the hottest casual dining chain in the country. I know the kitchen was a big focus in making it more efficient.
 What were top changes you made there and what was the payoff? One of the ideas actually came from our culinary team. We had an executive leadership team having a meeting. They served all of us two identical old timers with cheese. That's our most popular burger, and they had us taste each one and then say,
 Oh, what was the difference? And one of the executives was like, Oh, the burger is different, and the other one was like, Oh, the cheese is different. Another one's like, Oh, the buns toasted differently. We all got it wrong. The pickles were different, right? That was the only thing that was different.
 And so they bring out the current pickle at the time and it was like a 5 gallon jug and it looked like a  painter's jug and they had a special tool to pry open the pickles and then about a minute later you, you, you liberate the pickles because the thing flies off but then all the pickle juice spills over so you gotta 
 clean up the pickle juice and the dill, and then he said, here's the other pickle that he didn't know the difference of. And they brought a jar out and they opened it up and they took two pickles out, right? They said, Oh by the way, this is over $500 cheaper than the liberated pickles, right? And I remember one of the execu we should test this.
 What is there to test? There's 200 years of experience in this room and none of us could pick which pickle it was, right? Haman has also zeroed in on the equipment. His team looked for small changes they could make to save cooking time and money. So for example, on a burger and fries sounds simple, right?
 A lot goes into that and the fries. What we found was one, they weren't as hot as they could be, and two, they weren't seasoned properly and you say, well why is that? Well, it's it's not the cook's fault. It's not the restaurant team's fault. It was the home office's fault because we gave them 2 fries to make so we had a curly fry and a straight fries.
 So if you just have one fry, you can make it hotter and fresher, and then the seasoning process was almost impossible. So after the fries are cooked. They're put on what's called a save a week pan, and then they're supposed to take the shaker and do it 30 times. After 5 your arm just starts getting tired,
 so nobody's doing it 30 times and then we wonder why isn't the fries properly seasoned. So we used incredible innovation. We made a shaker with bigger holes. That more seasoning came out and now you put them in a bowl, you go shake, shake, shake, toss, toss, shake, shake, shake fries are properly seasoned.
 And they're hot and fresh every time. Was there things about consumer surveys or what have you seen when you first started that said to you the  food's got to be better and this is what I need to do? Well, I mean you could talk to guests, but you also talk to the team members. I mean the team members would tell you.
 That the food, the food needed to be better. You know, I do these listening sessions all around the country. I do about 16 a year. I'll have 15 to 20 area managers in a restaurant just like this before it opens. We spend 2 to 3 hours. I open my laptop up. I'm taking notes, and the main question I ask them is if you were the CEO,
 what would you change tomorrow? It's a very provocative question. Sometimes they're a little hesitant, I'll be like, hey, when you're cursing under your breath, that the corporate made you do X, this is your chance. Like, uh, I'm the CEO I can make change. Like if you don't tell me now, you can't complain about it,
 right? And they get all fired up and they give me lots of good ideas. So you're skinny down the menu. Why is the menu that you have now the right menu? Huge advantages come out of slimming down the menu or allows us to make the food better. So for example, the chicken crispers, we used to have two chicken crispers.
 We had a tempura battered crisper called the original crisper. It's about 20% of the of the chicken crisper business, and then we had a conventional extra crispy, we call it a crispy crisper, it's 80% of the business, right? And when you go into the back of the restaurant in the heart of the house, they have very small little pans with which they can bread each of those flavors,
 right, because there's two flavors in this breading station that's about this big. When we got rid of the 20% variant, we could now have one big vat or we can make 24 at a time versus the old way you could make one or  two at a time. So sometimes people say they love variety, and they do, but variety can sometimes get in the way of making things consistently really,
 really well, and that's a great example where today we only have one recipe. We sell 66% more sales and chicken crispers today than we did 3 years ago because we're doing it in a  much more consistent manner. It's a better product. These types of trims have slimmed down the menu by 25% in the last two years,
 but the chain has also added an important new item. So the Big Smasher, which you introduced last year, I know it was a really important moment for you for the brand in terms of lifting your sales. Talk about developing the Big Smasher and then also marketing-wise going after  fast food. So one of the things that our team saw a little longer than a year ago was And social 
 media people were posting their fast food receipts and they were complaining about how expensive things were and  so we came up with the idea of like what if we made a burger that had a familiar taste profile of a famous  fast food burger but done in the format of chili's. Makes a quarter pound burger look tiny and well yeah,
 tiny. And then go after this idea that fast food pricing is high, right? And we did that May of last year and the business business was doing well before that. It just took off after that. Is it profitable though? I mean, that's the question with all these value deals that a lot of chains have rolled out,
 you know, it's sharp price points. They're very appealing to consumers who now are really feeling fatigued. Can you make money on it? Well, we can. And we do, and I have shareholders and I owe it to them to continue to make money, right? So one of things we call is a barbell strategy. That means that most customers buy an affordable option like Chili's $6 base option 
 margarita, but the chain also offers a premium option like a presidente margarita for the few who want to  splurge. As long as we continue to play on both ends of the barbell, we're gonna be fine because it allows us to manage the value mix with more premium mix that we can also make money on. But across the industry,
 sales haven't risen as much as Chili's, and rival chains aren't noticing. So your competitors have definitely noticed your success. Applebee's last year came out with its 999. Applebee's really big meal deal for only 999, cheaper than your entry point for 3 for me. Have you seen any impact from competitors stepping up?
 I have a monthly meeting with our vice president of operations, so I asked them about a deal that was undercutting us by about 10%. On a similar value meal construct, and they all started laughing. I was like, why are you guys laughing? They're like, we don't think this is going to dent us in the least because it's not just about the lowest price,
 it's also about what you get for that price. And we think that what we have is unbeatable. And if you look at the results for for that quarter when that new offer, the competitive offer came out, we were up 31% in sales, right, plus 20% traffic growth, and that just tells you the guest isn't just buying the lowest price out there.
 It's going to be very difficult for our competitors. To catch up because it could take years of what we've been doing and investments that we've been making to get to where we are. So let's talk about the triple dipper. So that has been on your menu for decades. I found ads going back to 2012. What have you done that's changed to make that such a sensation?
 Is it the food? Is it the marketing? Is it both? Well, I think the first thing is the food is better and it's made more consistently. 0.2 is our marketing teams are really focused effort on bringing this into the social media. Triple dipper is very consistent way a young person likes to eat, like to have lots of little things.
 It's experiential. You've got cheese pulls, you've got you've got products that you can dip, and we started marketing on social media, and I think that showed a young generation of like, wow, this is something that would be exciting. And then when they came into the restaurant and had a similar experience,
 they would start posting about it too, and that thing caught on fire. From 2023 to 2024, triple dipper sales increased 70% according to the company. In the last quarter of 2024, it made up 14% of all sales. With social media, how have you stoked this because some of it's organic, but then obviously you've played a role in making this go viral.
 Is it partnering with influencers? Is it playful? I mean, we don't have access to anything different than other restaurant brands. To me, the biggest difference is. The product's really good. When you see this cheese pull and it goes like this and you're like hey I wanna go try that and then you come 
 into Chili's and it works just like that and you're like, wow, like this is what I saw on on TV or this is what I saw on social. And then you tell your friends and it becomes a part of your rotation because you had such a good experience. What do you see in the numbers, you know, that's showing that people are buying off of social media or the social media strategy 
 is translating to sales? Well, you know, our business is up about a little over 50% from 3 years ago, so some of that's triple dipper, right, 7 or 8%, but a lot of it's not the triple dipper too. So the main reason why I think our business is doing a lot better today than it was 3 years ago. I once again the fundamentals of casual dining,
 which is the food's better, the service is a lot better, and it's in a fun friendly atmosphere. We've seen when new guests come in, the time it takes them to come back to the restaurant is compressed. It's compressed because they're having a good experience and they're coming back sooner, right? So to me that's the,
 that's the big difference is that we've done a really good job with the experience in terms of you know sustaining what  you're doing this summer would be. A year of positive traffic, which in this industry is really exceptional. I mean everyone is hurting for traffic right now. How do you keep that going?
 The way we're going to keep growing the businesses don't get bored of the fundamentals. And fortunately for us because we're delivering a good experience for these new guests that are coming in, we become a part of that consideration. Where do you think Chili's will be in a year, in 5 years? Well, I hope it's a lot bigger,
 so we want to have Restaurants that are even more productive, better for all economics, you know, better sales, good things happen when you grow sales of existing restaurants. Restaurants become a lot easier to run. You be able to afford more labor. Foods out fresher and hotter and more delicious, so that's number one is we got to continue to grow the business through the fundamentals of casual dining.
 I think we can start building chilies again. There are parts of this country there are no chilies, so there's no chili's in Oregon. We don't have as many chilies in California in some states that traditionally we thought were more expensive to be able to operate  in. But now that we're a much healthier concept with better for economics,
 we can operate in those states now. So there's a lot more runway ahead of us on this brand than there is behind us, and we're just we're still probably early to mid innings of our turnaround, so there's so much more runway to grow restaurant volumes as well as build new restaurants.


 15. Why Americans Love Frozen Food - YouTube

https://youtube.com/watch?v=pWzstvXQ7l8&si=y7iPMTOdzeGgOdqc

Why Americans Love Frozen Food - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pWzstvXQ7l8

 In 2022, frozen food sales in the U.S. reached over $72 billion. Demand has been rapidly growing. Throughout Covid, we had among the highest sales in all of the food space. Behind this seemingly simple idea, there's a sophisticated supply chain keeping perishables frozen. Each step is very critical.
 The products have to maintain proper temperature throughout a complex network of refrigerated trucks and cold storage facilities. Should the temperature vary, it can become unsafe. But it's not just about keeping ice cream from melting. The percentages are remarkable in terms of what's tossed and frozen items because of
 inadequate cold storage temperature. And the refrigeration tech is often outdated. We're still relying on centuries old technology. The weak link in cold chain logistics, planes, trains, automobiles is how to deliver any perishable good at the appropriate temperature. Major players in the global frozen food market
 include privately-held Cargill, Conagra, Nestlé, General Mills and Unilever. So the consumers are buying more frozen product, it's going to require more storage capability and a more efficient supply chain. The perishables are poised to profit, and so are those investing in really cold properties. Supply chain issues and labor challenges haven't
 really gone away in the food industry. Where's the stuff? Without resilient supply chain infrastructure, the growth and safety of the massive $265 billion global frozen food market is at risk. Can cold storage supply chains keep up with frozen food demand? Virtually all American households purchase frozen food at least once a year.
 Since 2019, sales have grown by 23%, according to the American Frozen Food Institute. When Covid happened, when supply chain, everything got shut down, you saw a huge spike in frozen food, sometimes 30%, 40%, 50% year over year basis. Frozen foods demand was supercharged during the pandemic in the U.S., bringing in over $65
 billion in 2020. The pandemic taught consumers to invest in bulk buying. Frozen foods were some of the best selling items during the pandemic, since they can be really stored for long periods of time. We're seeing that growth continue. We saw about a 20% growth during Covid, which was really very rapid and fast.
 Most frozen food products reported double digit increases. We did a recent survey and found that over 80% of consumers looked to frozen to reduce in-home food waste and also save money. The main driver is cost. What can consumers afford? A great study by Cornell that looked into how much waste the average consumer has between both
 fresh and frozen. And what they found was with frozen food, you're five times more likely not to encounter food waste. Every year, roughly $1,300 is spent by the average American on food that ends up as waste. You know, Cargill produces enough protein to feed 170 million people around the world. So that's enough to feed the entire country of
 Bangladesh every single day. The frozen category, really seeing things like variety meats more likely to be purchased frozen. At the end of the day. It's about that 4 p.m. dinner tonight decision, right? A great variety of dinners is promised. The dinner is packed and ready for subzero storage. The industry has come a long way since the 1930s,
 when Clarence Birdseye pioneered a flash freezing technique that better preserved foods. Before then, the market was known for a tasteless and textureless products. Quick freezing is one of the newer ways of keeping foods, meat, fruit, vegetables. He won consumers over. I'm sorry, but I already have a frozen food man.
 In the 1950s and '60s became the golden age of food freezing. Birdseye Hawaiian style international vegetables. That flash freezing technique is still how a lot of frozen products are made today, particularly with mechanical freezing. Think frozen plates and conveyor belts for contact freezing or the air blast method, which is one of
 the oldest and commonly used. That's when cold air fills a room of food to freeze it. Freezing technology really hasn't gained leaps and bounds. Flash freezing. And what that means is, let's say strawberries are coming out of a field in California, we'll take those warm strawberries out of the field as soon
 as they're cleaned, and then we'll blast them down to -20 degrees and then store them so then later they can be consumed. The air blasting technique also utilizes individual quick freezing, aka IKF. IKF, what it does is it freeze individual pieces of food, and that does two things. One, the speed of the freezing helps reduce the
 size of the ice crystal. So it helps preserve the integrity of the food when it's thawed or cooked. You want to freeze at that peak of freshness. And that's really an aspect that whether you look at meat or vegetables, a lot of industries have really focused on communicating that message as well. The other way food can be frozen is cryogenic
 freezing. It uses liquid nitrogen or carbon dioxide to get to extremely low temperatures quickly, but it can be more expensive for companies to invest and switch to the cryogenic techniques, plus the cost of nitrogen added to that. However, cryogenic freezing is much faster since that liquid nitrogen is so cold.
 One estimate puts mechanical freezing at nearly an hour to freeze fruits and veggies, while cryogenic freezing could take 11 minutes. It's all about speed. The faster food can freeze, the smaller ice crystals that form, which ultimately creates a higher quality product. Our data scientists heard that we were not blasting
 strawberries fast enough in California. The algorithm, based on computational fluid dynamics that were able to reduce the freeze cycle from three days down to one to two days. So not only are you reducing the lead time of freezing the berries, but we're using less energy to do that. How to freeze food is just the first half of the
 equation. Frozen foods need a robust and sustainable cold storage supply chain to reach consumers. Even Birdseye recognized this in the late 1920s when convincing Americans to try Frosted Foods, He created his own refrigerated boxcars for trains and leased freezers out to retailers. The U.S. still transports a lot of food by truck.
 In the U.S., we're very fortunate, but in other developing countries we're seeing an investment in the cold chain to try and keep the agricultural products preserved for year-round consumption. It's really a way of preventing food waste globally. Approximately 13% of all food produced globally is lost due to poor cold storage every year.
 That wasted food could have fed an estimated 950 million people. Tenth annual Disruptor 50 list, our fastest growing private companies challenging public incumbents. Number three, Lineage Logistics, improving the food supply chain to prevent waste with a proprietary freezing process. Lineage serves big name customers, including
 Walmart and McDonald's. Lineage Logistics focuses on the frozen food market, and part of its mission is decreasing global food waste. And so we provide frozen and chilled warehousing, 450 warehouses across 20 countries. Let's use salmon as an example. Salmon will be harvested up in the Pacific Northwest. Salmon will immediately be packaged,
 put into one of our freezers that packaged salmon across the country, may go to a retail store and then finally to the consumers at home. It may end up moving to a restaurant where the final consumer then purchases. But we're helping to move that food through the entire cold chain and ensuring that it keeps a
 safe temperature the entire way. The supply chain weaknesses garnered international attention when the coronavirus pandemic struck. Covid really showed how fragile the supply chain system is. That really exposed huge gaps in being able to transport in frozen food and even refrigerated food in the U.S..
 At the same time, it's expensive to generate power to keep the entire supply chain frozen. Being able to minimize costs in different ways, whether you're using different software, AI, robotics, freezing technology, driverless technology to transport the product from point A to point B, like that is the biggest pinpoint.
 Our data scientists have looked at the space that's used in our freezers because they consume a lot of energy and we want to make sure that we're using every square inch of that facility with frozen food. They've created algorithms to be able to see where are we not using some of that cubic space and how can we optimize that usage?
 We have been able to create over 300,000 additional pallet positions of frozen food that is equivalent to a 3,000,000 square foot freezer. Food waste also contributes to unnecessary emissions, and that's a ticking time bomb that Phononic aims to defuze. Number 17 on the list is Photonics, a semiconductor
 company that is reinventing the refrigerator. Through the power of semiconductor innovation, we are sustainably transforming global cooling, so core to our platform is a semiconductor chip that when powered, generates coldness. Phononic embraces solid state cooling with semiconductor devices that cool and freeze
 products in the cold chain fulfillment process. So Phononic really developed the ecosystem, and now we're delivering solutions poised to disrupt an almost $50 billion global market. Cold is super hot if you're in the cold storage warehouse business. Why? It's because of your Amazon Fresh, your Peapod
 by Giant. The new food delivery service is driving it literally from the warehouse to your home. Online grocery sales soared over the pandemic. Feeling frozen food sales with a 75% increase in 2020. It's expensive right now to ship by e-commerce frozen products because it needs to stay cold. How do we get product either from retail to the
 consumer using e-commerce and or from other distribution points straight to the consumer? While that may be convenient for a consumer, it makes warehouse management a nightmare. So much so that now in almost every case, retailers lose almost $13 in an online grocery delivery. Phononic developed an end-to-end
 cold chain solution, not just hardware that includes actively refrigerated and frozen totes, but also the IoT connectivity that allows the consumer to know exactly where their order is from the minute it was placed to the time that they pick it up. Phononic is releasing these reusable totes to grocery stores and retailers.
 And that gives the grocer the warehouse and the last mile delivery solutions provider tremendous flexibility, saving labor, saving on energy costs, but more importantly, increasing order throughput to meet those online demands. We're seeing the  e-commerce side of the cold chain growing and we've acquired two
 companies to really be able to give us some infrastructure there because it does require a different layout of the facility and different technology. And while the number of households buying online leveled out in 2022, what continued to grow was the frequency of orders and the money spent per order.
 The pandemic surge in frozen food consumption has shown staying power from purchases in stores to online orders. I don't see that changing at all. To be able to not only feed yourself, but feed your family something that it doesn't take two hours to cook. That is a huge factor as well. That's driving frozen food sales.
 I like to call it the convenience continuum. So when you think from a consumer standpoint, it's the "let me do it, do it with me or do it for me." And frozen foods can really play in all three of those spaces. Between the demand growth, retailer engagement and industry innovations, the frozen food market is
 looking strong, according to the American Frozen Food Institute. They want cold and frozen items in particular, almost instantaneously. So we view ourselves as not just a facilitator of coldness, but a facilitator of e-commerce itself. Once consumers get used to the convenience, it's really tough to go back.
